systemd System and Service Manager

CHANGES WITH 228:

        * A number of properties previously only settable in unit
          files are now also available as properties to set when
          creating transient units programmatically via the bus, as it
          is exposed with systemd-run's --property=
          setting. Specifically, these are: SyslogIdentifier=,
          SyslogLevelPrefix=, TimerSlackNSec=, OOMScoreAdjust=,
          EnvironmentFile=, ReadWriteDirectories=,
          ReadOnlyDirectories=, InaccessibleDirectories=,
          ProtectSystem=, ProtectHome=, RuntimeDirectory=.

        * When creating transient services via the bus API it is now
          possible to pass in a set of file descriptors to use as
          STDIN/STDOUT/STDERR for the invoked process.

        * Slice units may now be created transiently via the bus APIs,
          similar to the way service and scope units may already be
          created transiently.

        * Wherever systemd expects a calendar timestamp specification
          (like in journalctl's --since= and --until= switches) UTC
          timestamps are now supported. Timestamps suffixed with "UTC"
          are now considered to be in Universal Time Coordinated
          instead of the local timezone. Also, timestamps may now
          optionally be specified with sub-second accuracy. Both of
          these additions also apply to recurring calendar event
          specification, such as OnCalendar= in timer units.

        * journalctl gained a new "--sync" switch that asks the
          journal daemon to write all so far unwritten log messages to
          disk and sync the files, before returning.

        * systemd-tmpfiles learned two new line types "q" and "Q" that
          operate like "v", but also set up a basic btrfs quota
          hierarchy when used on a btrfs file system with quota
          enabled.

        * tmpfiles' "v", "q" and "Q" will now create a plain directory
          instead of a subvolume (even on a btrfs file system) if the
          root directory is a plain directory, and not a
          subvolume. This should simplify things with certain chroot()
          environments which are not aware of the concept of btrfs
          subvolumes.

        * systemd-detect-virt gained a new --chroot switch to detect
          whether execution takes place in a chroot() environment.

        * CPUAffinity= now takes CPU index ranges in addition to
          individual indexes.

        * The various memory-related resource limit settings (such as
          LimitAS=) now understand the usual K, M, G, ... suffixes to
          the base of 1024 (IEC). Similar, the time-related resource
          limit settings understand the usual min, h, day, ...
          suffixes now.

        * There's a new system.conf setting DefaultTasksMax= to
          control the default TasksMax= setting for services and
          scopes running on the system. (TasksMax= is the primary
          setting that exposes the "pids" cgroup controller on systemd
          and was introduced in the previous systemd release.) The
          setting now defaults to 512, which means services that are
          not explicitly configured otherwise will only be able to
          create 512 processes or threads at maximum, from this
          version on. Note that this means that thread- or
          process-heavy services might need to be reconfigured to set
          TasksMax= to a higher value. It is sufficient to set
          TasksMax= in these specific unit files to a higher value, or
          even "infinity". Similar, there's now a logind.conf setting
          UserTasksMax= that defaults to 4096 and limits the total
          number of processes or tasks each user may own
          concurrently. nspawn containers also have the TasksMax=
          value set by default now, to 8192. Note that all of this
          only has an effect if the "pids" cgroup controller is
          enabled in the kernel. The general benefit of these changes
          should be a more robust and safer system, that provides a
          certain amount of per-service fork() bomb protection.

        * systemd-nspawn gained the new --network-veth-extra= switch
          to define additional and arbitrarily-named virtual Ethernet
          links between the host and the container.

        * A new service execution setting PassEnvironment= has been
          added that allows importing select environment variables
          from PID1's environment block into the environment block of
          the service.

        * systemd will now bump the net.unix.max_dgram_qlen to 512 by
          default now (the kernel default is 16). This is beneficial
          for avoiding blocking on AF_UNIX/SOCK_DGRAM sockets since it
          allows substantially larger numbers of queued
          datagrams. This should increase the capability of systemd to
          parallelize boot-up, as logging and sd_notify() are unlikely
          to stall execution anymore. If you need to change the value
          from the new defaults, use the usual sysctl.d/ snippets.

        * The compression framing format used by the journal or
          coredump processing has changed to be in line with what the
          official LZ4 tools generate. LZ4 compression support in
          systemd was considered unsupported previously, as the format
          was not compatible with the normal tools. With this release
          this has changed now, and it is hence safe for downstream
          distributions to turn it on. While not compressing as well
          as the XZ, LZ4 is substantially faster, which makes
          it a good default choice for the compression logic in the
          journal and in coredump handling.

        * Any reference to /etc/mtab has been dropped from
          systemd. The file has been obsolete since a while, but
          systemd refused to work on systems where it was incorrectly
          set up (it should be a symlink or non-existent). Please make
          sure to update to util-linux 2.27.1 or newer in conjunction
          with this systemd release, which also drops any reference to
          /etc/mtab. If you maintain a distribution make sure that no
          software you package still references it, as this is a
          likely source of bugs. There's also a glibc bug pending,
          asking for removal of any reference to this obsolete file:

          https://sourceware.org/bugzilla/show_bug.cgi?id=19108

        * Support for the ".snapshot" unit type has been removed. This
          feature turned out to be little useful and little used, and
          has now been removed from the core and from systemctl.

        * The dependency types RequiresOverridable= and
          RequisiteOverridable= have been removed from systemd. They
          have been used only very sparingly to our knowledge and
          other options that provide a similar effect (such as
          systemctl --mode=ignore-dependencies) are much more useful
          and commonly used. Moreover, they were only half-way
          implemented as the option to control behaviour regarding
          these dependencies was never added to systemctl. By removing
          these dependency types the execution engine becomes a bit
          simpler. Unit files that use these dependencies should be
          changed to use the non-Overridable dependency types
          instead. In fact, when parsing unit files with these
          options, that's what systemd will automatically convert them
          too, but it will also warn, asking users to fix the unit
          files accordingly. Removal of these dependency types should
          only affect a negligible number of unit files in the wild.

        * Behaviour of networkd's IPForward= option changed
          (again). It will no longer maintain a per-interface setting,
          but propagate one way from interfaces where this is enabled
          to the global kernel setting. The global setting will be
          enabled when requested by a network that is set up, but
          never be disabled again. This change was made to make sure
          IPv4 and IPv6 behaviour regarding packet forwarding is
          similar (as the Linux IPv6 stack does not support
          per-interface control of this setting) and to minimize
          surprises.

        * In unit files the behaviour of %u, %U, %h, %s has
          changed. These specifiers will now unconditionally resolve
          to the various user database fields of the user that the
          systemd instance is running as, instead of the user
          configured in the specific unit via User=. Note that this
          effectively doesn't change much, as resolving of these
          specifiers was already turned off in the --system instance
          of systemd, as we cannot do NSS lookups from PID 1. In the
          --user instance of systemd these specifiers where correctly
          resolved, but hardly made any sense, since the user instance
          lacks privileges to do user switches anyway, and User= is
          hence useless. Morever, even in the --user instance of
          systemd behaviour was awkward as it would only take settings
          from User= assignment placed before the specifier into
          account. In order to unify and simplify the logic around
          this the specifiers will now always resolve to the
          credentials of the user invoking the manager (which in case
          of PID 1 is the root user).

        Contributions from: Andrew Jones, Beniamino Galvani, Boyuan
        Yang, Daniel Machon, Daniel Mack, David Herrmann, David
        Reynolds, David Strauss, Dongsu Park, Evgeny Vereshchagin,
        Felipe Sateler, Filipe Brandenburger, Franck Bui, Hristo
        Venev, Iago López Galeiras, Jan Engelhardt, Jan Janssen, Jan
        Synacek, Jesus Ornelas Aguayo, Karel Zak, kayrus, Kay Sievers,
        Lennart Poettering, Liu Yuan Yuan, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marcel
        Holtmann, Marcin Bachry, Marcos Alano, Marcos Mello, Mark
        Theunissen, Martin Pitt, Michael Marineau, Michael Olbrich,
        Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Mirco Tischler, Nick Owens,
        Nicolas Cornu, Patrik Flykt, Peter Hutterer, reverendhomer,
        Ronny Chevalier, Sangjung Woo, Seong-ho Cho, Shawn Landden,
        Susant Sahani, Thomas Haller, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen,
        Tom Gundersen, Torstein Husebø, Vito Caputo, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-11-18

CHANGES WITH 227:

        * systemd now depends on util-linux v2.27. More specifically,
          the newly added mount monitor feature in libmount now
          replaces systemd's former own implementation.

        * libmount mandates /etc/mtab not to be regular file, and
          systemd now enforces this condition at early boot.
          /etc/mtab has been deprecated and warned about for a very
          long time, so systems running systemd should already have
          stopped having this file around as anything else than a
          symlink to /proc/self/mounts.

        * Support for the "pids" cgroup controller has been added.  It
          allows accounting the number of tasks in a cgroup and
          enforcing limits on it. This adds two new setting
          TasksAccounting= and TasksMax= to each unit, as well as a
          global option DefaultTasksAccounting=.

        * Support for the "net_cls" cgroup controller has been added.
          It allows assigning a net class ID to each task in the
          cgroup, which can then be used in firewall rules and traffic
          shaping configurations. Note that the kernel netfilter net
          class code does not currently work reliably for ingress
          packets on unestablished sockets.

          This adds a new config directive called NetClass= to CGroup
          enabled units. Allowed values are positive numbers for fixed
          assignments and "auto" for picking a free value
          automatically.

        * 'systemctl is-system-running' now returns 'offline' if the
          system is not booted with systemd. This command can now be
          used as a substitute for 'systemd-notify --booted'.

        * Watchdog timeouts have been increased to 3 minutes for all
          in-tree service files. Apparently, disk IO issues are more
          frequent than we hoped, and user reported >1 minute waiting
          for disk IO.

        * 'machine-id-commit' functionality has been merged into
          'machine-id-setup --commit'. The separate binary has been
          removed.

        * The WorkingDirectory= directive in unit files may now be set
          to the special value '~'. In this case, the working
          directory is set to the home directory of the user
          configured in User=.

        * "machinectl shell" will now open the shell in the home
          directory of the selected user by default.

        * The CrashChVT= configuration file setting is renamed to
          CrashChangeVT=, following our usual logic of not
          abbreviating unnecessarily. The old directive is still
          supported for compat reasons. Also, this directive now takes
          an integer value between 1 and 63, or a boolean value. The
          formerly supported '-1' value for disabling stays around for
          compat reasons.

        * The PrivateTmp=, PrivateDevices=, PrivateNetwork=,
          NoNewPrivileges=, TTYPath=, WorkingDirectory= and
          RootDirectory= properties can now be set for transient
          units.

        * The systemd-analyze tool gained a new "set-log-target" verb
          to change the logging target the system manager logs to
          dynamically during runtime. This is similar to how
          "systemd-analyze set-log-level" already changes the log
          level.

        * In nspawn /sys is now mounted as tmpfs, with only a selected
          set of subdirectories mounted in from the real sysfs. This
          enhances security slightly, and is useful for ensuring user
          namespaces work correctly.

        * Support for USB FunctionFS activation has been added. This
          allows implementation of USB gadget services that are
          activated as soon as they are requested, so that they don't
          have to run continously, similar to classic socket
          activation.

        * The "systemctl exit" command now optionally takes an
          additional parameter that sets the exit code to return from
          the systemd manager when exiting. This is only relevant when
          running the systemd user instance, or when running the
          system instance in a container.

        * sd-bus gained the new API calls sd_bus_path_encode_many()
          and sd_bus_path_decode_many() that allow easy encoding and
          decoding of multiple identifier strings inside a D-Bus
          object path. Another new call sd_bus_default_flush_close()
          has been added to flush and close per-thread default
          connections.

        * systemd-cgtop gained support for a -M/--machine= switch to
          show the control groups within a certain container only.

        * "systemctl kill" gained support for an optional --fail
          switch. If specified the requested operation will fail of no
          processes have been killed, because the unit had no
          processes attached, or similar.

        * A new systemd.crash_reboot=1 kernel command line option has
          been added that triggers a reboot after crashing. This can
          also be set through CrashReboot= in systemd.conf.

        * The RuntimeDirectory= setting now understands unit
          specifiers like %i or %f.

        * A new (still internal) libary API sd-ipv4acd has been added,
          that implements address conflict detection for IPv4. It's
          based on code from sd-ipv4ll, and will be useful for
          detecting DHCP address conflicts.

        * File descriptors passed during socket activation may now be
          named. A new API sd_listen_fds_with_names() is added to
          access the names.  The default names may be overridden,
          either in the .socket file using the FileDescriptorName=
          parameter, or by passing FDNAME= when storing the file
          descriptors using sd_notify().

        * systemd-networkd gained support for:

            - Setting the IPv6 Router Advertisment settings via
              IPv6AcceptRouterAdvertisements= in .network files.

            - Configuring the HelloTimeSec=, MaxAgeSec= and
              ForwardDelaySec= bridge parameters in .netdev files.

            - Configuring PreferredSource= for static routes in
              .network files.

        * The "ask-password" framework used to query for LUKS harddisk
          passwords or SSL passwords during boot gained support for
          caching passwords in the kernel keyring, if it is
          available. This makes sure that the user only has to type in
          a passphrase once if there are multiple objects to unlock
          with the same one. Previously, such password caching was
          available only when Plymouth was used; this moves the
          caching logic into the systemd codebase itself. The
          "systemd-ask-password" utility gained a new --keyname=
          switch to control which kernel keyring key to use for
          caching a password in. This functionality is also useful for
          enabling display managers such as gdm to automatically
          unlock the user's GNOME keyring if its passphrase, the
          user's password and the harddisk password are the same, if
          gdm-autologin is used.

        * When downloading tar or raw images using "machinectl
          pull-tar" or "machinectl pull-raw", a matching ".nspawn"
          file is now also downloaded, if it is available and stored
          next to the image file.

        * Units of type ".socket" gained a new boolean setting
          Writable= which is only useful in conjunction with
          ListenSpecial=. If true, enables opening the specified
          special file in O_RDWR mode rather than O_RDONLY mode.

        * systemd-rfkill has been reworked to become a singleton
          service that is activated through /dev/rfkill on each rfkill
          state change and saves the settings to disk. This way,
          systemd-rfkill is now compatible with devices that exist
          only intermittendly, and even restores state if the previous
          system shutdown was abrupt rather than clean.

        * The journal daemon gained support for vacuuming old journal
          files controlled by the number of files that shall remain,
          in addition to the already existing control by size and by
          date. This is useful as journal interleaving performance
          degrades with too many seperate journal files, and allows
          putting an effective limit on them. The new setting defaults
          to 100, but this may be changed by setting SystemMaxFiles=
          and RuntimeMaxFiles= in journald.conf. Also, the
          "journalctl" tool gained the new --vacuum-files= switch to
          manually vacuum journal files to leave only the specified
          number of files in place.

        * udev will now create /dev/disk/by-path links for ATA devices
          on kernels where that is supported.

        * Galician, Serbian, Turkish and Korean translations were added.

        Contributions from: Aaro Koskinen, Alban Crequy, Beniamino
        Galvani, Benjamin Robin, Branislav Blaskovic, Chen-Han Hsiao
        (Stanley), Daniel Buch, Daniel Machon, Daniel Mack, David
        Herrmann, David Milburn, doubleodoug, Evgeny Vereshchagin,
        Felipe Franciosi, Filipe Brandenburger, Fran Dieguez, Gabriel
        de Perthuis, Georg Müller, Hans de Goede, Hendrik Brueckner,
        Ivan Shapovalov, Jacob Keller, Jan Engelhardt, Jan Janssen,
        Jan Synacek, Jens Kuske, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers, Krzesimir
        Nowak, Krzysztof Kotlenga, Lars Uebernickel, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Łukasz Stelmach, Maciej Wereski,
        Marcel Holtmann, Marius Thesing, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl,
        Michael Gebetsroither, Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Mike
        Gilbert, Muhammet Kara, nazgul77, Nicolas Cornu, NoXPhasma,
        Olof Johansson, Patrik Flykt, Pawel Szewczyk, reverendhomer,
        Ronny Chevalier, Sangjung Woo, Seong-ho Cho, Susant Sahani,
        Sylvain Plantefève, Thomas Haller, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel
        Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Tom Lyon, Viktar Vauchkevich,
        Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek, Марко М. Костић

        -- Berlin, 2015-10-07

CHANGES WITH 226:

        * The DHCP implementation of systemd-networkd gained a set of
          new features:

          - The DHCP server now supports emitting DNS and NTP
            information. It may be enabled and configured via
            EmitDNS=, DNS=, EmitNTP=, and NTP=. If transmission of DNS
            and NTP information is enabled, but no servers are
            configured, the corresponding uplink information (if there
            is any) is propagated.

          - Server and client now support transmission and reception
            of timezone information. It can be configured via the
            newly introduced network options UseTimezone=,
            EmitTimezone=, and Timezone=.  Transmission of timezone
            information is enabled between host and containers by
            default now: the container will change its local timezone
            to what the host has set.

          - Lease timeouts can now be configured via
            MaxLeaseTimeSec= and DefaultLeaseTimeSec=.

          - The DHCP server improved on the stability of
            leases. Clients are more likely to get the same lease
            information back, even if the server loses state.

          - The DHCP server supports two new configuration options to
            control the lease address pool metrics, PoolOffset= and
            PoolSize=.

        * The encapsulation limit of tunnels in systemd-networkd may
          now be configured via 'EncapsulationLimit='. It allows
          modifying the maximum additional levels of encapsulation
          that are permitted to be prepended to a packet.

        * systemd now supports the concept of user buses replacing
          session buses, if used with dbus-1.10 (and enabled via dbus
          --enable-user-session). It previously only supported this on
          kdbus-enabled systems, and this release expands this to
          'dbus-daemon' systems.

        * systemd-networkd now supports predictable interface names
          for virtio devices.

        * systemd now optionally supports the new Linux kernel
          "unified" control group hierarchy. If enabled via the kernel
          command-line option 'systemd.unified_cgroup_hierarchy=1',
          systemd will try to mount the unified cgroup hierarchy
          directly on /sys/fs/cgroup. If not enabled, or not
          available, systemd will fall back to the legacy cgroup
          hierarchy setup, as before. Host system and containers can
          mix and match legacy and unified hierarchies as they
          wish. nspawn understands the $UNIFIED_CROUP_HIERARCHY
          environment variable to individually select the hierarchy to
          use for executed containers. By default, nspawn will use the
          unified hierarchy for the containers if the host uses the
          unified hierarchy, and the legacy hierarchy otherwise.
          Please note that at this point the unified hierarchy is an
          experimental kernel feature and is likely to change in one
          of the next kernel releases.  Therefore, it should not be
          enabled by default in downstream distributions yet. The
          minimum required kernel version for the unified hierarchy to
          work is 4.2. Note that when the unified hierarchy is used
          for the first time delegated access to controllers is
          safe. Because of this systemd-nspawn containers will get
          access to controllers now, as will systemd user
          sessions. This means containers and user sessions may now
          manage their own resources, partitioning up what the system
          grants them.

        * A new special scope unit "init.scope" has been introduced
          that encapsulates PID 1 of the system. It may be used to
          determine resource usage and enforce resource limits on PID
          1 itself. PID 1 hence moved out of the root of the control
          group tree.

        * The cgtop tool gained support for filtering out kernel
          threads when counting tasks in a control group. Also, the
          count of processes is now recursively summed up by
          default. Two options -k and --recursive= have been added to
          revert to old behaviour. The tool has also been updated to
          work correctly in containers now.

        * systemd-nspawn's --bind= and --bind-ro= options have been
          extended to allow creation of non-recursive bind mounts.

        * libsystemd gained two new calls sd_pid_get_cgroup() and
          sd_peer_get_cgroup() which return the control group path of
          a process or peer of a connected AF_UNIX socket. This
          function call is particularly useful when implementing
          delegated subtrees support in the control group hierarchy.

        * The "sd-event" event loop API of libsystemd now supports
          correct dequeuing of real-time signals, without losing
          signal events.

        * When systemd requests a PolicyKit decision when managing
          units it will now add additional fields to the request,
          including unit name and desired operation. This enables more
          powerful PolicyKit policies, that make decisions depending
          on these parameters.

        * nspawn learnt support for .nspawn settings files, that may
          accompany the image files or directories of containers, and
          may contain additional settings for the container. This is
          an alternative to configuring container parameters via the
          nspawn command line.

        Contributions from: Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Mack, David
        Herrmann, Eugene Yakubovich, Evgeny Vereshchagin, Filipe
        Brandenburger, Hans de Goede, Jan Alexander Steffens, Jan
        Synacek, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Mangix, Marcel
        Holtmann, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael Chapman, Michal
        Sekletar, Peter Hutterer, Piotr Drąg, reverendhomer, Robin
        Hack, Susant Sahani, Sylvain Pasche, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel
        Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Torstein Husebø

        -- Berlin, 2015-09-08

CHANGES WITH 225:

        * machinectl gained a new verb 'shell' which opens a fresh
          shell on the target container or the host. It is similar to
          the existing 'login' command of machinectl, but spawns the
          shell directly without prompting for username or
          password. The pseudo machine '.host' now refers to the local
          host and is used by default. Hence, 'machinectl shell' can
          be used as replacement for 'su -' which spawns a session as
          a fresh systemd unit in a way that is fully isolated from
          the originating session.

        * systemd-networkd learned to cope with private-zone DHCP
          options and allows other programs to query the values.

        * SELinux access control when enabling/disabling units is no
          longer enforced with this release. The previous
          implementation was incorrect, and a new corrected
          implementation is not yet available. As unit file operations
          are still protected via PolicyKit and D-Bus policy this is
          not a security problem. Yet, distributions which care about
          optimal SELinux support should probably not stabilize on
          this release.

        * sd-bus gained support for matches of type "arg0has=", that
          test for membership of strings in string arrays sent in bus
          messages.

        * systemd-resolved now dumps the contents of its DNS and LLMNR
          caches to the logs on reception of the SIGUSR1 signal. This
          is useful to debug DNS behaviour.

        * The coredumpctl tool gained a new --directory= option to
          operate on journal files in a specific directory.

        * "systemctl reboot" and related commands gained a new
          "--message=" option which may be used to set a free-text
          wall message when shutting down or rebooting the
          system. This message is also logged, which is useful for
          figuring out the reason for a reboot or shutdown a
          posteriori.

        * The "systemd-resolve-host" tool's -i switch now takes
          network interface numbers as alternative to interface names.

        * A new unit file setting for services has been introduced:
          UtmpMode= allows configuration of how precisely systemd
          handles utmp and wtmp entries for the service if this is
          enabled. This allows writing services that appear similar to
          user sessions in the output of the "w", "who", "last" and
          "lastlog" tools.

        * systemd-resolved will now locally synthesize DNS resource
          records for the "localhost" and "gateway" domains as well as
          the local hostname. This should ensure that clients querying
          RRs via resolved will get similar results as those going via
          NSS, if nss-myhostname is enabled.

        Contributions from: Alastair Hughes, Alex Crawford, Daniel
        Mack, David Herrmann, Dimitri John Ledkov, Eric Kostrowski,
        Evgeny Vereshchagin, Felipe Sateler, HATAYAMA Daisuke, Jan
        Pokorný, Jan Synacek, Johnny Robeson, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers,
        Kefeng Wang, Lennart Poettering, Major Hayden, Marcel
        Holtmann, Markus Elfring, Martin Mikkelsen, Martin Pitt, Matt
        Turner, Maxim Mikityanskiy, Michael Biebl, Namhyung Kim,
        Nicolas Cornu, Owen W. Taylor, Patrik Flykt, Peter Hutterer,
        reverendhomer, Richard Maw, Ronny Chevalier, Seth Jennings,
        Stef Walter, Susant Sahani, Thomas Blume, Thomas Hindoe
        Paaboel Andersen, Thomas Meyer, Tom Gundersen, Vincent Batts,
        WaLyong Cho, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-08-27

CHANGES WITH 224:

        * The systemd-efi-boot-generator functionality was merged into
          systemd-gpt-auto-generator.

        * systemd-networkd now supports Group Policy for vxlan
          devices. It can be enabled via the new boolean configuration
          option called 'GroupPolicyExtension='.

        Contributions from: Andreas Kempf, Christian Hesse, Daniel Mack, David
        Herrmann, Herman Fries, Johannes Nixdorf, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Peter Hutterer, Susant Sahani, Tom Gundersen

        -- Berlin, 2015-07-31

CHANGES WITH 223:

        * The python-systemd code has been removed from the systemd repository.
          A new repository has been created which accommodates the code from
          now on, and we kindly ask distributions to create a separate package
          for this: https://github.com/systemd/python-systemd

        * The systemd daemon will now reload its main configuration
          (/etc/systemd/system.conf) on daemon-reload.

        * sd-dhcp now exposes vendor specific extensions via
          sd_dhcp_lease_get_vendor_specific().

        * systemd-networkd gained a number of new configuration options.

          - A new boolean configuration option for TAP devices called
            'VNetHeader='. If set, the IFF_VNET_HDR flag is set for the
            device, thus allowing to send and receive GSO packets.

          - A new tunnel configuration option called 'CopyDSCP='.
            If enabled, the DSCP field of ip6 tunnels is copied into the
            decapsulated packet.

          - A set of boolean bridge configuration options were added.
            'UseBPDU=', 'HairPin=', 'FastLeave=', 'AllowPortToBeRoot=',
            and 'UnicastFlood=' are now parsed by networkd and applied to the
            respective bridge link device via the respective IFLA_BRPORT_*
            netlink attribute.

          - A new string configuration option to override the hostname sent
            to a DHCP server, called 'Hostname='. If set and 'SendHostname='
            is true, networkd will use the configured hostname instead of the
            system hostname when sending DHCP requests.

          - A new tunnel configuration option called 'IPv6FlowLabel='. If set,
            networkd will configure the IPv6 flow-label of the tunnel device
            according to RFC2460.

          - The 'macvtap' virtual network devices are now supported, similar to
            the already supported 'macvlan' devices.

        * systemd-resolved now implements RFC5452 to improve resilience against
          cache poisoning. Additionally, source port randomization is enabled
          by default to further protect against DNS spoofing attacks.

        * nss-mymachines now supports translating UIDs and GIDs of running
          containers with user-namespaces enabled. If a container 'foo'
          translates a host uid 'UID' to the container uid 'TUID', then
          nss-mymachines will also map uid 'UID' to/from username 'vu-foo-TUID'
          (with 'foo' and 'TUID' replaced accordingly). Similarly, groups are
          mapped as 'vg-foo-TGID'.

        Contributions from: Beniamino Galvani, cee1, Christian Hesse, Daniel
        Buch, Daniel Mack, daurnimator, David Herrmann, Dimitri John Ledkov,
        HATAYAMA Daisuke, Ivan Shapovalov, Jan Alexander Steffens (heftig),
        Johan Ouwerkerk, Jose Carlos Venegas Munoz, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers,
        Lennart Poettering, Lidong Zhong, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael
        Olbrich, Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Mike Gilbert, Namhyung Kim,
        Nick Owens, Peter Hutterer, Richard Maw, Steven Allen, Sungbae Yoo,
        Susant Sahani, Thomas Blume, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom
        Gundersen, Torstein Husebø, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Vito Caputo,
        Vivenzio Pagliari, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-07-29

CHANGES WITH 222:

        * udev does not longer support the WAIT_FOR_SYSFS= key in udev rules.
          There are no known issues with current sysfs, and udev does not need
          or should be used to work around such bugs.

        * udev does no longer enable USB HID power management. Several reports
          indicate, that some devices cannot handle that setting.

        * The udev accelerometer helper was removed. The functionality
          is now fully included in iio-sensor-proxy. But this means,
          older iio-sensor-proxy versions will no longer provide
          accelerometer/orientation data with this systemd version.
          Please upgrade iio-sensor-proxy to version 1.0.

        * networkd gained a new configuration option IPv6PrivacyExtensions=
          which enables IPv6 privacy extensions (RFC 4941, "Privacy Extensions
          for Stateless Address") on selected networks.

        * For the sake of fewer build-time dependencies and less code in the
          main repository, the python bindings are about to be removed in the
          next release. A new repository has been created which accommodates
          the code from now on, and we kindly ask distributions to create a
          separate package for this. The removal will take place in v223.

            https://github.com/systemd/python-systemd

        Contributions from: Abdo Roig-Maranges, Andrew Eikum, Bastien Nocera,
        Cédric Delmas, Christian Hesse, Christos Trochalakis, Daniel Mack,
        daurnimator, David Herrmann, Dimitri John Ledkov, Eric Biggers, Eric
        Cook, Felipe Sateler, Geert Jansen, Gerd Hoffmann, Gianpaolo Macario,
        Greg Kroah-Hartman, Iago López Galeiras, Jan Alexander Steffens
        (heftig), Jan Engelhardt, Jay Strict, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering,
        Markus Knetschke, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael Marineau, Michal
        Sekletar, Miguel Bernal Marin, Peter Hutterer, Richard Maw, rinrinne,
        Susant Sahani, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Torstein
        Husebø, Vedran Miletić, WaLyong Cho, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-07-07

CHANGES WITH 221:

        * The sd-bus.h and sd-event.h APIs have now been declared
          stable and have been added to the official interface of
          libsystemd.so. sd-bus implements an alternative D-Bus client
          library, that is relatively easy to use, very efficient and
          supports both classic D-Bus as well as kdbus as transport
          backend. sd-event is a generic event loop abstraction that
          is built around Linux epoll, but adds features such as event
          prioritization or efficient timer handling. Both APIs are good
          choices for C programs looking for a bus and/or event loop
          implementation that is minimal and does not have to be
          portable to other kernels.

        * kdbus support is no longer compile-time optional. It is now
          always built-in. However, it can still be disabled at
          runtime using the kdbus=0 kernel command line setting, and
          that setting may be changed to default to off, by specifying
          --disable-kdbus at build-time. Note though that the kernel
          command line setting has no effect if the kdbus.ko kernel
          module is not installed, in which case kdbus is (obviously)
          also disabled. We encourage all downstream distributions to
          begin testing kdbus by adding it to the kernel images in the
          development distributions, and leaving kdbus support in
          systemd enabled.

        * The minimal required util-linux version has been bumped to
          2.26.

        * Support for chkconfig (--enable-chkconfig) was removed in
          favor of calling an abstraction tool
          /lib/systemd/systemd-sysv-install. This needs to be
          implemented for your distribution. See "SYSV INIT.D SCRIPTS"
          in README for details.

        * If there's a systemd unit and a SysV init script for the
          same service name, and the user executes "systemctl enable"
          for it (or a related call), then this will now enable both
          (or execute the related operation on both), not just the
          unit.

        * The libudev API documentation has been converted from gtkdoc
          into man pages.

        * gudev has been removed from the systemd tree, it is now an
          external project.

        * The systemd-cgtop tool learnt a new --raw switch to generate
          "raw" (machine parsable) output.

        * networkd's IPForwarding= .network file setting learnt the
          new setting "kernel", which ensures that networkd does not
          change the IP forwarding sysctl from the default kernel
          state.

        * The systemd-logind bus API now exposes a new boolean
          property "Docked" that reports whether logind considers the
          system "docked", i.e. connected to a docking station or not.

        Contributions from: Alex Crawford, Andreas Pokorny, Andrei
        Borzenkov, Charles Duffy, Colin Guthrie, Cristian Rodríguez,
        Daniele Medri, Daniel Hahler, Daniel Mack, David Herrmann,
        David Mohr, Dimitri John Ledkov, Djalal Harouni, dslul, Ed
        Swierk, Eric Cook, Filipe Brandenburger, Gianpaolo Macario,
        Harald Hoyer, Iago López Galeiras, Igor Vuk, Jan Synacek,
        Jason Pleau, Jason S. McMullan, Jean Delvare, Jeff Huang,
        Jonathan Boulle, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers, kloun, Lennart
        Poettering, Marc-Antoine Perennou, Marcel Holtmann, Mario
        Limonciello, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael Olbrich,
        Michal Schmidt, Mike Gilbert, Nick Owens, Pablo Lezaeta Reyes,
        Patrick Donnelly, Pavel Odvody, Peter Hutterer, Philip
        Withnall, Ronny Chevalier, Simon McVittie, Susant Sahani,
        Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Torstein
        Husebø, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Viktar Vauchkevich, Werner
        Fink, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-06-19

CHANGES WITH 220:

        * The gudev library has been extracted into a separate repository
          available at: https://git.gnome.org/browse/libgudev/
          It is now managed as part of the Gnome project. Distributions
          are recommended to pass --disable-gudev to systemd and use
          gudev from the Gnome project instead. gudev is still included
          in systemd, for now. It will be removed soon, though. Please
          also see the announcement-thread on systemd-devel:
          http://lists.freedesktop.org/archives/systemd-devel/2015-May/032070.html

        * systemd now exposes a CPUUsageNSec= property for each
          service unit on the bus, that contains the overall consumed
          CPU time of a service (the sum of what each process of the
          service consumed). This value is only available if
          CPUAccounting= is turned on for a service, and is then shown
          in the "systemctl status" output.

        * Support for configuring alternative mappings of the old SysV
          runlevels to systemd targets has been removed. They are now
          hardcoded in a way that runlevels 2, 3, 4 all map to
          multi-user.target and 5 to graphical.target (which
          previously was already the default behaviour).

        * The auto-mounter logic gained support for mount point
          expiry, using a new TimeoutIdleSec= setting in .automount
          units. (Also available as x-systemd.idle-timeout= in /etc/fstab).

        * The EFI System Partition (ESP) as mounted to /boot by
          systemd-efi-boot-generator will now be unmounted
          automatically after 2 minutes of not being used. This should
          minimize the risk of ESP corruptions.

        * New /etc/fstab options x-systemd.requires= and
          x-systemd.requires-mounts-for= are now supported to express
          additional dependencies for mounts. This is useful for
          journalling file systems that support external journal
          devices or overlay file systems that require underlying file
          systems to be mounted.

        * systemd does not support direct live-upgrades (via systemctl
          daemon-reexec) from versions older than v44 anymore. As no
          distribution we are aware of shipped such old versions in a
          stable release this should not be problematic.

        * When systemd forks off a new per-connection service instance
          it will now set the $REMOTE_ADDR environment variable to the
          remote IP address, and $REMOTE_PORT environment variable to
          the remote IP port. This behaviour is similar to the
          corresponding environment variables defined by CGI.

        * systemd-networkd gained support for uplink failure
          detection. The BindCarrier= option allows binding interface
          configuration dynamically to the link sense of other
          interfaces. This is useful to achieve behaviour like in
          network switches.

        * systemd-networkd gained support for configuring the DHCP
          client identifier to use when requesting leases.

        * systemd-networkd now has a per-network UseNTP= option to
          configure whether NTP server information acquired via DHCP
          is passed on to services like systemd-timesyncd.

        * systemd-networkd gained support for vti6 tunnels.

        * Note that systemd-networkd manages the sysctl variable
          /proc/sys/net/ipv[46]/conf/*/forwarding for each interface
          it is configured for since v219. The variable controls IP
          forwarding, and is a per-interface alternative to the global
          /proc/sys/net/ipv[46]/ip_forward. This setting is
          configurable in the IPForward= option, which defaults to
          "no". This means if networkd is used for an interface it is
          no longer sufficient to set the global sysctl option to turn
          on IP forwarding! Instead, the .network file option
          IPForward= needs to be turned on! Note that the
          implementation of this behaviour was broken in v219 and has
          been fixed in v220.

        * Many bonding and vxlan options are now configurable in
          systemd-networkd.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --property= setting to set unit
          properties for the container scope. This is useful for
          setting resource parameters (e.g "CPUShares=500") on
          containers started from the command line.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --private-users= switch to make
          use of user namespacing available on recent Linux kernels.

        * systemd-nspawn may now be called as part of a shell pipeline
          in which case the pipes used for stdin and stdout are passed
          directly to the process invoked in the container, without
          indirection via a pseudo tty.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new switch to control the UNIX
          signal to use when killing the init process of the container
          when shutting down.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --overlay= switch for mounting
          overlay file systems into the container using the new kernel
          overlayfs support.

        * When a container image is imported via systemd-importd and
          the host file system is not btrfs, a loopback block device
          file is created in /var/lib/machines.raw with a btrfs file
          system inside. It is then mounted to /var/lib/machines to
          enable btrfs features for container management. The loopback
          file and btrfs file system is grown as needed when container
          images are imported via systemd-importd.

        * systemd-machined/systemd-importd gained support for btrfs
          quota, to enforce container disk space limits on disk. This
          is exposed in "machinectl set-limit".

        * systemd-importd now can import containers from local .tar,
          .raw and .qcow2 images, and export them to .tar and .raw. It
          can also import dkr v2 images now from the network (on top
          of v1 as before).

        * systemd-importd gained support for verifying downloaded
          images with gpg2 (previously only gpg1 was supported).

        * systemd-machined, systemd-logind, systemd: most bus calls
          are now accessible to unprivileged processes via
          PolicyKit. Also, systemd-logind will now allow users to kill
          their own sessions without further privileges or
          authorization.

        * systemd-shutdownd has been removed. This service was
          previously responsible for implementing scheduled shutdowns
          as exposed in /usr/bin/shutdown's time parameter. This
          functionality has now been moved into systemd-logind and is
          accessible via a bus interface.

        * "systemctl reboot" gained a new switch --firmware-setup that
          can be used to reboot into the EFI firmware setup, if that
          is available. systemd-logind now exposes an API on the bus
          to trigger such reboots, in case graphical desktop UIs want
          to cover this functionality.

        * "systemctl enable", "systemctl disable" and "systemctl mask"
          now support a new "--now" switch. If specified the units
          that are enabled will also be started, and the ones
          disabled/masked also stopped.

        * The Gummiboot EFI boot loader tool has been merged into
          systemd, and renamed to "systemd-boot". The bootctl tool has been
          updated to support systemd-boot.

        * An EFI kernel stub has been added that may be used to create
          kernel EFI binaries that contain not only the actual kernel,
          but also an initrd, boot splash, command line and OS release
          information. This combined binary can then be signed as a
          single image, so that the firmware can verify it all in one
          step. systemd-boot has special support for EFI binaries created
          like this and can extract OS release information from them
          and show them in the boot menu. This functionality is useful
          to implement cryptographically verified boot schemes.

        * Optional support has been added to systemd-fsck to pass
          fsck's progress report to an AF_UNIX socket in the file
          system.

        * udev will no longer create device symlinks for all block
          devices by default. A blacklist for excluding special block
          devices from this logic has been turned into a whitelist
          that requires picking block devices explicitly that require
          device symlinks.

        * A new (currently still internal) API sd-device.h has been
          added to libsystemd. This modernized API is supposed to
          replace libudev eventually. In fact, already much of libudev
          is now just a wrapper around sd-device.h.

        * A new hwdb database for storing metadata about pointing
          stick devices has been added.

        * systemd-tmpfiles gained support for setting file attributes
          similar to the "chattr" tool with new 'h' and 'H' lines.

        * systemd-journald will no longer unconditionally set the
          btrfs NOCOW flag on new journal files. This is instead done
          with tmpfiles snippet using the new 'h' line type. This
          allows easy disabling of this logic, by masking the
          journal-nocow.conf tmpfiles file.

        * systemd-journald will now translate audit message types to
          human readable identifiers when writing them to the
          journal. This should improve readability of audit messages.

        * The LUKS logic gained support for the offset= and skip=
          options in /etc/crypttab, as previously implemented by
          Debian.

        * /usr/lib/os-release gained a new optional field VARIANT= for
          distributions that support multiple variants (such as a
          desktop edition, a server edition, ...)

        Contributions from: Aaro Koskinen, Adam Goode, Alban Crequy,
        Alberto Fanjul Alonso, Alexander Sverdlin, Alex Puchades, Alin
        Rauta, Alison Chaiken, Andrew Jones, Arend van Spriel,
        Benedikt Morbach, Benjamin Franzke, Benjamin Tissoires, Blaž
        Tomažič, Chris Morgan, Chris Morin, Colin Walters, Cristian
        Rodríguez, Daniel Buch, Daniel Drake, Daniele Medri, Daniel
        Mack, Daniel Mustieles, daurnimator, Davide Bettio, David
        Herrmann, David Strauss, Didier Roche, Dimitri John Ledkov,
        Eric Cook, Gavin Li, Goffredo Baroncelli, Hannes Reinecke,
        Hans de Goede, Hans-Peter Deifel, Harald Hoyer, Iago López
        Galeiras, Ivan Shapovalov, Jan Engelhardt, Jan Janssen, Jan
        Pazdziora, Jan Synacek, Jasper St. Pierre, Jay Faulkner, John
        Paul Adrian Glaubitz, Jonathon Gilbert, Karel Zak, Kay
        Sievers, Koen Kooi, Lennart Poettering, Lubomir Rintel, Lucas
        De Marchi, Lukas Nykryn, Lukas Rusak, Lukasz Skalski, Łukasz
        Stelmach, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marc-Antoine Perennou, Marcel
        Holtmann, Martin Pitt, Mathieu Chevrier, Matthew Garrett,
        Michael Biebl, Michael Marineau, Michael Olbrich, Michal
        Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Mirco Tischler, Nir Soffer, Patrik
        Flykt, Pavel Odvody, Peter Hutterer, Peter Lemenkov, Peter
        Waller, Piotr Drąg, Raul Gutierrez S, Richard Maw, Ronny
        Chevalier, Ross Burton, Sebastian Rasmussen, Sergey Ptashnick,
        Seth Jennings, Shawn Landden, Simon Farnsworth, Stefan Junker,
        Stephen Gallagher, Susant Sahani, Sylvain Plantefève, Thomas
        Haller, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tobias Hunger, Tom
        Gundersen, Torstein Husebø, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Will
        Woods, Zachary Cook, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-05-22

CHANGES WITH 219:

        * Introduce a new API "sd-hwdb.h" for querying the hardware
          metadata database. With this minimal interface one can query
          and enumerate the udev hwdb, decoupled from the old libudev
          library. libudev's interface for this is now only a wrapper
          around sd-hwdb. A new tool systemd-hwdb has been added to
          interface with and update the database.

        * When any of systemd's tools copies files (for example due to
          tmpfiles' C lines) a btrfs reflink will attempted first,
          before bytewise copying is done.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --ephemeral switch. When
          specified a btrfs snapshot is taken of the container's root
          directory, and immediately removed when the container
          terminates again. Thus, a container can be started whose
          changes never alter the container's root directory, and are
          lost on container termination. This switch can also be used
          for starting a container off the root file system of the
          host without affecting the host OS. This switch is only
          available on btrfs file systems.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --template= switch. It takes the
          path to a container tree to use as template for the tree
          specified via --directory=, should that directory be
          missing. This allows instantiating containers dynamically,
          on first run. This switch is only available on btrfs file
          systems.

        * When a .mount unit refers to a mount point on which multiple
          mounts are stacked, and the .mount unit is stopped all of
          the stacked mount points will now be unmounted until no
          mount point remains.

        * systemd now has an explicit notion of supported and
          unsupported unit types. Jobs enqueued for unsupported unit
          types will now fail with an "unsupported" error code. More
          specifically .swap, .automount and .device units are not
          supported in containers, .busname units are not supported on
          non-kdbus systems. .swap and .automount are also not
          supported if their respective kernel compile time options
          are disabled.

        * machinectl gained support for two new "copy-from" and
          "copy-to" commands for copying files from a running
          container to the host or vice versa.

        * machinectl gained support for a new "bind" command to bind
          mount host directories into local containers. This is
          currently only supported for nspawn containers.

        * networkd gained support for configuring bridge forwarding
          database entries (fdb) from .network files.

        * A new tiny daemon "systemd-importd" has been added that can
          download container images in tar, raw, qcow2 or dkr formats,
          and make them available locally in /var/lib/machines, so
          that they can run as nspawn containers. The daemon can GPG
          verify the downloads (not supported for dkr, since it has no
          provisions for verifying downloads). It will transparently
          decompress bz2, xz, gzip compressed downloads if necessary,
          and restore sparse files on disk. The daemon uses privilege
          separation to ensure the actual download logic runs with
          fewer privileges than the daemon itself. machinectl has
          gained new commands "pull-tar", "pull-raw" and "pull-dkr" to
          make the functionality of importd available to the
          user. With this in place the Fedora and Ubuntu "Cloud"
          images can be downloaded and booted as containers unmodified
          (the Fedora images lack the appropriate GPG signature files
          currently, so they cannot be verified, but this will change
          soon, hopefully). Note that downloading images is currently
          only fully supported on btrfs.

        * machinectl is now able to list container images found in
          /var/lib/machines, along with some metadata about sizes of
          disk and similar. If the directory is located on btrfs and
          quota is enabled, this includes quota display. A new command
          "image-status" has been added that shows additional
          information about images.

        * machinectl is now able to clone container images
          efficiently, if the underlying file system (btrfs) supports
          it, with the new "machinectl list-images" command. It also
          gained commands for renaming and removing images, as well as
          marking them read-only or read-write (supported also on
          legacy file systems).

        * networkd gained support for collecting LLDP network
          announcements, from hardware that supports this. This is
          shown in networkctl output.

        * systemd-run gained support for a new -t (--pty) switch for
          invoking a binary on a pty whose input and output is
          connected to the invoking terminal. This allows executing
          processes as system services while interactively
          communicating with them via the terminal. Most interestingly
          this is supported across container boundaries. Invoking
          "systemd-run -t /bin/bash" is an alternative to running a
          full login session, the difference being that the former
          will not register a session, nor go through the PAM session
          setup.

        * tmpfiles gained support for a new "v" line type for creating
          btrfs subvolumes. If the underlying file system is a legacy
          file system, this automatically degrades to creating a
          normal directory. Among others /var/lib/machines is now
          created like this at boot, should it be missing.

        * The directory /var/lib/containers/ has been deprecated and
          been replaced by /var/lib/machines. The term "machines" has
          been used in the systemd context as generic term for both
          VMs and containers, and hence appears more appropriate for
          this, as the directory can also contain raw images bootable
          via qemu/kvm.

        * systemd-nspawn when invoked with -M but without --directory=
          or --image= is now capable of searching for the container
          root directory, subvolume or disk image automatically, in
          /var/lib/machines. systemd-nspawn@.service has been updated
          to make use of this, thus allowing it to be used for raw
          disk images, too.

        * A new machines.target unit has been introduced that is
          supposed to group all containers/VMs invoked as services on
          the system. systemd-nspawn@.service has been updated to
          integrate with that.

        * machinectl gained a new "start" command, for invoking a
          container as a service. "machinectl start foo" is mostly
          equivalent to "systemctl start systemd-nspawn@foo.service",
          but handles escaping in a nicer way.

        * systemd-nspawn will now mount most of the cgroupfs tree
          read-only into each container, with the exception of the
          container's own subtree in the name=systemd hierarchy.

        * journald now sets the special FS_NOCOW file flag for its
          journal files. This should improve performance on btrfs, by
          avoiding heavy fragmentation when journald's write-pattern
          is used on COW file systems. It degrades btrfs' data
          integrity guarantees for the files to the same levels as for
          ext3/ext4 however. This should be OK though as journald does
          its own data integrity checks and all its objects are
          checksummed on disk. Also, journald should handle btrfs disk
          full events a lot more gracefully now, by processing SIGBUS
          errors, and not relying on fallocate() anymore.

        * When journald detects that journal files it is writing to
          have been deleted it will immediately start new journal
          files.

        * systemd now provides a way to store file descriptors
          per-service in PID 1.This is useful for daemons to ensure
          that fds they require are not lost during a daemon
          restart. The fds are passed to the daemon on the next
          invocation in the same way socket activation fds are
          passed. This is now used by journald to ensure that the
          various sockets connected to all the system's stdout/stderr
          are not lost when journald is restarted. File descriptors
          may be stored in PID 1 via the sd_pid_notify_with_fds() API,
          an extension to sd_notify(). Note that a limit is enforced
          on the number of fds a service can store in PID 1, and it
          defaults to 0, so that no fds may be stored, unless this is
          explicitly turned on.

        * The default TERM variable to use for units connected to a
          terminal, when no other value is explicitly is set is now
          vt220 rather than vt102. This should be fairly safe still,
          but allows PgUp/PgDn work.

        * The /etc/crypttab option header= as known from Debian is now
          supported.

        * "loginctl user-status" and "loginctl session-status" will
          now show the last 10 lines of log messages of the
          user/session following the status output. Similar,
          "machinectl status" will show the last 10 log lines
          associated with a virtual machine or container
          service. (Note that this is usually not the log messages
          done in the VM/container itself, but simply what the
          container manager logs. For nspawn this includes all console
          output however.)

        * "loginctl session-status" without further argument will now
          show the status of the session of the caller. Similar,
          "lock-session", "unlock-session", "activate",
          "enable-linger", "disable-linger" may now be called without
          session/user parameter in which case they apply to the
          caller's session/user.

        * An X11 session scriptlet is now shipped that uploads
          $DISPLAY and $XAUTHORITY into the environment of the systemd
          --user daemon if a session begins. This should improve
          compatibility with X11 enabled applications run as systemd
          user services.

        * Generators are now subject to masking via /etc and /run, the
          same way as unit files.

        * networkd .network files gained support for configuring
          per-link IPv4/IPv6 packet forwarding as well as IPv4
          masquerading. This is by default turned on for veth links to
          containers, as registered by systemd-nspawn. This means that
          nspawn containers run with --network-veth will now get
          automatic routed access to the host's networks without any
          further configuration or setup, as long as networkd runs on
          the host.

        * systemd-nspawn gained the --port= (-p) switch to expose TCP
          or UDP posts of a container on the host. With this in place
          it is possible to run containers with private veth links
          (--network-veth), and have their functionality exposed on
          the host as if their services were running directly on the
          host.

        * systemd-nspawn's --network-veth switch now gained a short
          version "-n", since with the changes above it is now truly
          useful out-of-the-box. The systemd-nspawn@.service has been
          updated to make use of it too by default.

        * systemd-nspawn will now maintain a per-image R/W lock, to
          ensure that the same image is not started more than once
          writable. (It's OK to run an image multiple times
          simultaneously in read-only mode.)

        * systemd-nspawn's --image= option is now capable of
          dissecting and booting MBR and GPT disk images that contain
          only a single active Linux partition. Previously it
          supported only GPT disk images with proper GPT type
          IDs. This allows running cloud images from major
          distributions directly with systemd-nspawn, without
          modification.

        * In addition to collecting mouse dpi data in the udev
          hardware database, there's now support for collecting angle
          information for mouse scroll wheels. The database is
          supposed to guarantee similar scrolling behavior on mice
          that it knows about. There's also support for collecting
          information about Touchpad types.

        * udev's input_id built-in will now also collect touch screen
          dimension data and attach it to probed devices.

        * /etc/os-release gained support for a Distribution Privacy
          Policy link field.

        * networkd gained support for creating "ipvlan", "gretap",
          "ip6gre", "ip6gretap" and "ip6tnl" network devices.

        * systemd-tmpfiles gained support for "a" lines for setting
          ACLs on files.

        * systemd-nspawn will now mount /tmp in the container to
          tmpfs, automatically.

        * systemd now exposes the memory.usage_in_bytes cgroup
          attribute and shows it for each service in the "systemctl
          status" output, if available.

        * When the user presses Ctrl-Alt-Del more than 7x within 2s an
          immediate reboot is triggered. This useful if shutdown is
          hung and is unable to complete, to expedite the
          operation. Note that this kind of reboot will still unmount
          all file systems, and hence should not result in fsck being
          run on next reboot.

        * A .device unit for an optical block device will now be
          considered active only when a medium is in the drive. Also,
          mount units are now bound to their backing devices thus
          triggering automatic unmounting when devices become
          unavailable. With this in place systemd will now
          automatically unmount left-over mounts when a CD-ROM is
          ejected or an USB stick is yanked from the system.

        * networkd-wait-online now has support for waiting for
          specific interfaces only (with globbing), and for giving up
          after a configurable timeout.

        * networkd now exits when idle. It will be automatically
          restarted as soon as interfaces show up, are removed or
          change state. networkd will stay around as long as there is
          at least one DHCP state machine or similar around, that keep
          it non-idle.

        * networkd may now configure IPv6 link-local addressing in
          addition to IPv4 link-local addressing.

        * The IPv6 "token" for use in SLAAC may now be configured for
          each .network interface in networkd.

        * Routes configured with networkd may now be assigned a scope
          in .network files.

        * networkd's [Match] sections now support globbing and lists
          of multiple space-separated matches per item.

        Contributions from: Alban Crequy, Alin Rauta, Andrey Chaser,
        Bastien Nocera, Bruno Bottazzini, Carlos Garnacho, Carlos
        Morata Castillo, Chris Atkinson, Chris J. Arges, Christian
        Kirbach, Christian Seiler, Christoph Brill, Colin Guthrie,
        Colin Walters, Cristian Rodríguez, Daniele Medri, Daniel Mack,
        Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Djalal Harouni, Erik Auerswald,
        Filipe Brandenburger, Frank Theile, Gabor Kelemen, Gabriel de
        Perthuis, Harald Hoyer, Hui Wang, Ivan Shapovalov, Jan
        Engelhardt, Jan Synacek, Jay Faulkner, Johannes Hölzl, Jonas
        Ådahl, Jonathan Boulle, Josef Andersson, Kay Sievers, Ken
        Werner, Lennart Poettering, Lucas De Marchi, Lukas Märdian,
        Lukas Nykryn, Lukasz Skalski, Luke Shumaker, Mantas Mikulėnas,
        Manuel Mendez, Marcel Holtmann, Marc Schmitzer, Marko
        Myllynen, Martin Pitt, Maxim Mikityanskiy, Michael Biebl,
        Michael Marineau, Michael Olbrich, Michal Schmidt, Mindaugas
        Baranauskas, Moez Bouhlel, Naveen Kumar, Patrik Flykt, Paul
        Martin, Peter Hutterer, Peter Mattern, Philippe De Swert,
        Piotr Drąg, Rafael Ferreira, Rami Rosen, Robert Milasan, Ronny
        Chevalier, Sangjung Woo, Sebastien Bacher, Sergey Ptashnick,
        Shawn Landden, Stéphane Graber, Susant Sahani, Sylvain
        Plantefève, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tim JP, Tom
        Gundersen, Topi Miettinen, Torstein Husebø, Umut Tezduyar
        Lindskog, Veres Lajos, Vincent Batts, WaLyong Cho, Wieland
        Hoffmann, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2015-02-16

CHANGES WITH 218:

        * When querying unit file enablement status (for example via
          "systemctl is-enabled"), a new state "indirect" is now known
          which indicates that a unit might not be enabled itself, but
          another unit listed in its Also= setting might be.

        * Similar to the various existing ConditionXYZ= settings for
          units, there are now matching AssertXYZ= settings. While
          failing conditions cause a unit to be skipped, but its job
          to succeed, failing assertions declared like this will cause
          a unit start operation and its job to fail.

        * hostnamed now knows a new chassis type "embedded".

        * systemctl gained a new "edit" command. When used on a unit
          file, this allows extending unit files with .d/ drop-in
          configuration snippets or editing the full file (after
          copying it from /usr/lib to /etc). This will invoke the
          user's editor (as configured with $EDITOR), and reload the
          modified configuration after editing.

        * "systemctl status" now shows the suggested enablement state
          for a unit, as declared in the (usually vendor-supplied)
          system preset files.

        * nss-myhostname will now resolve the single-label host name
          "gateway" to the locally configured default IP routing
          gateways, ordered by their metrics. This assigns a stable
          name to the used gateways, regardless which ones are
          currently configured. Note that the name will only be
          resolved after all other name sources (if nss-myhostname is
          configured properly) and should hence not negatively impact
          systems that use the single-label host name "gateway" in
          other contexts.

        * systemd-inhibit now allows filtering by mode when listing
          inhibitors.

        * Scope and service units gained a new "Delegate" boolean
          property, which, when set, allows processes running inside the
          unit to further partition resources. This is primarily
          useful for systemd user instances as well as container
          managers.

        * journald will now pick up audit messages directly from
          the kernel, and log them like any other log message. The
          audit fields are split up and fully indexed. This means that
          journalctl in many ways is now a (nicer!) alternative to
          ausearch, the traditional audit client. Note that this
          implements only a minimal audit client. If you want the
          special audit modes like reboot-on-log-overflow, please use
          the traditional auditd instead, which can be used in
          parallel to journald.

        * The ConditionSecurity= unit file option now understands the
          special string "audit" to check whether auditing is
          available.

        * journalctl gained two new commands --vacuum-size= and
          --vacuum-time= to delete old journal files until the
          remaining ones take up no more than the specified size on disk,
          or are not older than the specified time.

        * A new, native PPPoE library has been added to sd-network,
          systemd's library of light-weight networking protocols. This
          library will be used in a future version of networkd to
          enable PPPoE communication without an external pppd daemon.

        * The busctl tool now understands a new "capture" verb that
          works similar to "monitor", but writes a packet capture
          trace to STDOUT that can be redirected to a file which is
          compatible with libcap's capture file format. This can then
          be loaded in Wireshark and similar tools to inspect bus
          communication.

        * The busctl tool now understands a new "tree" verb that shows
          the object trees of a specific service on the bus, or of all
          services.

        * The busctl tool now understands a new "introspect" verb that
          shows all interfaces and members of objects on the bus,
          including their signature and values. This is particularly
          useful to get more information about bus objects shown by
          the new "busctl tree" command.

        * The busctl tool now understands new verbs "call",
          "set-property" and "get-property" for invoking bus method
          calls, setting and getting bus object properties in a
          friendly way.

        * busctl gained a new --augment-creds= argument that controls
          whether the tool shall augment credential information it
          gets from the bus with data from /proc, in a possibly
          race-ful way.

        * nspawn's --link-journal= switch gained two new values
          "try-guest" and "try-host" that work like "guest" and
          "host", but do not fail if the host has no persistent
          journalling enabled. -j is now equivalent to
          --link-journal=try-guest.

        * macvlan network devices created by nspawn will now have
          stable MAC addresses.

        * A new SmackProcessLabel= unit setting has been added, which
          controls the SMACK security label processes forked off by
          the respective unit shall use.

        * If compiled with --enable-xkbcommon, systemd-localed will
          verify x11 keymap settings by compiling the given keymap. It
          will spew out warnings if the compilation fails. This
          requires libxkbcommon to be installed.

        * When a coredump is collected, a larger number of metadata
          fields is now collected and included in the journal records
          created for it. More specifically, control group membership,
          environment variables, memory maps, working directory,
          chroot directory, /proc/$PID/status, and a list of open file
          descriptors is now stored in the log entry.

        * The udev hwdb now contains DPI information for mice. For
          details see:

          http://who-t.blogspot.de/2014/12/building-a-dpi-database-for-mice.html

        * All systemd programs that read standalone configuration
          files in /etc now also support a corresponding series of
          .conf.d configuration directories in /etc/, /run/,
          /usr/local/lib/, /usr/lib/, and (if configured with
          --enable-split-usr) /lib/.  In particular, the following
          configuration files now have corresponding configuration
          directories: system.conf user.conf, logind.conf,
          journald.conf, sleep.conf, bootchart.conf, coredump.conf,
          resolved.conf, timesyncd.conf, journal-remote.conf, and
          journal-upload.conf.  Note that distributions should use the
          configuration directories in /usr/lib/; the directories in
          /etc/ are reserved for the system administrator.

        * systemd-rfkill will no longer take the rfkill device name
          into account when storing rfkill state on disk, as the name
          might be dynamically assigned and not stable. Instead, the
          ID_PATH udev variable combined with the rfkill type (wlan,
          bluetooth, ...) is used.

        * A new service systemd-machine-id-commit.service has been
          added. When used on systems where /etc is read-only during
          boot, and /etc/machine-id is not initialized (but an empty
          file), this service will copy the temporary machine ID
          created as replacement into /etc after the system is fully
          booted up. This is useful for systems that are freshly
          installed with a non-initialized machine ID, but should get
          a fixed machine ID for subsequent boots.

        * networkd's .netdev files now provide a large set of
          configuration parameters for VXLAN devices. Similarly, the
          bridge port cost parameter is now configurable in .network
          files. There's also new support for configuring IP source
          routing. networkd .link files gained support for a new
          OriginalName= match that is useful to match against the
          original interface name the kernel assigned. .network files
          may include MTU= and MACAddress= fields for altering the MTU
          and MAC address while being connected to a specific network
          interface.

        * The LUKS logic gained supported for configuring
          UUID-specific key files. There's also new support for naming
          LUKS device from the kernel command line, using the new
          luks.name= argument.

        * Timer units may now be transiently created via the bus API
          (this was previously already available for scope and service
          units). In addition it is now possible to create multiple
          transient units at the same time with a single bus call. The
          "systemd-run" tool has been updated to make use of this for
          running commands on a specified time, in at(1)-style.

        * tmpfiles gained support for "t" lines, for assigning
          extended attributes to files. Among other uses this may be
          used to assign SMACK labels to files.

        Contributions from: Alin Rauta, Alison Chaiken, Andrej
        Manduch, Bastien Nocera, Chris Atkinson, Chris Leech, Chris
        Mayo, Colin Guthrie, Colin Walters, Cristian Rodríguez,
        Daniele Medri, Daniel Mack, Dan Williams, Dan Winship, Dave
        Reisner, David Herrmann, Didier Roche, Felipe Sateler, Gavin
        Li, Hans de Goede, Harald Hoyer, Iago López Galeiras, Ivan
        Shapovalov, Jakub Filak, Jan Janssen, Jan Synacek, Joe
        Lawrence, Josh Triplett, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering,
        Lukas Nykryn, Łukasz Stelmach, Maciej Wereski, Mantas
        Mikulėnas, Marcel Holtmann, Martin Pitt, Maurizio Lombardi,
        Michael Biebl, Michael Chapman, Michael Marineau, Michal
        Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Olivier Brunel, Patrik Flykt, Peter
        Hutterer, Przemyslaw Kedzierski, Rami Rosen, Ray Strode,
        Richard Schütz, Richard W.M. Jones, Ronny Chevalier, Ross
        Lagerwall, Sean Young, Stanisław Pitucha, Susant Sahani,
        Thomas Haller, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen,
        Torstein Husebø, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Vicente Olivert
        Riera, WaLyong Cho, Wesley Dawson, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-12-10

CHANGES WITH 217:

        * journalctl gained the new options -t/--identifier= to match
          on the syslog identifier (aka "tag"), as well as --utc to
          show log timestamps in the UTC timezone. journalctl now also
          accepts -n/--lines=all to disable line capping in a pager.

        * journalctl gained a new switch, --flush, that synchronously
          flushes logs from /run/log/journal to /var/log/journal if
          persistent storage is enabled. systemd-journal-flush.service
          now waits until the operation is complete.

        * Services can notify the manager before they start a reload
          (by sending RELOADING=1) or shutdown (by sending
          STOPPING=1). This allows the manager to track and show the
          internal state of daemons and closes a race condition when
          the process is still running but has closed its D-Bus
          connection.

        * Services with Type=oneshot do not have to have any ExecStart
          commands anymore.

        * User units are now loaded also from
          $XDG_RUNTIME_DIR/systemd/user/. This is similar to the
          /run/systemd/user directory that was already previously
          supported, but is under the control of the user.

        * Job timeouts (i.e. time-outs on the time a job that is
          queued stays in the run queue) can now optionally result in
          immediate reboot or power-off actions (JobTimeoutAction= and
          JobTimeoutRebootArgument=). This is useful on ".target"
          units, to limit the maximum time a target remains
          undispatched in the run queue, and to trigger an emergency
          operation in such a case. This is now used by default to
          turn off the system if boot-up (as defined by everything in
          basic.target) hangs and does not complete for at least
          15min. Also, if power-off or reboot hang for at least 30min
          an immediate power-off/reboot operation is triggered. This
          functionality is particularly useful to increase reliability
          on embedded devices, but also on laptops which might
          accidentally get powered on when carried in a backpack and
          whose boot stays stuck in a hard disk encryption passphrase
          question.

        * systemd-logind can be configured to also handle lid switch
          events even when the machine is docked or multiple displays
          are attached (HandleLidSwitchDocked= option).

        * A helper binary and a service have been added which can be
          used to resume from hibernation in the initramfs. A
          generator will parse the resume= option on the kernel
          command line to trigger resume.

        * A user console daemon systemd-consoled has been
          added. Currently, it is a preview, and will so far open a
          single terminal on each session of the user marked as
          Desktop=systemd-console.

        * Route metrics can be specified for DHCP routes added by
          systemd-networkd.

        * The SELinux context of socket-activated services can be set
          from the information provided by the networking stack
          (SELinuxContextFromNet= option).

        * Userspace firmware loading support has been removed and
          the minimum supported kernel version is thus bumped to 3.7.

        * Timeout for udev workers has been increased from 1 to 3
          minutes, but a warning will be printed after 1 minute to
          help diagnose kernel modules that take a long time to load.

        * Udev rules can now remove tags on devices with TAG-="foobar".

        * systemd's readahead implementation has been removed. In many
          circumstances it didn't give expected benefits even for
          rotational disk drives and was becoming less relevant in the
          age of SSDs. As none of the developers has been using
          rotating media anymore, and nobody stepped up to actively
          maintain this component of systemd it has now been removed.

        * Swap units can use Options= to specify discard options.
          Discard options specified for swaps in /etc/fstab are now
          respected.

        * Docker containers are now detected as a separate type of
          virtualization.

        * The Password Agent protocol gained support for queries where
          the user input is shown, useful e.g. for user names.
          systemd-ask-password gained a new --echo option to turn that
          on.

        * The default sysctl.d/ snippets will now set:

                net.core.default_qdisc = fq_codel

          This selects Fair Queuing Controlled Delay as the default
          queuing discipline for network interfaces. fq_codel helps
          fight the network bufferbloat problem. It is believed to be
          a good default with no tuning required for most workloads.
          Downstream distributions may override this choice. On 10Gbit
          servers that do not do forwarding, "fq" may perform better.
          Systems without a good clocksource should use "pfifo_fast".

        * If kdbus is enabled during build a new option BusPolicy= is
          available for service units, that allows locking all service
          processes into a stricter bus policy, in order to limit
          access to various bus services, or even hide most of them
          from the service's view entirely.

        * networkctl will now show the .network and .link file
          networkd has applied to a specific interface.

        * sd-login gained a new API call sd_session_get_desktop() to
          query which desktop environment has been selected for a
          session.

        * UNIX utmp support is now compile-time optional to support
          legacy-free systems.

        * systemctl gained two new commands "add-wants" and
          "add-requires" for pulling in units from specific targets
          easily.

        * If the word "rescue" is specified on the kernel command line
          the system will now boot into rescue mode (aka
          rescue.target), which was previously available only by
          specifying "1" or "systemd.unit=rescue.target" on the kernel
          command line. This new kernel command line option nicely
          mirrors the already existing "emergency" kernel command line
          option.

        * New kernel command line options mount.usr=, mount.usrflags=,
          mount.usrfstype= have been added that match root=, rootflags=,
          rootfstype= but allow mounting a specific file system to
          /usr.

        * The $NOTIFY_SOCKET is now also passed to control processes of
          services, not only the main process.

        * This version reenables support for fsck's -l switch. This
          means at least version v2.25 of util-linux is required for
          operation, otherwise dead-locks on device nodes may
          occur. Again: you need to update util-linux to at least
          v2.25 when updating systemd to v217.

        * The "multi-seat-x" tool has been removed from systemd, as
          its functionality has been integrated into X servers 1.16,
          and the tool is hence redundant. It is recommended to update
          display managers invoking this tool to simply invoke X
          directly from now on, again.

        * Support for the new ALLOW_INTERACTIVE_AUTHORIZATION D-Bus
          message flag has been added for all of systemd's PolicyKit
          authenticated method calls has been added. In particular
          this now allows optional interactive authorization via
          PolicyKit for many of PID1's privileged operations such as
          unit file enabling and disabling.

        * "udevadm hwdb --update" learnt a new switch "--usr" for
          placing the rebuilt hardware database in /usr instead of
          /etc. When used only hardware database entries stored in
          /usr will be used, and any user database entries in /etc are
          ignored. This functionality is useful for vendors to ship a
          pre-built database on systems where local configuration is
          unnecessary or unlikely.

        * Calendar time specifications in .timer units now also
          understand the strings "semi-annually", "quarterly" and
          "minutely" as shortcuts (in addition to the preexisting
          "anually", "hourly", ...).

        * systemd-tmpfiles will now correctly create files in /dev
          at boot which are marked for creation only at boot. It is
          recommended to always create static device nodes with 'c!'
          and 'b!', so that they are created only at boot and not
          overwritten at runtime.

        * When the watchdog logic is used for a service (WatchdogSec=)
          and the watchdog timeout is hit the service will now be
          terminated with SIGABRT (instead of just SIGTERM), in order
          to make sure a proper coredump and backtrace is
          generated. This ensures that hanging services will result in
          similar coredump/backtrace behaviour as services that hit a
          segmentation fault.

        Contributions from: Andreas Henriksson, Andrei Borzenkov,
        Angus Gibson, Ansgar Burchardt, Ben Wolsieffer, Brandon L.
        Black, Christian Hesse, Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Buch,
        Daniele Medri, Daniel Mack, Dan Williams, Dave Reisner, David
        Herrmann, David Sommerseth, David Strauss, Emil Renner
        Berthing, Eric Cook, Evangelos Foutras, Filipe Brandenburger,
        Gustavo Sverzut Barbieri, Hans de Goede, Harald Hoyer, Hristo
        Venev, Hugo Grostabussiat, Ivan Shapovalov, Jan Janssen, Jan
        Synacek, Jonathan Liu, Juho Son, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers, Klaus
        Purer, Koen Kooi, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Lukasz
        Skalski, Łukasz Stelmach, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marcel Holtmann,
        Marius Tessmann, Marko Myllynen, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl,
        Michael Marineau, Michael Olbrich, Michael Scherer, Michal
        Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Miroslav Lichvar, Patrik Flykt,
        Philippe De Swert, Piotr Drąg, Rahul Sundaram, Richard
        Weinberger, Robert Milasan, Ronny Chevalier, Ruben Kerkhof,
        Santiago Vila, Sergey Ptashnick, Simon McVittie, Sjoerd
        Simons, Stefan Brüns, Steven Allen, Steven Noonan, Susant
        Sahani, Sylvain Plantefève, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen,
        Timofey Titovets, Tobias Hunger, Tom Gundersen, Torstein
        Husebø, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, WaLyong Cho, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-10-28

CHANGES WITH 216:

        * timedated no longer reads NTP implementation unit names from
          /usr/lib/systemd/ntp-units.d/*.list. Alternative NTP
          implementations should add a

            Conflicts=systemd-timesyncd.service

          to their unit files to take over and replace systemd's NTP
          default functionality.

        * systemd-sysusers gained a new line type "r" for configuring
          which UID/GID ranges to allocate system users/groups
          from. Lines of type "u" may now add an additional column
          that specifies the home directory for the system user to be
          created. Also, systemd-sysusers may now optionally read user
          information from STDIN instead of a file. This is useful for
          invoking it from RPM preinst scriptlets that need to create
          users before the first RPM file is installed since these
          files might need to be owned by them. A new
          %sysusers_create_inline RPM macro has been introduced to do
          just that. systemd-sysusers now updates the shadow files as
          well as the user/group databases, which should enhance
          compatibility with certain tools like grpck.

        * A number of bus APIs of PID 1 now optionally consult
          PolicyKit to permit access for otherwise unprivileged
          clients under certain conditions. Note that this currently
          doesn't support interactive authentication yet, but this is
          expected to be added eventually, too.

        * /etc/machine-info now has new fields for configuring the
          deployment environment of the machine, as well as the
          location of the machine. hostnamectl has been updated with
          new command to update these fields.

        * systemd-timesyncd has been updated to automatically acquire
          NTP server information from systemd-networkd, which might
          have been discovered via DHCP.

        * systemd-resolved now includes a caching DNS stub resolver
          and a complete LLMNR name resolution implementation. A new
          NSS module "nss-resolve" has been added which can be used
          instead of glibc's own "nss-dns" to resolve hostnames via
          systemd-resolved. Hostnames, addresses and arbitrary RRs may
          be resolved via systemd-resolved D-Bus APIs. In contrast to
          the glibc internal resolver systemd-resolved is aware of
          multi-homed system, and keeps DNS server and caches separate
          and per-interface. Queries are sent simultaneously on all
          interfaces that have DNS servers configured, in order to
          properly handle VPNs and local LANs which might resolve
          separate sets of domain names. systemd-resolved may acquire
          DNS server information from systemd-networkd automatically,
          which in turn might have discovered them via DHCP. A tool
          "systemd-resolve-host" has been added that may be used to
          query the DNS logic in resolved. systemd-resolved implements
          IDNA and automatically uses IDNA or UTF-8 encoding depending
          on whether classic DNS or LLMNR is used as transport. In the
          next releases we intend to add a DNSSEC and mDNS/DNS-SD
          implementation to systemd-resolved.

        * A new NSS module nss-mymachines has been added, that
          automatically resolves the names of all local registered
          containers to their respective IP addresses.

        * A new client tool "networkctl" for systemd-networkd has been
          added. It currently is entirely passive and will query
          networking configuration from udev, rtnetlink and networkd,
          and present it to the user in a very friendly
          way. Eventually, we hope to extend it to become a full
          control utility for networkd.

        * .socket units gained a new DeferAcceptSec= setting that
          controls the kernels' TCP_DEFER_ACCEPT sockopt for
          TCP. Similarly, support for controlling TCP keep-alive
          settings has been added (KeepAliveTimeSec=,
          KeepAliveIntervalSec=, KeepAliveProbes=). Also, support for
          turning off Nagle's algorithm on TCP has been added
          (NoDelay=).

        * logind learned a new session type "web", for use in projects
          like Cockpit which register web clients as PAM sessions.

        * timer units with at least one OnCalendar= setting will now
          be started only after timer-sync.target has been
          reached. This way they will not elapse before the system
          clock has been corrected by a local NTP client or
          similar. This is particular useful on RTC-less embedded
          machines, that come up with an invalid system clock.

        * systemd-nspawn's --network-veth= switch should now result in
          stable MAC addresses for both the outer and the inner side
          of the link.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --volatile= switch for running
          container instances with /etc or /var unpopulated.

        * The kdbus client code has been updated to use the new Linux
          3.17 memfd subsystem instead of the old kdbus-specific one.

        * systemd-networkd's DHCP client and server now support
          FORCERENEW. There are also new configuration options to
          configure the vendor client identifier and broadcast mode
          for DHCP.

        * systemd will no longer inform the kernel about the current
          timezone, as this is necessarily incorrect and racy as the
          kernel has no understanding of DST and similar
          concepts. This hence means FAT timestamps will be always
          considered UTC, similar to what Android is already
          doing. Also, when the RTC is configured to the local time
          (rather than UTC) systemd will never synchronize back to it,
          as this might confuse Windows at a later boot.

        * systemd-analyze gained a new command "verify" for offline
          validation of unit files.

        * systemd-networkd gained support for a couple of additional
          settings for bonding networking setups. Also, the metric for
          statically configured routes may now be configured. For
          network interfaces where this is appropriate the peer IP
          address may now be configured.

        * systemd-networkd's DHCP client will no longer request
          broadcasting by default, as this tripped up some networks.
          For hardware where broadcast is required the feature should
          be switched back on using RequestBroadcast=yes.

        * systemd-networkd will now set up IPv4LL addresses (when
          enabled) even if DHCP is configured successfully.

        * udev will now default to respect network device names given
          by the kernel when the kernel indicates that these are
          predictable. This behavior can be tweaked by changing
          NamePolicy= in the relevant .link file.

        * A new library systemd-terminal has been added that
          implements full TTY stream parsing and rendering. This
          library is supposed to be used later on for implementing a
          full userspace VT subsystem, replacing the current kernel
          implementation.

        * A new tool systemd-journal-upload has been added to push
          journal data to a remote system running
          systemd-journal-remote.

        * journald will no longer forward all local data to another
          running syslog daemon. This change has been made because
          rsyslog (which appears to be the most commonly used syslog
          implementation these days) no longer makes use of this, and
          instead pulls the data out of the journal on its own. Since
          forwarding the messages to a non-existent syslog server is
          more expensive than we assumed we have now turned this
          off. If you run a syslog server that is not a recent rsyslog
          version, you have to turn this option on again
          (ForwardToSyslog= in journald.conf).

        * journald now optionally supports the LZ4 compressor for
          larger journal fields. This compressor should perform much
          better than XZ which was the previous default.

        * machinectl now shows the IP addresses of local containers,
          if it knows them, plus the interface name of the container.

        * A new tool "systemd-escape" has been added that makes it
          easy to escape strings to build unit names and similar.

        * sd_notify() messages may now include a new ERRNO= field
          which is parsed and collected by systemd and shown among the
          "systemctl status" output for a service.

        * A new component "systemd-firstboot" has been added that
          queries the most basic systemd information (timezone,
          hostname, root password) interactively on first
          boot. Alternatively it may also be used to provision these
          things offline on OS images installed into directories.

        * The default sysctl.d/ snippets will now set

                net.ipv4.conf.default.promote_secondaries=1

          This has the benefit of no flushing secondary IP addresses
          when primary addresses are removed.

        Contributions from: Ansgar Burchardt, Bastien Nocera, Colin
        Walters, Dan Dedrick, Daniel Buch, Daniel Korostil, Daniel
        Mack, Dan Williams, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Denis
        Kenzior, Eelco Dolstra, Eric Cook, Hannes Reinecke, Harald
        Hoyer, Hong Shick Pak, Hui Wang, Jean-André Santoni, Jóhann
        B. Guðmundsson, Jon Severinsson, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers, Kevin
        Wells, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas,
        Marc-Antoine Perennou, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael
        Marineau, Michael Olbrich, Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar,
        Miguel Angel Ajo, Mike Gilbert, Olivier Brunel, Robert
        Schiele, Ronny Chevalier, Simon McVittie, Sjoerd Simons, Stef
        Walter, Steven Noonan, Susant Sahani, Tanu Kaskinen, Thomas
        Blume, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Timofey Titovets,
        Tobias Geerinckx-Rice, Tomasz Torcz, Tom Gundersen, Umut
        Tezduyar Lindskog, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-08-19

CHANGES WITH 215:

        * A new tool systemd-sysusers has been added. This tool
          creates system users and groups in /etc/passwd and
          /etc/group, based on static declarative system user/group
          definitions in /usr/lib/sysusers.d/. This is useful to
          enable factory resets and volatile systems that boot up with
          an empty /etc directory, and thus need system users and
          groups created during early boot. systemd now also ships
          with two default sysusers.d/ files for the most basic
          users and groups systemd and the core operating system
          require.

        * A new tmpfiles snippet has been added that rebuilds the
          essential files in /etc on boot, should they be missing.

        * A directive for ensuring automatic clean-up of
          /var/cache/man/ has been removed from the default
          configuration. This line should now be shipped by the man
          implementation. The necessary change has been made to the
          man-db implementation. Note that you need to update your man
          implementation to one that ships this line, otherwise no
          automatic clean-up of /var/cache/man will take place.

        * A new condition ConditionNeedsUpdate= has been added that
          may conditionalize services to only run when /etc or /var
          are "older" than the vendor operating system resources in
          /usr. This is useful for reconstructing or updating /etc
          after an offline update of /usr or a factory reset, on the
          next reboot. Services that want to run once after such an
          update or reset should use this condition and order
          themselves before the new systemd-update-done.service, which
          will mark the two directories as fully updated. A number of
          service files have been added making use of this, to rebuild
          the udev hardware database, the journald message catalog and
          dynamic loader cache (ldconfig). The systemd-sysusers tool
          described above also makes use of this now. With this in
          place it is now possible to start up a minimal operating
          system with /etc empty cleanly. For more information on the
          concepts involved see this recent blog story:

          http://0pointer.de/blog/projects/stateless.html

        * A new system group "input" has been introduced, and all
          input device nodes get this group assigned. This is useful
          for system-level software to get access to input devices. It
          complements what is already done for "audio" and "video".

        * systemd-networkd learnt minimal DHCPv4 server support in
          addition to the existing DHCPv4 client support. It also
          learnt DHCPv6 client and IPv6 Router Solicitation client
          support. The DHCPv4 client gained support for static routes
          passed in from the server. Note that the [DHCPv4] section
          known in older systemd-networkd versions has been renamed to
          [DHCP] and is now also used by the DHCPv6 client. Existing
          .network files using settings of this section should be
          updated, though compatibility is maintained. Optionally, the
          client hostname may now be sent to the DHCP server.

        * networkd gained support for vxlan virtual networks as well
          as tun/tap and dummy devices.

        * networkd gained support for automatic allocation of address
          ranges for interfaces from a system-wide pool of
          addresses. This is useful for dynamically managing a large
          number of interfaces with a single network configuration
          file. In particular this is useful to easily assign
          appropriate IP addresses to the veth links of a large number
          of nspawn instances.

        * RPM macros for processing sysusers, sysctl and binfmt
          drop-in snippets at package installation time have been
          added.

        * The /etc/os-release file should now be placed in
          /usr/lib/os-release. The old location is automatically
          created as symlink. /usr/lib is the more appropriate
          location of this file, since it shall actually describe the
          vendor operating system shipped in /usr, and not the
          configuration stored in /etc.

        * .mount units gained a new boolean SloppyOptions= setting
          that maps to mount(8)'s -s option which enables permissive
          parsing of unknown mount options.

        * tmpfiles learnt a new "L+" directive which creates a symlink
          but (unlike "L") deletes a pre-existing file first, should
          it already exist and not already be the correct
          symlink. Similarly, "b+", "c+" and "p+" directives have been
          added as well, which create block and character devices, as
          well as fifos in the filesystem, possibly removing any
          pre-existing files of different types.

        * For tmpfiles' "L", "L+", "C" and "C+" directives the final
          'argument' field (which so far specified the source to
          symlink/copy the files from) is now optional. If omitted the
          same file os copied from /usr/share/factory/ suffixed by the
          full destination path. This is useful for populating /etc
          with essential files, by copying them from vendor defaults
          shipped in /usr/share/factory/etc.

        * A new command "systemctl preset-all" has been added that
          applies the service preset settings to all installed unit
          files. A new switch --preset-mode= has been added that
          controls whether only enable or only disable operations
          shall be executed.

        * A new command "systemctl is-system-running" has been added
          that allows checking the overall state of the system, for
          example whether it is fully up and running.

        * When the system boots up with an empty /etc, the equivalent
          to "systemctl preset-all" is executed during early boot, to
          make sure all default services are enabled after a factory
          reset.

        * systemd now contains a minimal preset file that enables the
          most basic services systemd ships by default.

        * Unit files' [Install] section gained a new DefaultInstance=
          field for defining the default instance to create if a
          template unit is enabled with no instance specified.

        * A new passive target cryptsetup-pre.target has been added
          that may be used by services that need to make they run and
          finish before the first LUKS cryptographic device is set up.

        * The /dev/loop-control and /dev/btrfs-control device nodes
          are now owned by the "disk" group by default, opening up
          access to this group.

        * systemd-coredump will now automatically generate a
          stack trace of all core dumps taking place on the system,
          based on elfutils' libdw library. This stack trace is logged
          to the journal.

        * systemd-coredump may now optionally store coredumps directly
          on disk (in /var/lib/systemd/coredump, possibly compressed),
          instead of storing them unconditionally in the journal. This
          mode is the new default. A new configuration file
          /etc/systemd/coredump.conf has been added to configure this
          and other parameters of systemd-coredump.

        * coredumpctl gained a new "info" verb to show details about a
          specific coredump. A new switch "-1" has also been added
          that makes sure to only show information about the most
          recent entry instead of all entries. Also, as the tool is
          generally useful now the "systemd-" prefix of the binary
          name has been removed. Distributions that want to maintain
          compatibility with the old name should add a symlink from
          the old name to the new name.

        * journald's SplitMode= now defaults to "uid". This makes sure
          that unprivileged users can access their own coredumps with
          coredumpctl without restrictions.

        * New kernel command line options "systemd.wants=" (for
          pulling an additional unit during boot), "systemd.mask="
          (for masking a specific unit for the boot), and
          "systemd.debug-shell" (for enabling the debug shell on tty9)
          have been added. This is implemented in the new generator
          "systemd-debug-generator".

        * systemd-nspawn will now by default filter a couple of
          syscalls for containers, among them those required for
          kernel module loading, direct x86 IO port access, swap
          management, and kexec. Most importantly though
          open_by_handle_at() is now prohibited for containers,
          closing a hole similar to a recently discussed vulnerability
          in docker regarding access to files on file hierarchies the
          container should normally not have access to. Note that, for
          nspawn, we generally make no security claims anyway (and
          this is explicitly documented in the man page), so this is
          just a fix for one of the most obvious problems.

        * A new man page file-hierarchy(7) has been added that
          contains a minimized, modernized version of the file system
          layout systemd expects, similar in style to the FHS
          specification or hier(5). A new tool systemd-path(1) has
          been added to query many of these paths for the local
          machine and user.

        * Automatic time-based clean-up of $XDG_RUNTIME_DIR is no
          longer done. Since the directory now has a per-user size
          limit, and is cleaned on logout this appears unnecessary,
          in particular since this now brings the lifecycle of this
          directory closer in line with how IPC objects are handled.

        * systemd.pc now exports a number of additional directories,
          including $libdir (which is useful to identify the library
          path for the primary architecture of the system), and a
          couple of drop-in directories.

        * udev's predictable network interface names now use the dev_port
          sysfs attribute, introduced in linux 3.15 instead of dev_id to
          distinguish between ports of the same PCI function. dev_id should
          only be used for ports using the same HW address, hence the need
          for dev_port.

        * machined has been updated to export the OS version of a
          container (read from /etc/os-release and
          /usr/lib/os-release) on the bus. This is now shown in
          "machinectl status" for a machine.

        * A new service setting RestartForceExitStatus= has been
          added. If configured to a set of exit signals or process
          return values, the service will be restarted when the main
          daemon process exits with any of them, regardless of the
          Restart= setting.

        * systemctl's -H switch for connecting to remote systemd
          machines has been extended so that it may be used to
          directly connect to a specific container on the
          host. "systemctl -H root@foobar:waldi" will now connect as
          user "root" to host "foobar", and then proceed directly to
          the container named "waldi". Note that currently you have to
          authenticate as user "root" for this to work, as entering
          containers is a privileged operation.

        Contributions from: Andreas Henriksson, Benjamin Steinwender,
        Carl Schaefer, Christian Hesse, Colin Ian King, Cristian
        Rodríguez, Daniel Mack, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Eugene
        Yakubovich, Filipe Brandenburger, Frederic Crozat, Hristo
        Venev, Jan Engelhardt, Jonathan Boulle, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Luke Shumaker, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marc-Antoine
        Perennou, Marcel Holtmann, Michael Marineau, Michael Olbrich,
        Michał Bartoszkiewicz, Michal Sekletar, Patrik Flykt, Ronan Le
        Martret, Ronny Chevalier, Ruediger Oertel, Steven Noonan,
        Susant Sahani, Thadeu Lima de Souza Cascardo, Thomas Hindoe
        Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Tom Hirst, Umut Tezduyar
        Lindskog, Uoti Urpala, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-07-03

CHANGES WITH 214:

        * As an experimental feature, udev now tries to lock the
          disk device node (flock(LOCK_SH|LOCK_NB)) while it
          executes events for the disk or any of its partitions.
          Applications like partitioning programs can lock the
          disk device node (flock(LOCK_EX)) and claim temporary
          device ownership that way; udev will entirely skip all event
          handling for this disk and its partitions. If the disk
          was opened for writing, the close will trigger a partition
          table rescan in udev's "watch" facility, and if needed
          synthesize "change" events for the disk and all its partitions.
          This is now unconditionally enabled, and if it turns out to
          cause major problems, we might turn it on only for specific
          devices, or might need to disable it entirely. Device Mapper
          devices are excluded from this logic.

        * We temporarily dropped the "-l" switch for fsck invocations,
          since they collide with the flock() logic above. util-linux
          upstream has been changed already to avoid this conflict,
          and we will readd "-l" as soon as util-linux with this
          change has been released.

        * The dependency on libattr has been removed. Since a long
          time, the extended attribute calls have moved to glibc, and
          libattr is thus unnecessary.

        * Virtualization detection works without priviliges now. This
          means the systemd-detect-virt binary no longer requires
          CAP_SYS_PTRACE file capabilities, and our daemons can run
          with fewer privileges.

        * systemd-networkd now runs under its own "systemd-network"
          user. It retains the CAP_NET_ADMIN, CAP_NET_BIND_SERVICE,
          CAP_NET_BROADCAST, CAP_NET_RAW capabilities though, but
          loses the ability to write to files owned by root this way.

        * Similarly, systemd-resolved now runs under its own
          "systemd-resolve" user with no capabilities remaining.

        * Similarly, systemd-bus-proxyd now runs under its own
          "systemd-bus-proxy" user with only CAP_IPC_OWNER remaining.

        * systemd-networkd gained support for setting up "veth"
          virtual Ethernet devices for container connectivity, as well
          as GRE and VTI tunnels.

        * systemd-networkd will no longer automatically attempt to
          manually load kernel modules necessary for certain tunnel
          transports. Instead, it is assumed the kernel loads them
          automatically when required. This only works correctly on
          very new kernels. On older kernels, please consider adding
          the kernel modules to /etc/modules-load.d/ as a work-around.

        * The resolv.conf file systemd-resolved generates has been
          moved to /run/systemd/resolve/. If you have a symlink from
          /etc/resolv.conf, it might be necessary to correct it.

        * Two new service settings, ProtectHome= and ProtectSystem=,
          have been added. When enabled, they will make the user data
          (such as /home) inaccessible or read-only and the system
          (such as /usr) read-only, for specific services. This allows
          very light-weight per-service sandboxing to avoid
          modifications of user data or system files from
          services. These two new switches have been enabled for all
          of systemd's long-running services, where appropriate.

        * Socket units gained new SocketUser= and SocketGroup=
          settings to set the owner user and group of AF_UNIX sockets
          and FIFOs in the file system.

        * Socket units gained a new RemoveOnStop= setting. If enabled,
          all FIFOS and sockets in the file system will be removed
          when the specific socket unit is stopped.

        * Socket units gained a new Symlinks= setting. It takes a list
          of symlinks to create to file system sockets or FIFOs
          created by the specific Unix sockets. This is useful to
          manage symlinks to socket nodes with the same life-cycle as
          the socket itself.

        * The /dev/log socket and /dev/initctl FIFO have been moved to
          /run, and have been replaced by symlinks. This allows
          connecting to these facilities even if PrivateDevices=yes is
          used for a service (which makes /dev/log itself unavailable,
          but /run is left). This also has the benefit of ensuring
          that /dev only contains device nodes, directories and
          symlinks, and nothing else.

        * sd-daemon gained two new calls sd_pid_notify() and
          sd_pid_notifyf(). They are similar to sd_notify() and
          sd_notifyf(), but allow overriding of the source PID of
          notification messages if permissions permit this. This is
          useful to send notify messages on behalf of a different
          process (for example, the parent process). The
          systemd-notify tool has been updated to make use of this
          when sending messages (so that notification messages now
          originate from the shell script invoking systemd-notify and
          not the systemd-notify process itself. This should minimize
          a race where systemd fails to associate notification
          messages to services when the originating process already
          vanished.

        * A new "on-abnormal" setting for Restart= has been added. If
          set, it will result in automatic restarts on all "abnormal"
          reasons for a process to exit, which includes unclean
          signals, core dumps, timeouts and watchdog timeouts, but
          does not include clean and unclean exit codes or clean
          signals. Restart=on-abnormal is an alternative for
          Restart=on-failure for services that shall be able to
          terminate and avoid restarts on certain errors, by
          indicating so with an unclean exit code. Restart=on-failure
          or Restart=on-abnormal is now the recommended setting for
          all long-running services.

        * If the InaccessibleDirectories= service setting points to a
          mount point (or if there are any submounts contained within
          it), it is now attempted to completely unmount it, to make
          the file systems truly unavailable for the respective
          service.

        * The ReadOnlyDirectories= service setting and
          systemd-nspawn's --read-only parameter are now recursively
          applied to all submounts, too.

        * Mount units may now be created transiently via the bus APIs.

        * The support for SysV and LSB init scripts has been removed
          from the systemd daemon itself. Instead, it is now
          implemented as a generator that creates native systemd units
          from these scripts when needed. This enables us to remove a
          substantial amount of legacy code from PID 1, following the
          fact that many distributions only ship a very small number
          of LSB/SysV init scripts nowadays.

        * Privileged Xen (dom0) domains are not considered
          virtualization anymore by the virtualization detection
          logic. After all, they generally have unrestricted access to
          the hardware and usually are used to manage the unprivileged
          (domU) domains.

        * systemd-tmpfiles gained a new "C" line type, for copying
          files or entire directories.

        * systemd-tmpfiles "m" lines are now fully equivalent to "z"
          lines. So far, they have been non-globbing versions of the
          latter, and have thus been redundant. In future, it is
          recommended to only use "z". "m" has hence been removed
          from the documentation, even though it stays supported.

        * A tmpfiles snippet to recreate the most basic structure in
          /var has been added. This is enough to create the /var/run →
          /run symlink and create a couple of structural
          directories. This allows systems to boot up with an empty or
          volatile /var. Of course, while with this change, the core OS
          now is capable with dealing with a volatile /var, not all
          user services are ready for it. However, we hope that sooner
          or later, many service daemons will be changed upstream so
          that they are able to automatically create their necessary
          directories in /var at boot, should they be missing. This is
          the first step to allow state-less systems that only require
          the vendor image for /usr to boot.

        * systemd-nspawn has gained a new --tmpfs= switch to mount an
          empty tmpfs instance to a specific directory. This is
          particularly useful for making use of the automatic
          reconstruction of /var (see above), by passing --tmpfs=/var.

        * Access modes specified in tmpfiles snippets may now be
          prefixed with "~", which indicates that they shall be masked
          by whether the existing file or directory is currently
          writable, readable or executable at all. Also, if specified,
          the sgid/suid/sticky bits will be masked for all
          non-directories.

        * A new passive target unit "network-pre.target" has been
          added which is useful for services that shall run before any
          network is configured, for example firewall scripts.

        * The "floppy" group that previously owned the /dev/fd*
          devices is no longer used. The "disk" group is now used
          instead. Distributions should probably deprecate usage of
          this group.

        Contributions from: Camilo Aguilar, Christian Hesse, Colin Ian
        King, Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Buch, Dave Reisner, David
        Strauss, Denis Tikhomirov, John, Jonathan Liu, Kay Sievers,
        Lennart Poettering, Mantas Mikulėnas, Mark Eichin, Ronny
        Chevalier, Susant Sahani, Thomas Blume, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel
        Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-06-11

CHANGES WITH 213:

        * A new "systemd-timesyncd" daemon has been added for
          synchronizing the system clock across the network. It
          implements an SNTP client. In contrast to NTP
          implementations such as chrony or the NTP reference server,
          this only implements a client side, and does not bother with
          the full NTP complexity, focusing only on querying time from
          one remote server and synchronizing the local clock to
          it. Unless you intend to serve NTP to networked clients or
          want to connect to local hardware clocks, this simple NTP
          client should be more than appropriate for most
          installations. The daemon runs with minimal privileges, and
          has been hooked up with networkd to only operate when
          network connectivity is available. The daemon saves the
          current clock to disk every time a new NTP sync has been
          acquired, and uses this to possibly correct the system clock
          early at bootup, in order to accommodate for systems that
          lack an RTC such as the Raspberry Pi and embedded devices,
          and to make sure that time monotonically progresses on these
          systems, even if it is not always correct. To make use of
          this daemon, a new system user and group "systemd-timesync"
          needs to be created on installation of systemd.

        * The queue "seqnum" interface of libudev has been disabled, as
          it was generally incompatible with device namespacing as
          sequence numbers of devices go "missing" if the devices are
          part of a different namespace.

        * "systemctl list-timers" and "systemctl list-sockets" gained
          a --recursive switch for showing units of these types also
          for all local containers, similar in style to the already
          supported --recursive switch for "systemctl list-units".

        * A new RebootArgument= setting has been added for service
          units, which may be used to specify a kernel reboot argument
          to use when triggering reboots with StartLimitAction=.

        * A new FailureAction= setting has been added for service
          units which may be used to specify an operation to trigger
          when a service fails. This works similarly to
          StartLimitAction=, but unlike it, controls what is done
          immediately rather than only after several attempts to
          restart the service in question.

        * hostnamed got updated to also expose the kernel name,
          release, and version on the bus. This is useful for
          executing commands like hostnamectl with the -H switch.
          systemd-analyze makes use of this to properly display
          details when running non-locally.

        * The bootchart tool can now show cgroup information in the
          graphs it generates.

        * The CFS CPU quota cgroup attribute is now exposed for
          services. The new CPUQuota= switch has been added for this
          which takes a percentage value. Setting this will have the
          result that a service may never get more CPU time than the
          specified percentage, even if the machine is otherwise idle.

        * systemd-networkd learned IPIP and SIT tunnel support.

        * LSB init scripts exposing a dependency on $network will now
          get a dependency on network-online.target rather than simply
          network.target. This should bring LSB handling closer to
          what it was on SysV systems.

        * A new fsck.repair= kernel option has been added to control
          how fsck shall deal with unclean file systems at boot.

        * The (.ini) configuration file parser will now silently
          ignore sections whose name begins with "X-". This may be
          used to maintain application-specific extension sections in unit
          files.

        * machined gained a new API to query the IP addresses of
          registered containers. "machinectl status" has been updated
          to show these addresses in its output.

        * A new call sd_uid_get_display() has been added to the
          sd-login APIs for querying the "primary" session of a
          user. The "primary" session of the user is elected from the
          user's sessions and generally a graphical session is
          preferred over a text one.

        * A minimal systemd-resolved daemon has been added. It
          currently simply acts as a companion to systemd-networkd and
          manages resolv.conf based on per-interface DNS
          configuration, possibly supplied via DHCP. In the long run
          we hope to extend this into a local DNSSEC enabled DNS and
          mDNS cache.

        * The systemd-networkd-wait-online tool is now enabled by
          default. It will delay network-online.target until a network
          connection has been configured. The tool primarily integrates
          with networkd, but will also make a best effort to make sense
          of network configuration performed in some other way.

        * Two new service options StartupCPUShares= and
          StartupBlockIOWeight= have been added that work similarly to
          CPUShares= and BlockIOWeight= however only apply during
          system startup. This is useful to prioritize certain services
          differently during bootup than during normal runtime.

        * hostnamed has been changed to prefer the statically
          configured hostname in /etc/hostname (unless set to
          'localhost' or empty) over any dynamic one supplied by
          dhcp. With this change, the rules for picking the hostname
          match more closely the rules of other configuration settings
          where the local administrator's configuration in /etc always
          overrides any other settings.

        Contributions fron: Ali H. Caliskan, Alison Chaiken, Bas van
        den Berg, Brandon Philips, Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Buch,
        Dan Kilman, Dave Reisner, David Härdeman, David Herrmann,
        David Strauss, Dimitris Spingos, Djalal Harouni, Eelco
        Dolstra, Evan Nemerson, Florian Albrechtskirchinger, Greg
        Kroah-Hartman, Harald Hoyer, Holger Hans Peter Freyther, Jan
        Engelhardt, Jani Nikula, Jason St. John, Jeffrey Clark,
        Jonathan Boulle, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Lukas
        Nykryn, Lukasz Skalski, Łukasz Stelmach, Mantas Mikulėnas,
        Marcel Holtmann, Martin Pitt, Matthew Monaco, Michael
        Marineau, Michael Olbrich, Michal Sekletar, Mike Gilbert, Nis
        Martensen, Patrik Flykt, Philip Lorenz, poma, Ray Strode,
        Reyad Attiyat, Robert Milasan, Scott Thrasher, Stef Walter,
        Steven Siloti, Susant Sahani, Tanu Kaskinen, Thomas Bächler,
        Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar
        Lindskog, WaLyong Cho, Will Woods, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Beijing, 2014-05-28

CHANGES WITH 212:

        * When restoring the screen brightness at boot, stay away from
          the darkest setting or from the lowest 5% of the available
          range, depending on which is the larger value of both. This
          should effectively protect the user from rebooting into a
          black screen, should the brightness have been set to minimum
          by accident.

        * sd-login gained a new sd_machine_get_class() call to
          determine the class ("vm" or "container") of a machine
          registered with machined.

        * sd-login gained new calls
          sd_peer_get_{session,owner_uid,unit,user_unit,slice,machine_name}(),
          to query the identity of the peer of a local AF_UNIX
          connection. They operate similarly to their sd_pid_get_xyz()
          counterparts.

        * PID 1 will now maintain a system-wide system state engine
          with the states "starting", "running", "degraded",
          "maintenance", "stopping". These states are bound to system
          startup, normal runtime, runtime with at least one failed
          service, rescue/emergency mode and system shutdown. This
          state is shown in the "systemctl status" output when no unit
          name is passed. It is useful to determine system state, in
          particularly when doing so for many systems or containers at
          once.

        * A new command "list-machines" has been added to "systemctl"
          that lists all local OS containers and shows their system
          state (see above), if systemd runs inside of them.

        * systemctl gained a new "-r" switch to recursively enumerate
          units on all local containers, when used with the
          "list-unit" command (which is the default one that is
          executed when no parameters are specified).

        * The GPT automatic partition discovery logic will now honour
          two GPT partition flags: one may be set on a partition to
          cause it to be mounted read-only, and the other may be set
          on a partition to ignore it during automatic discovery.

        * Two new GPT type UUIDs have been added for automatic root
          partition discovery, for 32-bit and 64-bit ARM. This is not
          particularly useful for discovering the root directory on
          these architectures during bare-metal boots (since UEFI is
          not common there), but still very useful to allow booting of
          ARM disk images in nspawn with the -i option.

        * MAC addresses of interfaces created with nspawn's
          --network-interface= switch will now be generated from the
          machine name, and thus be stable between multiple invocations
          of the container.

        * logind will now automatically remove all IPC objects owned
          by a user if she or he fully logs out. This makes sure that
          users who are logged out cannot continue to consume IPC
          resources. This covers SysV memory, semaphores and message
          queues as well as POSIX shared memory and message
          queues. Traditionally, SysV and POSIX IPC had no life-cycle
          limits. With this functionality, that is corrected. This may
          be turned off by using the RemoveIPC= switch of logind.conf.

        * The systemd-machine-id-setup and tmpfiles tools gained a
          --root= switch to operate on a specific root directory,
          instead of /.

        * journald can now forward logged messages to the TTYs of all
          logged in users ("wall"). This is the default for all
          emergency messages now.

        * A new tool systemd-journal-remote has been added to stream
          journal log messages across the network.

        * /sys/fs/cgroup/ is now mounted read-only after all cgroup
          controller trees are mounted into it. Note that the
          directories mounted beneath it are not read-only. This is a
          security measure and is particularly useful because glibc
          actually includes a search logic to pick any tmpfs it can
          find to implement shm_open() if /dev/shm is not available
          (which it might very well be in namespaced setups).

        * machinectl gained a new "poweroff" command to cleanly power
          down a local OS container.

        * The PrivateDevices= unit file setting will now also drop the
          CAP_MKNOD capability from the capability bound set, and
          imply DevicePolicy=closed.

        * PrivateDevices=, PrivateNetwork= and PrivateTmp= is now used
          comprehensively on all long-running systemd services where
          this is appropriate.

        * systemd-udevd will now run in a disassociated mount
          namespace. To mount directories from udev rules, make sure to
          pull in mount units via SYSTEMD_WANTS properties.

        * The kdbus support gained support for uploading policy into
          the kernel. sd-bus gained support for creating "monitoring"
          connections that can eavesdrop into all bus communication
          for debugging purposes.

        * Timestamps may now be specified in seconds since the UNIX
          epoch Jan 1st, 1970 by specifying "@" followed by the value
          in seconds.

        * Native tcpwrap support in systemd has been removed. tcpwrap
          is old code, not really maintained anymore and has serious
          shortcomings, and better options such as firewalls
          exist. For setups that require tcpwrap usage, please
          consider invoking your socket-activated service via tcpd,
          like on traditional inetd.

        * A new system.conf configuration option
          DefaultTimerAccuracySec= has been added that controls the
          default AccuracySec= setting of .timer units.

        * Timer units gained a new WakeSystem= switch. If enabled,
          timers configured this way will cause the system to resume
          from system suspend (if the system supports that, which most
          do these days).

        * Timer units gained a new Persistent= switch. If enabled,
          timers configured this way will save to disk when they have
          been last triggered. This information is then used on next
          reboot to possible execute overdue timer events, that
          could not take place because the system was powered off.
          This enables simple anacron-like behaviour for timer units.

        * systemctl's "list-timers" will now also list the time a
          timer unit was last triggered in addition to the next time
          it will be triggered.

        * systemd-networkd will now assign predictable IPv4LL
          addresses to its local interfaces.

        Contributions from: Brandon Philips, Daniel Buch, Daniel Mack,
        Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Gerd Hoffmann, Greg
        Kroah-Hartman, Hendrik Brueckner, Jason St. John, Josh
        Triplett, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Marc-Antoine
        Perennou, Michael Marineau, Michael Olbrich, Miklos Vajna,
        Patrik Flykt, poma, Sebastian Thorarensen, Thomas Bächler,
        Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tomasz Torcz, Tom Gundersen,
        Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Wieland Hoffmann, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-03-25

CHANGES WITH 211:

        * A new unit file setting RestrictAddressFamilies= has been
          added to restrict which socket address families unit
          processes gain access to. This takes address family names
          like "AF_INET" or "AF_UNIX", and is useful to minimize the
          attack surface of services via exotic protocol stacks. This
          is built on seccomp system call filters.

        * Two new unit file settings RuntimeDirectory= and
          RuntimeDirectoryMode= have been added that may be used to
          manage a per-daemon runtime directories below /run. This is
          an alternative for setting up directory permissions with
          tmpfiles snippets, and has the advantage that the runtime
          directory's lifetime is bound to the daemon runtime and that
          the daemon starts up with an empty directory each time. This
          is particularly useful when writing services that drop
          privileges using the User= or Group= setting.

        * The DeviceAllow= unit setting now supports globbing for
          matching against device group names.

        * The systemd configuration file system.conf gained new
          settings DefaultCPUAccounting=, DefaultBlockIOAccounting=,
          DefaultMemoryAccounting= to globally turn on/off accounting
          for specific resources (cgroups) for all units. These
          settings may still be overridden individually in each unit
          though.

        * systemd-gpt-auto-generator is now able to discover /srv and
          root partitions in addition to /home and swap partitions. It
          also supports LUKS-encrypted partitions now. With this in
          place, automatic discovery of partitions to mount following
          the Discoverable Partitions Specification
          (http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Specifications/DiscoverablePartitionsSpec)
          is now a lot more complete. This allows booting without
          /etc/fstab and without root= on the kernel command line on
          systems prepared appropriately.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --image= switch which allows
          booting up disk images and Linux installations on any block
          device that follow the Discoverable Partitions Specification
          (see above). This means that installations made with
          appropriately updated installers may now be started and
          deployed using container managers, completely
          unmodified. (We hope that libvirt-lxc will add support for
          this feature soon, too.)

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --network-macvlan= setting to
          set up a private macvlan interface for the
          container. Similarly, systemd-networkd gained a new
          Kind=macvlan setting in .netdev files.

        * systemd-networkd now supports configuring local addresses
          using IPv4LL.

        * A new tool systemd-network-wait-online has been added to
          synchronously wait for network connectivity using
          systemd-networkd.

        * The sd-bus.h bus API gained a new sd_bus_track object for
          tracking the life-cycle of bus peers. Note that sd-bus.h is
          still not a public API though (unless you specify
          --enable-kdbus on the configure command line, which however
          voids your warranty and you get no API stability guarantee).

        * The $XDG_RUNTIME_DIR runtime directories for each user are
          now individual tmpfs instances, which has the benefit of
          introducing separate pools for each user, with individual
          size limits, and thus making sure that unprivileged clients
          can no longer negatively impact the system or other users by
          filling up their $XDG_RUNTIME_DIR. A new logind.conf setting
          RuntimeDirectorySize= has been introduced that allows
          controlling the default size limit for all users. It
          defaults to 10% of the available physical memory. This is no
          replacement for quotas on tmpfs though (which the kernel
          still does not support), as /dev/shm and /tmp are still
          shared resources used by both the system and unprivileged
          users.

        * logind will now automatically turn off automatic suspending
          on laptop lid close when more than one display is
          connected. This was previously expected to be implemented
          individually in desktop environments (such as GNOME),
          however has been added to logind now, in order to fix a
          boot-time race where a desktop environment might not have
          been started yet and thus not been able to take an inhibitor
          lock at the time where logind already suspends the system
          due to a closed lid.

        * logind will now wait at least 30s after each system
          suspend/resume cycle, and 3min after system boot before
          suspending the system due to a closed laptop lid. This
          should give USB docking stations and similar enough time to
          be probed and configured after system resume and boot in
          order to then act as suspend blocker.

        * systemd-run gained a new --property= setting which allows
          initialization of resource control properties (and others)
          for the created scope or service unit. Example: "systemd-run
          --property=BlockIOWeight=10 updatedb" may be used to run
          updatedb at a low block IO scheduling weight.

        * systemd-run's --uid=, --gid=, --setenv=, --setenv= switches
          now also work in --scope mode.

        * When systemd is compiled with kdbus support, basic support
          for enforced policies is now in place. (Note that enabling
          kdbus still voids your warranty and no API compatibility
          promises are made.)

        Contributions from: Andrey Borzenkov, Ansgar Burchardt, Armin
        K., Daniel Mack, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Djalal Harouni,
        Harald Hoyer, Henrik Grindal Bakken, Jasper St. Pierre, Kay
        Sievers, Kieran Clancy, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn,
        Mantas Mikulėnas, Marcel Holtmann, Mark Oteiza, Martin Pitt,
        Mike Gilbert, Peter Rajnoha, poma, Samuli Suominen, Stef
        Walter, Susant Sahani, Tero Roponen, Thomas Andersen, Thomas
        Bächler, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tomasz Torcz, Tom
        Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Uoti Urpala, Zachary Cook,
        Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-03-12

CHANGES WITH 210:

        * systemd will now relabel /dev after loading the SMACK policy
          according to SMACK rules.

        * A new unit file option AppArmorProfile= has been added to
          set the AppArmor profile for the processes of a unit.

        * A new condition check ConditionArchitecture= has been added
          to conditionalize units based on the system architecture, as
          reported by uname()'s "machine" field.

        * systemd-networkd now supports matching on the system
          virtualization, architecture, kernel command line, host name
          and machine ID.

        * logind is now a lot more aggressive when suspending the
          machine due to a closed laptop lid. Instead of acting only
          on the lid close action, it will continuously watch the lid
          status and act on it. This is useful for laptops where the
          power button is on the outside of the chassis so that it can
          be reached without opening the lid (such as the Lenovo
          Yoga). On those machines, logind will now immediately
          re-suspend the machine if the power button has been
          accidentally pressed while the laptop was suspended and in a
          backpack or similar.

        * logind will now watch SW_DOCK switches and inhibit reaction
          to the lid switch if it is pressed. This means that logind
          will not suspend the machine anymore if the lid is closed
          and the system is docked, if the laptop supports SW_DOCK
          notifications via the input layer. Note that ACPI docking
          stations do not generate this currently. Also note that this
          logic is usually not fully sufficient and Desktop
          Environments should take a lid switch inhibitor lock when an
          external display is connected, as systemd will not watch
          this on its own.

        * nspawn will now make use of the devices cgroup controller by
          default, and only permit creation of and access to the usual
          API device nodes like /dev/null or /dev/random, as well as
          access to (but not creation of) the pty devices.

        * We will now ship a default .network file for
          systemd-networkd that automatically configures DHCP for
          network interfaces created by nspawn's --network-veth or
          --network-bridge= switches.

        * systemd will now understand the usual M, K, G, T suffixes
          according to SI conventions (i.e. to the base 1000) when
          referring to throughput and hardware metrics. It will stay
          with IEC conventions (i.e. to the base 1024) for software
          metrics, according to what is customary according to
          Wikipedia. We explicitly document which base applies for
          each configuration option.

        * The DeviceAllow= setting in unit files now supports a syntax
          to whitelist an entire group of devices node majors at once,
          based on the /proc/devices listing. For example, with the
          string "char-pts", it is now possible to whitelist all
          current and future pseudo-TTYs at once.

        * sd-event learned a new "post" event source. Event sources of
          this type are triggered by the dispatching of any event
          source of a type that is not "post". This is useful for
          implementing clean-up and check event sources that are
          triggered by other work being done in the program.

        * systemd-networkd is no longer statically enabled, but uses
          the usual [Install] sections so that it can be
          enabled/disabled using systemctl. It still is enabled by
          default however.

        * When creating a veth interface pair with systemd-nspawn, the
          host side will now be prefixed with "vb-" if
          --network-bridge= is used, and with "ve-" if --network-veth
          is used. This way, it is easy to distinguish these cases on
          the host, for example to apply different configuration to
          them with systemd-networkd.

        * The compatibility libraries for libsystemd-journal.so,
          libsystem-id128.so, libsystemd-login.so and
          libsystemd-daemon.so do not make use of IFUNC
          anymore. Instead, we now build libsystemd.so multiple times
          under these alternative names. This means that the footprint
          is drastically increased, but given that these are
          transitional compatibility libraries, this should not matter
          much. This change has been made necessary to support the ARM
          platform for these compatibility libraries, as the ARM
          toolchain is not really at the same level as the toolchain
          for other architectures like x86 and does not support
          IFUNC. Please make sure to use --enable-compat-libs only
          during a transitional period!

        Contributions from: Andreas Fuchs, Armin K., Colin Walters,
        Daniel Mack, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Djalal Harouni,
        Holger Schurig, Jason A. Donenfeld, Jason St. John, Jasper
        St. Pierre, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Łukasz Stelmach,
        Marcel Holtmann, Michael Scherer, Michal Sekletar, Mike
        Gilbert, Samuli Suominen, Thomas Bächler, Thomas Hindoe
        Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog,
        Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-02-24

CHANGES WITH 209:

        * A new component "systemd-networkd" has been added that can
          be used to configure local network interfaces statically or
          via DHCP. It is capable of bringing up bridges, VLANs, and
          bonding. Currently, no hook-ups for interactive network
          configuration are provided. Use this for your initrd,
          container, embedded, or server setup if you need a simple,
          yet powerful, network configuration solution. This
          configuration subsystem is quite nifty, as it allows wildcard
          hotplug matching in interfaces. For example, with a single
          configuration snippet, you can configure that all Ethernet
          interfaces showing up are automatically added to a bridge,
          or similar. It supports link-sensing and more.

        * A new tool "systemd-socket-proxyd" has been added which can
          act as a bidirectional proxy for TCP sockets. This is
          useful for adding socket activation support to services that
          do not actually support socket activation, including virtual
          machines and the like.

        * Add a new tool to save/restore rfkill state on
          shutdown/boot.

        * Save/restore state of keyboard backlights in addition to
          display backlights on shutdown/boot.

        * udev learned a new SECLABEL{} construct to label device
          nodes with a specific security label when they appear. For
          now, only SECLABEL{selinux} is supported, but the syntax is
          prepared for additional security frameworks.

        * udev gained a new scheme to configure link-level attributes
          from files in /etc/systemd/network/*.link. These files can
          match against MAC address, device path, driver name and type,
          and will apply attributes like the naming policy, link speed,
          MTU, duplex settings, Wake-on-LAN settings, MAC address, MAC
          address assignment policy (randomized, ...).

        * The configuration of network interface naming rules for
          "permanent interface names" has changed: a new NamePolicy=
          setting in the [Link] section of .link files determines the
          priority of possible naming schemes (onboard, slot, MAC,
          path). The default value of this setting is determined by
          /usr/lib/net/links/99-default.link. Old
          80-net-name-slot.rules udev configuration file has been
          removed, so local configuration overriding this file should
          be adapated to override 99-default.link instead.

        * When the User= switch is used in a unit file, also
          initialize $SHELL= based on the user database entry.

        * systemd no longer depends on libdbus. All communication is
          now done with sd-bus, systemd's low-level bus library
          implementation.

        * kdbus support has been added to PID 1 itself. When kdbus is
          enabled, this causes PID 1 to set up the system bus and
          enable support for a new ".busname" unit type that
          encapsulates bus name activation on kdbus. It works a little
          bit like ".socket" units, except for bus names. A new
          generator has been added that converts classic dbus1 service
          activation files automatically into native systemd .busname
          and .service units.

        * sd-bus: add a light-weight vtable implementation that allows
          defining objects on the bus with a simple static const
          vtable array of its methods, signals and properties.

        * systemd will not generate or install static dbus
          introspection data anymore to /usr/share/dbus-1/interfaces,
          as the precise format of these files is unclear, and
          nothing makes use of it.

        * A proxy daemon is now provided to proxy clients connecting
          via classic D-Bus AF_UNIX sockets to kdbus, to provide full
          compatibility with classic D-Bus.

        * A bus driver implementation has been added that supports the
          classic D-Bus bus driver calls on kdbus, also for
          compatibility purposes.

        * A new API "sd-event.h" has been added that implements a
          minimal event loop API built around epoll. It provides a
          couple of features that direct epoll usage is lacking:
          prioritization of events, scales to large numbers of timer
          events, per-event timer slack (accuracy), system-wide
          coalescing of timer events, exit handlers, watchdog
          supervision support using systemd's sd_notify() API, child
          process handling.

        * A new API "sd-rntl.h" has been added that provides an API
          around the route netlink interface of the kernel, similar in
          style to "sd-bus.h".

        * A new API "sd-dhcp-client.h" has been added that provides a
          small DHCPv4 client-side implementation. This is used by
          "systemd-networkd".

        * There is a new kernel command line option
          "systemd.restore_state=0|1". When set to "0", none of the
          systemd tools will restore saved runtime state to hardware
          devices. More specifically, the rfkill and backlight states
          are not restored.

        * The FsckPassNo= compatibility option in mount/service units
          has been removed. The fstab generator will now add the
          necessary dependencies automatically, and does not require
          PID1's support for that anymore.

        * journalctl gained a new switch, --list-boots, that lists
          recent boots with their times and boot IDs.

        * The various tools like systemctl, loginctl, timedatectl,
          busctl, systemd-run, ... have gained a new switch "-M" to
          connect to a specific, local OS container (as direct
          connection, without requiring SSH). This works on any
          container that is registered with machined, such as those
          created by libvirt-lxc or nspawn.

        * systemd-run and systemd-analyze also gained support for "-H"
          to connect to remote hosts via SSH. This is particularly
          useful for systemd-run because it enables queuing of jobs
          onto remote systems.

        * machinectl gained a new command "login" to open a getty
          login in any local container. This works with any container
          that is registered with machined (such as those created by
          libvirt-lxc or nspawn), and which runs systemd inside.

        * machinectl gained a new "reboot" command that may be used to
          trigger a reboot on a specific container that is registered
          with machined. This works on any container that runs an init
          system of some kind.

        * systemctl gained a new "list-timers" command to print a nice
          listing of installed timer units with the times they elapse
          next.

        * Alternative reboot() parameters may now be specified on the
          "systemctl reboot" command line and are passed to the
          reboot() system call.

        * systemctl gained a new --job-mode= switch to configure the
          mode to queue a job with. This is a more generic version of
          --fail, --irreversible, and --ignore-dependencies, which are
          still available but not advertised anymore.

        * /etc/systemd/system.conf gained new settings to configure
          various default timeouts of units, as well as the default
          start limit interval and burst. These may still be overridden
          within each Unit.

        * PID1 will now export on the bus profile data of the security
          policy upload process (such as the SELinux policy upload to
          the kernel).

        * journald: when forwarding logs to the console, include
          timestamps (following the setting in
          /sys/module/printk/parameters/time).

        * OnCalendar= in timer units now understands the special
          strings "yearly" and "annually". (Both are equivalent)

        * The accuracy of timer units is now configurable with the new
          AccuracySec= setting. It defaults to 1min.

        * A new dependency type JoinsNamespaceOf= has been added that
          allows running two services within the same /tmp and network
          namespace, if PrivateNetwork= or PrivateTmp= are used.

        * A new command "cat" has been added to systemctl. It outputs
          the original unit file of a unit, and concatenates the
          contents of additional "drop-in" unit file snippets, so that
          the full configuration is shown.

        * systemctl now supports globbing on the various "list-xyz"
          commands, like "list-units" or "list-sockets", as well as on
          those commands which take multiple unit names.

        * journalctl's --unit= switch gained support for globbing.

        * All systemd daemons now make use of the watchdog logic so
          that systemd automatically notices when they hang.

        * If the $container_ttys environment variable is set,
          getty-generator will automatically spawn a getty for each
          listed tty. This is useful for container managers to request
          login gettys to be spawned on as many ttys as needed.

        * %h, %s, %U specifier support is not available anymore when
          used in unit files for PID 1. This is because NSS calls are
          not safe from PID 1. They stay available for --user
          instances of systemd, and as special case for the root user.

        * loginctl gained a new "--no-legend" switch to turn off output
          of the legend text.

        * The "sd-login.h" API gained three new calls:
          sd_session_is_remote(), sd_session_get_remote_user(),
          sd_session_get_remote_host() to query information about
          remote sessions.

        * The udev hardware database now also carries vendor/product
          information of SDIO devices.

        * The "sd-daemon.h" API gained a new sd_watchdog_enabled() to
          determine whether watchdog notifications are requested by
          the system manager.

        * Socket-activated per-connection services now include a
          short description of the connection parameters in the
          description.

        * tmpfiles gained a new "--boot" option. When this is not used,
          only lines where the command character is not suffixed with
          "!" are executed. When this option is specified, those
          options are executed too. This partitions tmpfiles
          directives into those that can be safely executed at any
          time, and those which should be run only at boot (for
          example, a line that creates /run/nologin).

        * A new API "sd-resolve.h" has been added which provides a simple
          asynchronous wrapper around glibc NSS host name resolution
          calls, such as getaddrinfo(). In contrast to glibc's
          getaddrinfo_a(), it does not use signals. In contrast to most
          other asynchronous name resolution libraries, this one does
          not reimplement DNS, but reuses NSS, so that alternate
          host name resolution systems continue to work, such as mDNS,
          LDAP, etc. This API is based on libasyncns, but it has been
          cleaned up for inclusion in systemd.

        * The APIs "sd-journal.h", "sd-login.h", "sd-id128.h",
          "sd-daemon.h" are no longer found in individual libraries
          libsystemd-journal.so, libsystemd-login.so,
          libsystemd-id128.so, libsystemd-daemon.so. Instead, we have
          merged them into a single library, libsystemd.so, which
          provides all symbols. The reason for this is cyclic
          dependencies, as these libraries tend to use each other's
          symbols. So far, we have managed to workaround that by linking
          a copy of a good part of our code into each of these
          libraries again and again, which, however, makes certain
          things hard to do, like sharing static variables. Also, it
          substantially increases footprint. With this change, there
          is only one library for the basic APIs systemd
          provides. Also, "sd-bus.h", "sd-memfd.h", "sd-event.h",
          "sd-rtnl.h", "sd-resolve.h", "sd-utf8.h" are found in this
          library as well, however are subject to the --enable-kdbus
          switch (see below). Note that "sd-dhcp-client.h" is not part
          of this library (this is because it only consumes, never
          provides, services of/to other APIs). To make the transition
          easy from the separate libraries to the unified one, we
          provide the --enable-compat-libs compile-time switch which
          will generate stub libraries that are compatible with the
          old ones but redirect all calls to the new one.

        * All of the kdbus logic and the new APIs "sd-bus.h",
          "sd-memfd.h", "sd-event.h", "sd-rtnl.h", "sd-resolve.h",
          and "sd-utf8.h" are compile-time optional via the
          "--enable-kdbus" switch, and they are not compiled in by
          default. To make use of kdbus, you have to explicitly enable
          the switch. Note however, that neither the kernel nor the
          userspace API for all of this is considered stable yet. We
          want to maintain the freedom to still change the APIs for
          now. By specifying this build-time switch, you acknowledge
          that you are aware of the instability of the current
          APIs.

        * Also, note that while kdbus is pretty much complete,
          it lacks one thing: proper policy support. This means you
          can build a fully working system with all features; however,
          it will be highly insecure. Policy support will be added in
          one of the next releases, at the same time that we will
          declare the APIs stable.

        * When the kernel command line argument "kdbus" is specified,
          systemd will automatically load the kdbus.ko kernel module. At
          this stage of development, it is only useful for testing kdbus
          and should not be used in production. Note: if "--enable-kdbus"
          is specified, and the kdbus.ko kernel module is available, and
          "kdbus" is added to the kernel command line, the entire system
          runs with kdbus instead of dbus-daemon, with the above mentioned
          problem of missing the system policy enforcement. Also a future
          version of kdbus.ko or a newer systemd will not be compatible with
          each other, and will unlikely be able to boot the machine if only
          one of them is updated.

        * systemctl gained a new "import-environment" command which
          uploads the caller's environment (or parts thereof) into the
          service manager so that it is inherited by services started
          by the manager. This is useful to upload variables like
          $DISPLAY into the user service manager.

        * A new PrivateDevices= switch has been added to service units
          which allows running a service with a namespaced /dev
          directory that does not contain any device nodes for
          physical devices. More specifically, it only includes devices
          such as /dev/null, /dev/urandom, and /dev/zero which are API
          entry points.

        * logind has been extended to support behaviour like VT
          switching on seats that do not support a VT. This makes
          multi-session available on seats that are not the first seat
          (seat0), and on systems where kernel support for VTs has
          been disabled at compile-time.

        * If a process holds a delay lock for system sleep or shutdown
          and fails to release it in time, we will now log its
          identity. This makes it easier to identify processes that
          cause slow suspends or power-offs.

        * When parsing /etc/crypttab, support for a new key-slot=
          option as supported by Debian is added. It allows indicating
          which LUKS slot to use on disk, speeding up key loading.

        * The sd_journald_sendv() API call has been checked and
          officially declared to be async-signal-safe so that it may
          be invoked from signal handlers for logging purposes.

        * Boot-time status output is now enabled automatically after a
          short timeout if boot does not progress, in order to give
          the user an indication what she or he is waiting for.

        * The boot-time output has been improved to show how much time
          remains until jobs expire.

        * The KillMode= switch in service units gained a new possible
          value "mixed". If set, and the unit is shut down, then the
          initial SIGTERM signal is sent only to the main daemon
          process, while the following SIGKILL signal is sent to
          all remaining processes of the service.

        * When a scope unit is registered, a new property "Controller"
          may be set. If set to a valid bus name, systemd will send a
          RequestStop() signal to this name when it would like to shut
          down the scope. This may be used to hook manager logic into
          the shutdown logic of scope units. Also, scope units may now
          be put in a special "abandoned" state, in which case the
          manager process which created them takes no further
          responsibilities for it.

        * When reading unit files, systemd will now verify
          the access mode of these files, and warn about certain
          suspicious combinations. This has been added to make it
          easier to track down packaging bugs where unit files are
          marked executable or world-writable.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new "--setenv=" switch to set
          container-wide environment variables. The similar option in
          systemd-activate was renamed from "--environment=" to
          "--setenv=" for consistency.

        * systemd-nspawn has been updated to create a new kdbus domain
          for each container that is invoked, thus allowing each
          container to have its own set of system and user buses,
          independent of the host.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --drop-capability= switch to run
          the container with less capabilities than the default. Both
          --drop-capability= and --capability= now take the special
          string "all" for dropping or keeping all capabilities.

        * systemd-nspawn gained new switches for executing containers
          with specific SELinux labels set.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --quiet switch to not generate
          any additional output but the container's own console
          output.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --share-system switch to run a
          container without PID namespacing enabled.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --register= switch to control
          whether the container is registered with systemd-machined or
          not. This is useful for containers that do not run full
          OS images, but only specific apps.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --keep-unit which may be used
          when invoked as the only program from a service unit, and
          results in registration of the unit service itself in
          systemd-machined, instead of a newly opened scope unit.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --network-interface= switch for
          moving arbitrary interfaces to the container. The new
          --network-veth switch creates a virtual Ethernet connection
          between host and container. The new --network-bridge=
          switch then allows assigning the host side of this virtual
          Ethernet connection to a bridge device.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --personality= switch for
          setting the kernel personality for the container. This is
          useful when running a 32-bit container on a 64-bit host. A
          similar option Personality= is now also available for service
          units to use.

        * logind will now also track a "Desktop" identifier for each
          session which encodes the desktop environment of it. This is
          useful for desktop environments that want to identify
          multiple running sessions of itself easily.

        * A new SELinuxContext= setting for service units has been
          added that allows setting a specific SELinux execution
          context for a service.

        * Most systemd client tools will now honour $SYSTEMD_LESS for
          settings of the "less" pager. By default, these tools will
          override $LESS to allow certain operations to work, such as
          jump-to-the-end. With $SYSTEMD_LESS, it is possible to
          influence this logic.

        * systemd's "seccomp" hook-up has been changed to make use of
          the libseccomp library instead of using its own
          implementation. This has benefits for portability among
          other things.

        * For usage together with SystemCallFilter=, a new
          SystemCallErrorNumber= setting has been introduced that
          allows configuration of a system error number to be returned
          on filtered system calls, instead of immediately killing the
          process. Also, SystemCallArchitectures= has been added to
          limit access to system calls of a particular architecture
          (in order to turn off support for unused secondary
          architectures). There is also a global
          SystemCallArchitectures= setting in system.conf now to turn
          off support for non-native system calls system-wide.

        * systemd requires a kernel with a working name_to_handle_at(),
          please see the kernel config requirements in the README file.

        Contributions from: Adam Williamson, Alex Jia, Anatol Pomozov,
        Ansgar Burchardt, AppleBloom, Auke Kok, Bastien Nocera,
        Chengwei Yang, Christian Seiler, Colin Guthrie, Colin Walters,
        Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Buch, Daniele Medri, Daniel J
        Walsh, Daniel Mack, Dan McGee, Dave Reisner, David Coppa,
        David Herrmann, David Strauss, Djalal Harouni, Dmitry Pisklov,
        Elia Pinto, Florian Weimer, George McCollister, Goffredo
        Baroncelli, Greg Kroah-Hartman, Hendrik Brueckner, Igor
        Zhbanov, Jan Engelhardt, Jan Janssen, Jason A. Donenfeld,
        Jason St. John, Jasper St. Pierre, Jóhann B. Guðmundsson, Jose
        Ignacio Naranjo, Karel Zak, Kay Sievers, Kristian Høgsberg,
        Lennart Poettering, Lubomir Rintel, Lukas Nykryn, Lukasz
        Skalski, Łukasz Stelmach, Luke Shumaker, Mantas Mikulėnas,
        Marc-Antoine Perennou, Marcel Holtmann, Marcos Felipe Rasia de
        Mello, Marko Myllynen, Martin Pitt, Matthew Monaco, Michael
        Marineau, Michael Scherer, Michał Górny, Michal Sekletar,
        Michele Curti, Oleksii Shevchuk, Olivier Brunel, Patrik Flykt,
        Pavel Holica, Raudi, Richard Marko, Ronny Chevalier, Sébastien
        Luttringer, Sergey Ptashnick, Shawn Landden, Simon Peeters,
        Stefan Beller, Susant Sahani, Sylvain Plantefeve, Sylvia Else,
        Tero Roponen, Thomas Bächler, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen,
        Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar Lindskog, Unai Uribarri, Václav
        Pavlín, Vincent Batts, WaLyong Cho, William Giokas, Yang
        Zhiyong, Yin Kangkai, Yuxuan Shui, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2014-02-20

CHANGES WITH 208:

        * logind has gained support for facilitating privileged input
          and drm device access for unprivileged clients. This work is
          useful to allow Wayland display servers (and similar
          programs, such as kmscon) to run under the user's ID and
          access input and drm devices which are normally
          protected. When this is used (and the kernel is new enough)
          logind will "mute" IO on the file descriptors passed to
          Wayland as long as it is in the background and "unmute" it
          if it returns into the foreground. This allows secure
          session switching without allowing background sessions to
          eavesdrop on input and display data. This also introduces
          session switching support if VT support is turned off in the
          kernel, and on seats that are not seat0.

        * A new kernel command line option luks.options= is understood
          now which allows specifying LUKS options for usage for LUKS
          encrypted partitions specified with luks.uuid=.

        * tmpfiles.d(5) snippets may now use specifier expansion in
          path names. More specifically %m, %b, %H, %v, are now
          replaced by the local machine id, boot id, hostname, and
          kernel version number.

        * A new tmpfiles.d(5) command "m" has been introduced which
          may be used to change the owner/group/access mode of a file
          or directory if it exists, but do nothing if it does not.

        * This release removes high-level support for the
          MemorySoftLimit= cgroup setting. The underlying kernel
          cgroup attribute memory.soft_limit= is currently badly
          designed and likely to be removed from the kernel API in its
          current form, hence we should not expose it for now.

        * The memory.use_hierarchy cgroup attribute is now enabled for
          all cgroups systemd creates in the memory cgroup
          hierarchy. This option is likely to be come the built-in
          default in the kernel anyway, and the non-hierarchical mode
          never made much sense in the intrinsically hierarchical
          cgroup system.

        * A new field _SYSTEMD_SLICE= is logged along with all journal
          messages containing the slice a message was generated
          from. This is useful to allow easy per-customer filtering of
          logs among other things.

        * systemd-journald will no longer adjust the group of journal
          files it creates to the "systemd-journal" group. Instead we
          rely on the journal directory to be owned by the
          "systemd-journal" group, and its setgid bit set, so that the
          kernel file system layer will automatically enforce that
          journal files inherit this group assignment. The reason for
          this change is that we cannot allow NSS look-ups from
          journald which would be necessary to resolve
          "systemd-journal" to a numeric GID, because this might
          create deadlocks if NSS involves synchronous queries to
          other daemons (such as nscd, or sssd) which in turn are
          logging clients of journald and might block on it, which
          would then dead lock. A tmpfiles.d(5) snippet included in
          systemd will make sure the setgid bit and group are
          properly set on the journal directory if it exists on every
          boot. However, we recommend adjusting it manually after
          upgrades too (or from RPM scriptlets), so that the change is
          not delayed until next reboot.

        * Backlight and random seed files in /var/lib/ have moved into
          the /var/lib/systemd/ directory, in order to centralize all
          systemd generated files in one directory.

        * Boot time performance measurements (as displayed by
          "systemd-analyze" for example) will now read ACPI 5.0 FPDT
          performance information if that's available to determine how
          much time BIOS and boot loader initialization required. With
          a sufficiently new BIOS you hence no longer need to boot
          with Gummiboot to get access to such information.

        Contributions from: Andrey Borzenkov, Chen Jie, Colin Walters,
        Cristian Rodríguez, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, David
        Mackey, David Strauss, Eelco Dolstra, Evan Callicoat, Gao
        feng, Harald Hoyer, Jimmie Tauriainen, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas, Martin Pitt,
        Michael Scherer, Michał Górny, Mike Gilbert, Patrick McCarty,
        Sebastian Ott, Tom Gundersen, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2013-10-02

CHANGES WITH 207:

        * The Restart= option for services now understands a new
          on-watchdog setting, which will restart the service
          automatically if the service stops sending out watchdog keep
          alive messages (as configured with WatchdogSec=).

        * The getty generator (which is responsible for bringing up a
          getty on configured serial consoles) will no longer only
          start a getty on the primary kernel console but on all
          others, too. This makes the order in which console= is
          specified on the kernel command line less important.

        * libsystemd-logind gained a new sd_session_get_vt() call to
          retrieve the VT number of a session.

        * If the option "tries=0" is set for an entry of /etc/crypttab
          its passphrase is queried indefinitely instead of any
          maximum number of tries.

        * If a service with a configure PID file terminates its PID
          file will now be removed automatically if it still exists
          afterwards. This should put an end to stale PID files.

        * systemd-run will now also take relative binary path names
          for execution and no longer insists on absolute paths.

        * InaccessibleDirectories= and ReadOnlyDirectories= now take
          paths that are optionally prefixed with "-" to indicate that
          it should not be considered a failure if they do not exist.

        * journalctl -o (and similar commands) now understands a new
          output mode "short-precise", it is similar to "short" but
          shows timestamps with usec accuracy.

        * The option "discard" (as known from Debian) is now
          synonymous to "allow-discards" in /etc/crypttab. In fact,
          "discard" is preferred now (since it is easier to remember
          and type).

        * Some licensing clean-ups were made, so that more code is now
          LGPL-2.1 licensed than before.

        * A minimal tool to save/restore the display backlight
          brightness across reboots has been added. It will store the
          backlight setting as late as possible at shutdown, and
          restore it as early as possible during reboot.

        * A logic to automatically discover and enable home and swap
          partitions on GPT disks has been added. With this in place
          /etc/fstab becomes optional for many setups as systemd can
          discover certain partitions located on the root disk
          automatically. Home partitions are recognized under their
          GPT type ID 933ac7e12eb44f13b8440e14e2aef915. Swap
          partitions are recognized under their GPT type ID
          0657fd6da4ab43c484e50933c84b4f4f.

        * systemd will no longer pass any environment from the kernel
          or initrd to system services. If you want to set an
          environment for all services, do so via the kernel command
          line systemd.setenv= assignment.

        * The systemd-sysctl tool no longer natively reads the file
          /etc/sysctl.conf. If desired, the file should be symlinked
          from /etc/sysctl.d/99-sysctl.conf. Apart from providing
          legacy support by a symlink rather than built-in code, it
          also makes the otherwise hidden order of application of the
          different files visible. (Note that this partly reverts to a
          pre-198 application order of sysctl knobs!)

        * The "systemctl set-log-level" and "systemctl dump" commands
          have been moved to systemd-analyze.

        * systemd-run learned the new --remain-after-exit switch,
          which causes the scope unit not to be cleaned up
          automatically after the process terminated.

        * tmpfiles learned a new --exclude-prefix= switch to exclude
          certain paths from operation.

        * journald will now automatically flush all messages to disk
          as soon as a message at the log level CRIT, ALERT or EMERG
          is received.

        Contributions from: Andrew Cook, Brandon Philips, Christian
        Hesse, Christoph Junghans, Colin Walters, Daniel Schaal,
        Daniel Wallace, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, Gao feng, George
        McCollister, Giovanni Campagna, Hannes Reinecke, Harald Hoyer,
        Herczeg Zsolt, Holger Hans Peter Freyther, Jan Engelhardt,
        Jesper Larsen, Kay Sievers, Khem Raj, Lennart Poettering,
        Lukas Nykryn, Maciej Wereski, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marcel
        Holtmann, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael Marineau,
        Michael Scherer, Michael Stapelberg, Michal Sekletar, Michał
        Górny, Olivier Brunel, Ondrej Balaz, Ronny Chevalier, Shawn
        Landden, Steven Hiscocks, Thomas Bächler, Thomas Hindoe
        Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar, WANG Chao,
        William Giokas, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2013-09-13

CHANGES WITH 206:

        * The documentation has been updated to cover the various new
          concepts introduced with 205.

        * Unit files now understand the new %v specifier which
          resolves to the kernel version string as returned by "uname
          -r".

        * systemctl now supports filtering the unit list output by
          load state, active state and sub state, using the new
          --state= parameter.

        * "systemctl status" will now show the results of the
          condition checks (like ConditionPathExists= and similar) of
          the last start attempts of the unit. They are also logged to
          the journal.

        * "journalctl -b" may now be used to look for boot output of a
          specific boot. Try "journalctl -b -1" for the previous boot,
          but the syntax is substantially more powerful.

        * "journalctl --show-cursor" has been added which prints the
          cursor string the last shown log line. This may then be used
          with the new "journalctl --after-cursor=" switch to continue
          browsing logs from that point on.

        * "journalctl --force" may now be used to force regeneration
          of an FSS key.

        * Creation of "dead" device nodes has been moved from udev
          into kmod and tmpfiles. Previously, udev would read the kmod
          databases to pre-generate dead device nodes based on meta
          information contained in kernel modules, so that these would
          be auto-loaded on access rather then at boot. As this
          does not really have much to do with the exposing actual
          kernel devices to userspace this has always been slightly
          alien in the udev codebase. Following the new scheme kmod
          will now generate a runtime snippet for tmpfiles from the
          module meta information and it now is tmpfiles' job to the
          create the nodes. This also allows overriding access and
          other parameters for the nodes using the usual tmpfiles
          facilities. As side effect this allows us to remove the
          CAP_SYS_MKNOD capability bit from udevd entirely.

        * logind's device ACLs may now be applied to these "dead"
          devices nodes too, thus finally allowing managed access to
          devices such as /dev/snd/sequencer whithout loading the
          backing module right-away.

        * A new RPM macro has been added that may be used to apply
          tmpfiles configuration during package installation.

        * systemd-detect-virt and ConditionVirtualization= now can
          detect User-Mode-Linux machines (UML).

        * journald will now implicitly log the effective capabilities
          set of processes in the message metadata.

        * systemd-cryptsetup has gained support for TrueCrypt volumes.

        * The initrd interface has been simplified (more specifically,
          support for passing performance data via environment
          variables and fsck results via files in /run has been
          removed). These features were non-essential, and are
          nowadays available in a much nicer way by having systemd in
          the initrd serialize its state and have the hosts systemd
          deserialize it again.

        * The udev "keymap" data files and tools to apply keyboard
          specific mappings of scan to key codes, and force-release
          scan code lists have been entirely replaced by a udev
          "keyboard" builtin and a hwdb data file.

        * systemd will now honour the kernel's "quiet" command line
          argument also during late shutdown, resulting in a
          completely silent shutdown when used.

        * There's now an option to control the SO_REUSEPORT socket
          option in .socket units.

        * Instance units will now automatically get a per-template
          subslice of system.slice unless something else is explicitly
          configured. For example, instances of sshd@.service will now
          implicitly be placed in system-sshd.slice rather than
          system.slice as before.

        * Test coverage support may now be enabled at build time.

        Contributions from: Dave Reisner, Frederic Crozat, Harald
        Hoyer, Holger Hans Peter Freyther, Jan Engelhardt, Jan
        Janssen, Jason St. John, Jesper Larsen, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Maciej Wereski, Martin Pitt, Michael
        Olbrich, Ramkumar Ramachandra, Ross Lagerwall, Shawn Landden,
        Thomas H.P. Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Tomasz Torcz, William
        Giokas, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

        -- Berlin, 2013-07-23

CHANGES WITH 205:

        * Two new unit types have been introduced:

          Scope units are very similar to service units, however, are
          created out of pre-existing processes -- instead of PID 1
          forking off the processes. By using scope units it is
          possible for system services and applications to group their
          own child processes (worker processes) in a powerful way
          which then maybe used to organize them, or kill them
          together, or apply resource limits on them.

          Slice units may be used to partition system resources in an
          hierarchical fashion and then assign other units to them. By
          default there are now three slices: system.slice (for all
          system services), user.slice (for all user sessions),
          machine.slice (for VMs and containers).

          Slices and scopes have been introduced primarily in
          context of the work to move cgroup handling to a
          single-writer scheme, where only PID 1
          creates/removes/manages cgroups.

        * There's a new concept of "transient" units. In contrast to
          normal units these units are created via an API at runtime,
          not from configuration from disk. More specifically this
          means it is now possible to run arbitrary programs as
          independent services, with all execution parameters passed
          in via bus APIs rather than read from disk. Transient units
          make systemd substantially more dynamic then it ever was,
          and useful as a general batch manager.

        * logind has been updated to make use of scope and slice units
          for managing user sessions. As a user logs in he will get
          his own private slice unit, to which all sessions are added
          as scope units. We also added support for automatically
          adding an instance of user@.service for the user into the
          slice. Effectively logind will no longer create cgroup
          hierarchies on its own now, it will defer entirely to PID 1
          for this by means of scope, service and slice units. Since
          user sessions this way become entities managed by PID 1
          the output of "systemctl" is now a lot more comprehensive.

        * A new mini-daemon "systemd-machined" has been added which
          may be used by virtualization managers to register local
          VMs/containers. nspawn has been updated accordingly, and
          libvirt will be updated shortly. machined will collect a bit
          of meta information about the VMs/containers, and assign
          them their own scope unit (see above). The collected
          meta-data is then made available via the "machinectl" tool,
          and exposed in "ps" and similar tools. machined/machinectl
          is compile-time optional.

        * As discussed earlier, the low-level cgroup configuration
          options ControlGroup=, ControlGroupModify=,
          ControlGroupPersistent=, ControlGroupAttribute= have been
          removed. Please use high-level attribute settings instead as
          well as slice units.

        * A new bus call SetUnitProperties() has been added to alter
          various runtime parameters of a unit. This is primarily
          useful to alter cgroup parameters dynamically in a nice way,
          but will be extended later on to make more properties
          modifiable at runtime. systemctl gained a new set-properties
          command that wraps this call.

        * A new tool "systemd-run" has been added which can be used to
          run arbitrary command lines as transient services or scopes,
          while configuring a number of settings via the command
          line. This tool is currently very basic, however already
          very useful. We plan to extend this tool to even allow
          queuing of execution jobs with time triggers from the
          command line, similar in fashion to "at".

        * nspawn will now inform the user explicitly that kernels with
          audit enabled break containers, and suggest the user to turn
          off audit.

        * Support for detecting the IMA and AppArmor security
          frameworks with ConditionSecurity= has been added.

        * journalctl gained a new "-k" switch for showing only kernel
          messages, mimicking dmesg output; in addition to "--user"
          and "--system" switches for showing only user's own logs
          and system logs.

        * systemd-delta can now show information about drop-in
          snippets extending unit files.

        * libsystemd-bus has been substantially updated but is still
          not available as public API.

        * systemd will now look for the "debug" argument on the kernel
          command line and enable debug logging, similar to what
          "systemd.log_level=debug" already did before.

        * "systemctl set-default", "systemctl get-default" has been
          added to configure the default.target symlink, which
          controls what to boot into by default.

        * "systemctl set-log-level" has been added as a convenient
          way to raise and lower systemd logging threshold.

        * "systemd-analyze plot" will now show the time the various
          generators needed for execution, as well as information
          about the unit file loading.

        * libsystemd-journal gained a new sd_journal_open_files() call
          for opening specific journal files. journactl also gained a
          new switch to expose this new functionality. Previously we
          only supported opening all files from a directory, or all
          files from the system, as opening individual files only is
          racy due to journal file rotation.

        * systemd gained the new DefaultEnvironment= setting in
          /etc/systemd/system.conf to set environment variables for
          all services.

        * If a privileged process logs a journal message with the
          OBJECT_PID= field set, then journald will automatically
          augment this with additional OBJECT_UID=, OBJECT_GID=,
          OBJECT_COMM=, OBJECT_EXE=, ... fields. This is useful if
          system services want to log events about specific client
          processes. journactl/systemctl has been updated to make use
          of this information if all log messages regarding a specific
          unit is requested.

        Contributions from: Auke Kok, Chengwei Yang, Colin Walters,
        Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Albers, Daniel Wallace, Dave
        Reisner, David Coppa, David King, David Strauss, Eelco
        Dolstra, Gabriel de Perthuis, Harald Hoyer, Jan Alexander
        Steffens, Jan Engelhardt, Jan Janssen, Jason St. John, Johan
        Heikkilä, Karel Zak, Karol Lewandowski, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marius Vollmer,
        Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michael Olbrich, Michael Tremer,
        Michal Schmidt, Michał Bartoszkiewicz, Nirbheek Chauhan,
        Pierre Neidhardt, Ross Burton, Ross Lagerwall, Sean McGovern,
        Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar,
        Václav Pavlín, Zachary Cook, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek,
        Łukasz Stelmach, 장동준

CHANGES WITH 204:

        * The Python bindings gained some minimal support for the APIs
          exposed by libsystemd-logind.

        * ConditionSecurity= gained support for detecting SMACK. Since
          this condition already supports SELinux and AppArmor we only
          miss IMA for this. Patches welcome!

        Contributions from: Karol Lewandowski, Lennart Poettering,
        Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 203:

        * systemd-nspawn will now create /etc/resolv.conf if
          necessary, before bind-mounting the host's file onto it.

        * systemd-nspawn will now store meta information about a
          container on the container's cgroup as extended attribute
          fields, including the root directory.

        * The cgroup hierarchy has been reworked in many ways. All
          objects any of the components systemd creates in the cgroup
          tree are now suffixed. More specifically, user sessions are
          now placed in cgroups suffixed with ".session", users in
          cgroups suffixed with ".user", and nspawn containers in
          cgroups suffixed with ".nspawn". Furthermore, all cgroup
          names are now escaped in a simple scheme to avoid collision
          of userspace object names with kernel filenames. This work
          is preparation for making these objects relocatable in the
          cgroup tree, in order to allow easy resource partitioning of
          these objects without causing naming conflicts.

        * systemctl list-dependencies gained the new switches
          --plain, --reverse, --after and --before.

        * systemd-inhibit now shows the process name of processes that
          have taken an inhibitor lock.

        * nss-myhostname will now also resolve "localhost"
          implicitly. This makes /etc/hosts an optional file and
          nicely handles that on IPv6 ::1 maps to both "localhost" and
          the local hostname.

        * libsystemd-logind.so gained a new call
          sd_get_machine_names() to enumerate running containers and
          VMs (currently only supported by very new libvirt and
          nspawn). sd_login_monitor can now be used to watch
          VMs/containers coming and going.

        * .include is not allowed recursively anymore, and only in
          unit files. Usually it is better to use drop-in snippets in
          .d/*.conf anyway, as introduced with systemd 198.

        * systemd-analyze gained a new "critical-chain" command that
          determines the slowest chain of units run during system
          boot-up. It is very useful for tracking down where
          optimizing boot time is the most beneficial.

        * systemd will no longer allow manipulating service paths in
          the name=systemd:/system cgroup tree using ControlGroup= in
          units. (But is still fine with it in all other dirs.)

        * There's a new systemd-nspawn@.service service file that may
          be used to easily run nspawn containers as system
          services. With the container's root directory in
          /var/lib/container/foobar it is now sufficient to run
          "systemctl start systemd-nspawn@foobar.service" to boot it.

        * systemd-cgls gained a new parameter "--machine" to list only
          the processes within a certain container.

        * ConditionSecurity= now can check for "apparmor". We still
          are lacking checks for SMACK and IMA for this condition
          check though. Patches welcome!

        * A new configuration file /etc/systemd/sleep.conf has been
          added that may be used to configure which kernel operation
          systemd is supposed to execute when "suspend", "hibernate"
          or "hybrid-sleep" is requested. This makes the new kernel
          "freeze" state accessible to the user.

        * ENV{SYSTEMD_WANTS} in udev rules will now implicitly escape
          the passed argument if applicable.

        Contributions from: Auke Kok, Colin Guthrie, Colin Walters,
        Cristian Rodríguez, Daniel Buch, Daniel Wallace, Dave Reisner,
        Evangelos Foutras, Greg Kroah-Hartman, Harald Hoyer, Josh
        Triplett, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn,
        MUNEDA Takahiro, Mantas Mikulėnas, Mirco Tischler, Nathaniel
        Chen, Nirbheek Chauhan, Ronny Chevalier, Ross Lagerwall, Tom
        Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar, Ville Skyttä, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 202:

        * The output of 'systemctl list-jobs' got some polishing. The
          '--type=' argument may now be passed more than once. A new
          command 'systemctl list-sockets' has been added which shows
          a list of kernel sockets systemd is listening on with the
          socket units they belong to, plus the units these socket
          units activate.

        * The experimental libsystemd-bus library got substantial
          updates to work in conjunction with the (also experimental)
          kdbus kernel project. It works well enough to exchange
          messages with some sophistication. Note that kdbus is not
          ready yet, and the library is mostly an elaborate test case
          for now, and not installable.

        * systemd gained a new unit 'systemd-static-nodes.service'
          that generates static device nodes earlier during boot, and
          can run in conjunction with udev.

        * libsystemd-login gained a new call sd_pid_get_user_unit()
          to retrieve the user systemd unit a process is running
          in. This is useful for systems where systemd is used as
          session manager.

        * systemd-nspawn now places all containers in the new /machine
          top-level cgroup directory in the name=systemd
          hierarchy. libvirt will soon do the same, so that we get a
          uniform separation of /system, /user and /machine for system
          services, user processes and containers/virtual
          machines. This new cgroup hierarchy is also useful to stick
          stable names to specific container instances, which can be
          recognized later this way (this name may be controlled
          via systemd-nspawn's new -M switch). libsystemd-login also
          gained a new call sd_pid_get_machine_name() to retrieve the
          name of the container/VM a specific process belongs to.

        * bootchart can now store its data in the journal.

        * libsystemd-journal gained a new call
          sd_journal_add_conjunction() for AND expressions to the
          matching logic. This can be used to express more complex
          logical expressions.

        * journactl can now take multiple --unit= and --user-unit=
          switches.

        * The cryptsetup logic now understands the "luks.key=" kernel
          command line switch for specifying a file to read the
          decryption key from. Also, if a configured key file is not
          found the tool will now automatically fall back to prompting
          the user.

        * Python systemd.journal module was updated to wrap recently
          added functions from libsystemd-journal. The interface was
          changed to bring the low level interface in s.j._Reader
          closer to the C API, and the high level interface in
          s.j.Reader was updated to wrap and convert all data about
          an entry.

        Contributions from: Anatol Pomozov, Auke Kok, Harald Hoyer,
        Henrik Grindal Bakken, Josh Triplett, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas Marius Vollmer,
        Martin Jansa, Martin Pitt, Michael Biebl, Michal Schmidt,
        Mirco Tischler, Pali Rohar, Simon Peeters, Steven Hiscocks,
        Tom Gundersen, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 201:

        * journalctl --update-catalog now understands a new --root=
          option to operate on catalogs found in a different root
          directory.

        * During shutdown after systemd has terminated all running
          services a final killing loop kills all remaining left-over
          processes. We will now print the name of these processes
          when we send SIGKILL to them, since this usually indicates a
          problem.

        * If /etc/crypttab refers to password files stored on
          configured mount points automatic dependencies will now be
          generated to ensure the specific mount is established first
          before the key file is attempted to be read.

        * 'systemctl status' will now show information about the
          network sockets a socket unit is listening on.

        * 'systemctl status' will also shown information about any
          drop-in configuration file for units. (Drop-In configuration
          files in this context are files such as
          /etc/systemd/systemd/foobar.service.d/*.conf)

        * systemd-cgtop now optionally shows summed up CPU times of
          cgroups. Press '%' while running cgtop to switch between
          percentage and absolute mode. This is useful to determine
          which cgroups use up the most CPU time over the entire
          runtime of the system. systemd-cgtop has also been updated
          to be 'pipeable' for processing with further shell tools.

        * 'hostnamectl set-hostname' will now allow setting of FQDN
          hostnames.

        * The formatting and parsing of time span values has been
          changed. The parser now understands fractional expressions
          such as "5.5h". The formatter will now output fractional
          expressions for all time spans under 1min, i.e. "5.123456s"
          rather than "5s 123ms 456us". For time spans under 1s
          millisecond values are shown, for those under 1ms
          microsecond values are shown. This should greatly improve
          all time-related output of systemd.

        * libsystemd-login and libsystemd-journal gained new
          functions for querying the poll() events mask and poll()
          timeout value for integration into arbitrary event
          loops.

        * localectl gained the ability to list available X11 keymaps
          (models, layouts, variants, options).

        * 'systemd-analyze dot' gained the ability to filter for
          specific units via shell-style globs, to create smaller,
          more useful graphs. I.e. it is now possible to create simple
          graphs of all the dependencies between only target units, or
          of all units that Avahi has dependencies with.

        Contributions from: Cristian Rodríguez, Dr. Tilmann Bubeck,
        Harald Hoyer, Holger Hans Peter Freyther, Kay Sievers, Kelly
        Anderson, Koen Kooi, Lennart Poettering, Maksim Melnikau,
        Marc-Antoine Perennou, Marius Vollmer, Martin Pitt, Michal
        Schmidt, Oleksii Shevchuk, Ronny Chevalier, Simon McVittie,
        Steven Hiscocks, Thomas Weißschuh, Umut Tezduyar, Václav
        Pavlín, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek, Łukasz Stelmach

CHANGES WITH 200:

        * The boot-time readahead implementation for rotating media
          will now read the read-ahead data in multiple passes which
          consist of all read requests made in equidistant time
          intervals. This means instead of strictly reading read-ahead
          data in its physical order on disk we now try to find a
          middle ground between physical and access time order.

        * /etc/os-release files gained a new BUILD_ID= field for usage
          on operating systems that provide continuous builds of OS
          images.

        Contributions from: Auke Kok, Eelco Dolstra, Kay Sievers,
        Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Martin Pitt, Václav Pavlín
        William Douglas, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 199:

        * systemd-python gained an API exposing libsystemd-daemon.

        * The SMACK setup logic gained support for uploading CIPSO
          security policy.

        * Behaviour of PrivateTmp=, ReadWriteDirectories=,
          ReadOnlyDirectories= and InaccessibleDirectories= has
          changed. The private /tmp and /var/tmp directories are now
          shared by all processes of a service (which means
          ExecStartPre= may now leave data in /tmp that ExecStart= of
          the same service can still access). When a service is
          stopped its temporary directories are immediately deleted
          (normal clean-up with tmpfiles is still done in addition to
          this though).

        * By default, systemd will now set a couple of sysctl
          variables in the kernel: the safe sysrq options are turned
          on, IP route verification is turned on, and source routing
          disabled. The recently added hardlink and softlink
          protection of the kernel is turned on. These settings should
          be reasonably safe, and good defaults for all new systems.

        * The predictable network naming logic may now be turned off
          with a new kernel command line switch: net.ifnames=0.

        * A new libsystemd-bus module has been added that implements a
          pretty complete D-Bus client library. For details see:

          http://lists.freedesktop.org/archives/systemd-devel/2013-March/009797.html

        * journald will now explicitly flush the journal files to disk
          at the latest 5min after each write. The file will then also
          be marked offline until the next write. This should increase
          reliability in case of a crash. The synchronization delay
          can be configured via SyncIntervalSec= in journald.conf.

        * There's a new remote-fs-setup.target unit that can be used
          to pull in specific services when at least one remote file
          system is to be mounted.

        * There are new targets timers.target and paths.target as
          canonical targets to pull user timer and path units in
          from. This complements sockets.target with a similar
          purpose for socket units.

        * libudev gained a new call udev_device_set_attribute_value()
          to set sysfs attributes of a device.

        * The udev daemon now sets the default number of worker
          processes executed in parallel based on the number of available
          CPUs instead of the amount of available RAM. This is supposed
          to provide a more reliable default and limit a too aggressive
          paralellism for setups with 1000s of devices connected.

        Contributions from: Auke Kok, Colin Walters, Cristian
        Rodríguez, Daniel Buch, Dave Reisner, Frederic Crozat, Hannes
        Reinecke, Harald Hoyer, Jan Alexander Steffens, Jan
        Engelhardt, Josh Triplett, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering,
        Mantas Mikulėnas, Martin Pitt, Mathieu Bridon, Michael Biebl,
        Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Miklos Vajna, Nathaniel Chen,
        Oleksii Shevchuk, Ozan Çağlayan, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel
        Andersen, Tollef Fog Heen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar,
        Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 198:

        * Configuration of unit files may now be extended via drop-in
          files without having to edit/override the unit files
          themselves. More specifically, if the administrator wants to
          change one value for a service file foobar.service he can
          now do so by dropping in a configuration snippet into
          /etc/systemd/system/foobar.service.d/*.conf. The unit logic
          will load all these snippets and apply them on top of the
          main unit configuration file, possibly extending or
          overriding its settings. Using these drop-in snippets is
          generally nicer than the two earlier options for changing
          unit files locally: copying the files from
          /usr/lib/systemd/system/ to /etc/systemd/system/ and editing
          them there; or creating a new file in /etc/systemd/system/
          that incorporates the original one via ".include". Drop-in
          snippets into these .d/ directories can be placed in any
          directory systemd looks for units in, and the usual
          overriding semantics between /usr/lib, /etc and /run apply
          for them too.

        * Most unit file settings which take lists of items can now be
          reset by assigning the empty string to them. For example,
          normally, settings such as Environment=FOO=BAR append a new
          environment variable assignment to the environment block,
          each time they are used. By assigning Environment= the empty
          string the environment block can be reset to empty. This is
          particularly useful with the .d/*.conf drop-in snippets
          mentioned above, since this adds the ability to reset list
          settings from vendor unit files via these drop-ins.

        * systemctl gained a new "list-dependencies" command for
          listing the dependencies of a unit recursively.

        * Inhibitors are now honored and listed by "systemctl
          suspend", "systemctl poweroff" (and similar) too, not only
          GNOME. These commands will also list active sessions by
          other users.

        * Resource limits (as exposed by the various control group
          controllers) can now be controlled dynamically at runtime
          for all units. More specifically, you can now use a command
          like "systemctl set-cgroup-attr foobar.service cpu.shares
          2000" to alter the CPU shares a specific service gets. These
          settings are stored persistently on disk, and thus allow the
          administrator to easily adjust the resource usage of
          services with a few simple commands. This dynamic resource
          management logic is also available to other programs via the
          bus. Almost any kernel cgroup attribute and controller is
          supported.

        * systemd-vconsole-setup will now copy all font settings to
          all allocated VTs, where it previously applied them only to
          the foreground VT.

        * libsystemd-login gained the new sd_session_get_tty() API
          call.

        * This release drops support for a few legacy or
          distribution-specific LSB facility names when parsing init
          scripts: $x-display-manager, $mail-transfer-agent,
          $mail-transport-agent, $mail-transfer-agent, $smtp,
          $null. Also, the mail-transfer-agent.target unit backing
          this has been removed. Distributions which want to retain
          compatibility with this should carry the burden for
          supporting this themselves and patch support for these back
          in, if they really need to. Also, the facilities $syslog and
          $local_fs are now ignored, since systemd does not support
          early-boot LSB init scripts anymore, and these facilities
          are implied anyway for normal services. syslog.target has
          also been removed.

        * There are new bus calls on PID1's Manager object for
          cancelling jobs, and removing snapshot units. Previously,
          both calls were only available on the Job and Snapshot
          objects themselves.

        * systemd-journal-gatewayd gained SSL support.

        * The various "environment" files, such as /etc/locale.conf
          now support continuation lines with a backslash ("\") as
          last character in the line, similarly in style (but different)
          to how this is supported in shells.

        * For normal user processes the _SYSTEMD_USER_UNIT= field is
          now implicitly appended to every log entry logged. systemctl
          has been updated to filter by this field when operating on a
          user systemd instance.

        * nspawn will now implicitly add the CAP_AUDIT_WRITE and
          CAP_AUDIT_CONTROL capabilities to the capabilities set for
          the container. This makes it easier to boot unmodified
          Fedora systems in a container, which however still requires
          audit=0 to be passed on the kernel command line. Auditing in
          kernel and userspace is unfortunately still too broken in
          context of containers, hence we recommend compiling it out
          of the kernel or using audit=0. Hopefully this will be fixed
          one day for good in the kernel.

        * nspawn gained the new --bind= and --bind-ro= parameters to
          bind mount specific directories from the host into the
          container.

        * nspawn will now mount its own devpts file system instance
          into the container, in order not to leak pty devices from
          the host into the container.

        * systemd will now read the firmware boot time performance
          information from the EFI variables, if the used boot loader
          supports this, and takes it into account for boot performance
          analysis via "systemd-analyze". This is currently supported
          only in conjunction with Gummiboot, but could be supported
          by other boot loaders too. For details see:

          http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Software/systemd/BootLoaderInterface

        * A new generator has been added that automatically mounts the
          EFI System Partition (ESP) to /boot, if that directory
          exists, is empty, and no other file system has been
          configured to be mounted there.

        * logind will now send out PrepareForSleep(false) out
          unconditionally, after coming back from suspend. This may be
          used by applications as asynchronous notification for
          system resume events.

        * "systemctl unlock-sessions" has been added, that allows
          unlocking the screens of all user sessions at once, similar
          to how "systemctl lock-sessions" already locked all users
          sessions. This is backed by a new D-Bus call UnlockSessions().

        * "loginctl seat-status" will now show the master device of a
          seat. (i.e. the device of a seat that needs to be around for
          the seat to be considered available, usually the graphics
          card).

        * tmpfiles gained a new "X" line type, that allows
          configuration of files and directories (with wildcards) that
          shall be excluded from automatic cleanup ("aging").

        * udev default rules set the device node permissions now only
          at "add" events, and do not change them any longer with a
          later "change" event.

        * The log messages for lid events and power/sleep keypresses
          now carry a message ID.

        * We now have a substantially larger unit test suite, but this
          continues to be work in progress.

        * udevadm hwdb gained a new --root= parameter to change the
          root directory to operate relative to.

        * logind will now issue a background sync() request to the kernel
          early at shutdown, so that dirty buffers are flushed to disk early
          instead of at the last moment, in order to optimize shutdown
          times a little.

        * A new bootctl tool has been added that is an interface for
          certain boot loader operations. This is currently a preview
          and is likely to be extended into a small mechanism daemon
          like timedated, localed, hostnamed, and can be used by
          graphical UIs to enumerate available boot options, and
          request boot into firmware operations.

        * systemd-bootchart has been relicensed to LGPLv2.1+ to match
          the rest of the package. It also has been updated to work
          correctly in initrds.

        * Policykit previously has been runtime optional, and is now
          also compile time optional via a configure switch.

        * systemd-analyze has been reimplemented in C. Also "systemctl
          dot" has moved into systemd-analyze.

        * "systemctl status" with no further parameters will now print
          the status of all active or failed units.

        * Operations such as "systemctl start" can now be executed
          with a new mode "--irreversible" which may be used to queue
          operations that cannot accidentally be reversed by a later
          job queuing. This is by default used to make shutdown
          requests more robust.

        * The Python API of systemd now gained a new module for
          reading journal files.

        * A new tool kernel-install has been added that can install
          kernel images according to the Boot Loader Specification:

          http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Specifications/BootLoaderSpec

        * Boot time console output has been improved to provide
          animated boot time output for hanging jobs.

        * A new tool systemd-activate has been added which can be used
          to test socket activation with, directly from the command
          line. This should make it much easier to test and debug
          socket activation in daemons.

        * journalctl gained a new "--reverse" (or -r) option to show
          journal output in reverse order (i.e. newest line first).

        * journalctl gained a new "--pager-end" (or -e) option to jump
          to immediately jump to the end of the journal in the
          pager. This is only supported in conjunction with "less".

        * journalctl gained a new "--user-unit=" option, that works
          similarly to "--unit=" but filters for user units rather than
          system units.

        * A number of unit files to ease adoption of systemd in
          initrds has been added. This moves some minimal logic from
          the various initrd implementations into systemd proper.

        * The journal files are now owned by a new group
          "systemd-journal", which exists specifically to allow access
          to the journal, and nothing else. Previously, we used the
          "adm" group for that, which however possibly covers more
          than just journal/log file access. This new group is now
          already used by systemd-journal-gatewayd to ensure this
          daemon gets access to the journal files and as little else
          as possible. Note that "make install" will also set FS ACLs
          up for /var/log/journal to give "adm" and "wheel" read
          access to it, in addition to "systemd-journal" which owns
          the journal files. We recommend that packaging scripts also
          add read access to "adm" + "wheel" to /var/log/journal, and
          all existing/future journal files. To normal users and
          administrators little changes, however packagers need to
          ensure to create the "systemd-journal" system group at
          package installation time.

        * The systemd-journal-gatewayd now runs as unprivileged user
          systemd-journal-gateway:systemd-journal-gateway. Packaging
          scripts need to create these system user/group at
          installation time.

        * timedated now exposes a new boolean property CanNTP that
          indicates whether a local NTP service is available or not.

        * systemd-detect-virt will now also detect xen PVs

        * The pstore file system is now mounted by default, if it is
          available.

        * In addition to the SELinux and IMA policies we will now also
          load SMACK policies at early boot.

        Contributions from: Adel Gadllah, Aleksander Morgado, Auke
        Kok, Ayan George, Bastien Nocera, Colin Walters, Daniel Buch,
        Daniel Wallace, Dave Reisner, David Herrmann, David Strauss,
        Eelco Dolstra, Enrico Scholz, Frederic Crozat, Harald Hoyer,
        Jan Janssen, Jonathan Callen, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering,
        Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marc-Antoine Perennou, Martin
        Pitt, Mauro Dreissig, Max F. Albrecht, Michael Biebl, Michael
        Olbrich, Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Michal Vyskocil,
        Michał Bartoszkiewicz, Mirco Tischler, Nathaniel Chen, Nestor
        Ovroy, Oleksii Shevchuk, Paul W. Frields, Piotr Drąg, Rob
        Clark, Ryan Lortie, Simon McVittie, Simon Peeters, Steven
        Hiscocks, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tollef Fog Heen, Tom
        Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar, William Giokas, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek, Zeeshan Ali (Khattak)

CHANGES WITH 197:

        * Timer units now support calendar time events in addition to
          monotonic time events. That means you can now trigger a unit
          based on a calendar time specification such as "Thu,Fri
          2013-*-1,5 11:12:13" which refers to 11:12:13 of the first
          or fifth day of any month of the year 2013, given that it is
          a thursday or friday. This brings timer event support
          considerably closer to cron's capabilities. For details on
          the supported calendar time specification language see
          systemd.time(7).

        * udev now supports a number of different naming policies for
          network interfaces for predictable names, and a combination
          of these policies is now the default. Please see this wiki
          document for details:

          http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Software/systemd/PredictableNetworkInterfaceNames

        * Auke Kok's bootchart implementation has been added to the
          systemd tree. It is an optional component that can graph the
          boot in quite some detail. It is one of the best bootchart
          implementations around and minimal in its code and
          dependencies.

        * nss-myhostname has been integrated into the systemd source
          tree. nss-myhostname guarantees that the local hostname
          always stays resolvable via NSS. It has been a weak
          requirement of systemd-hostnamed since a long time, and
          since its code is actually trivial we decided to just
          include it in systemd's source tree. It can be turned off
          with a configure switch.

        * The read-ahead logic is now capable of properly detecting
          whether a btrfs file system is on SSD or rotating media, in
          order to optimize the read-ahead scheme. Previously, it was
          only capable of detecting this on traditional file systems
          such as ext4.

        * In udev, additional device properties are now read from the
          IAB in addition to the OUI database. Also, Bluetooth company
          identities are attached to the devices as well.

        * In service files %U may be used as specifier that is
          replaced by the configured user name of the service.

        * nspawn may now be invoked without a controlling TTY. This
          makes it suitable for invocation as its own service. This
          may be used to set up a simple containerized server system
          using only core OS tools.

        * systemd and nspawn can now accept socket file descriptors
          when they are started for socket activation. This enables
          implementation of socket activated nspawn
          containers. i.e. think about autospawning an entire OS image
          when the first SSH or HTTP connection is received. We expect
          that similar functionality will also be added to libvirt-lxc
          eventually.

        * journalctl will now suppress ANSI color codes when
          presenting log data.

        * systemctl will no longer show control group information for
          a unit if a the control group is empty anyway.

        * logind can now automatically suspend/hibernate/shutdown the
          system on idle.

        * /etc/machine-info and hostnamed now also expose the chassis
          type of the system. This can be used to determine whether
          the local system is a laptop, desktop, handset or
          tablet. This information may either be configured by the
          user/vendor or is automatically determined from ACPI and DMI
          information if possible.

        * A number of PolicyKit actions are now bound together with
          "imply" rules. This should simplify creating UIs because
          many actions will now authenticate similar ones as well.

        * Unit files learnt a new condition ConditionACPower= which
          may be used to conditionalize a unit depending on whether an
          AC power source is connected or not, of whether the system
          is running on battery power.

        * systemctl gained a new "is-failed" verb that may be used in
          shell scripts and suchlike to check whether a specific unit
          is in the "failed" state.

        * The EnvironmentFile= setting in unit files now supports file
          globbing, and can hence be used to easily read a number of
          environment files at once.

        * systemd will no longer detect and recognize specific
          distributions. All distribution-specific #ifdeffery has been
          removed, systemd is now fully generic and
          distribution-agnostic. Effectively, not too much is lost as
          a lot of the code is still accessible via explicit configure
          switches. However, support for some distribution specific
          legacy configuration file formats has been dropped. We
          recommend distributions to simply adopt the configuration
          files everybody else uses now and convert the old
          configuration from packaging scripts. Most distributions
          already did that. If that's not possible or desirable,
          distributions are welcome to forward port the specific
          pieces of code locally from the git history.

        * When logging a message about a unit systemd will now always
          log the unit name in the message meta data.

        * localectl will now also discover system locale data that is
          not stored in locale archives, but directly unpacked.

        * logind will no longer unconditionally use framebuffer
          devices as seat masters, i.e. as devices that are required
          to be existing before a seat is considered preset. Instead,
          it will now look for all devices that are tagged as
          "seat-master" in udev. By default, framebuffer devices will
          be marked as such, but depending on local systems, other
          devices might be marked as well. This may be used to
          integrate graphics cards using closed source drivers (such
          as NVidia ones) more nicely into logind. Note however, that
          we recommend using the open source NVidia drivers instead,
          and no udev rules for the closed-source drivers will be
          shipped from us upstream.

        Contributions from: Adam Williamson, Alessandro Crismani, Auke
        Kok, Colin Walters, Daniel Wallace, Dave Reisner, David
        Herrmann, David Strauss, Dimitrios Apostolou, Eelco Dolstra,
        Eric Benoit, Giovanni Campagna, Hannes Reinecke, Henrik
        Grindal Bakken, Hermann Gausterer, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas, Marcel Holtmann,
        Martin Pitt, Matthew Monaco, Michael Biebl, Michael Terry,
        Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Michał Bartoszkiewicz, Oleg
        Samarin, Pekka Lundstrom, Philip Nilsson, Ramkumar
        Ramachandra, Richard Yao, Robert Millan, Sami Kerola, Shawn
        Landden, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Thomas Jarosch,
        Tollef Fog Heen, Tom Gundersen, Umut Tezduyar, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 196:

        * udev gained support for loading additional device properties
          from an indexed database that is keyed by vendor/product IDs
          and similar device identifiers. For the beginning this
          "hwdb" is populated with data from the well-known PCI and
          USB database, but also includes PNP, ACPI and OID data. In
          the longer run this indexed database shall grow into
          becoming the one central database for non-essential
          userspace device metadata. Previously, data from the PCI/USB
          database was only attached to select devices, since the
          lookup was a relatively expensive operation due to O(n) time
          complexity (with n being the number of entries in the
          database). Since this is now O(1), we decided to add in this
          data for all devices where this is available, by
          default. Note that the indexed database needs to be rebuilt
          when new data files are installed. To achieve this you need
          to update your packaging scripts to invoke "udevadm hwdb
          --update" after installation of hwdb data files. For
          RPM-based distributions we introduced the new
          %udev_hwdb_update macro for this purpose.

        * The Journal gained support for the "Message Catalog", an
          indexed database to link up additional information with
          journal entries. For further details please check:

          http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Software/systemd/catalog

          The indexed message catalog database also needs to be
          rebuilt after installation of message catalog files. Use
          "journalctl --update-catalog" for this. For RPM-based
          distributions we introduced the %journal_catalog_update
          macro for this purpose.

        * The Python Journal bindings gained support for the standard
          Python logging framework.

        * The Journal API gained new functions for checking whether
          the underlying file system of a journal file is capable of
          properly reporting file change notifications, or whether
          applications that want to reflect journal changes "live"
          need to recheck journal files continuously in appropriate
          time intervals.

        * It is now possible to set the "age" field for tmpfiles
          entries to 0, indicating that files matching this entry
          shall always be removed when the directories are cleaned up.

        * coredumpctl gained a new "gdb" verb which invokes gdb
          right-away on the selected coredump.

        * There's now support for "hybrid sleep" on kernels that
          support this, in addition to "suspend" and "hibernate". Use
          "systemctl hybrid-sleep" to make use of this.

        * logind's HandleSuspendKey= setting (and related settings)
          now gained support for a new "lock" setting to simply
          request the screen lock on all local sessions, instead of
          actually executing a suspend or hibernation.

        * systemd will now mount the EFI variables file system by
          default.

        * Socket units now gained support for configuration of the
          SMACK security label.

        * timedatectl will now output the time of the last and next
          daylight saving change.

        * We dropped support for various legacy and distro-specific
          concepts, such as insserv, early-boot SysV services
          (i.e. those for non-standard runlevels such as 'b' or 'S')
          or ArchLinux /etc/rc.conf support. We recommend the
          distributions who still need support this to either continue
          to maintain the necessary patches downstream, or find a
          different solution. (Talk to us if you have questions!)

        * Various systemd components will now bypass PolicyKit checks
          for root and otherwise handle properly if PolicyKit is not
          found to be around. This should fix most issues for
          PolicyKit-less systems. Quite frankly this should have been
          this way since day one. It is absolutely our intention to
          make systemd work fine on PolicyKit-less systems, and we
          consider it a bug if something does not work as it should if
          PolicyKit is not around.

        * For embedded systems it is now possible to build udev and
          systemd without blkid and/or kmod support.

        * "systemctl switch-root" is now capable of switching root
          more than once. I.e. in addition to transitions from the
          initrd to the host OS it is now possible to transition to
          further OS images from the host. This is useful to implement
          offline updating tools.

        * Various other additions have been made to the RPM macros
          shipped with systemd. Use %udev_rules_update() after
          installing new udev rules files. %_udevhwdbdir,
          %_udevrulesdir, %_journalcatalogdir, %_tmpfilesdir,
          %_sysctldir are now available which resolve to the right
          directories for packages to place various data files in.

        * journalctl gained the new --full switch (in addition to
          --all, to disable ellipsation for long messages.

        Contributions from: Anders Olofsson, Auke Kok, Ben Boeckel,
        Colin Walters, Cosimo Cecchi, Daniel Wallace, Dave Reisner,
        Eelco Dolstra, Holger Hans Peter Freyther, Kay Sievers,
        Chun-Yi Lee, Lekensteyn, Lennart Poettering, Mantas Mikulėnas,
        Marti Raudsepp, Martin Pitt, Mauro Dreissig, Michael Biebl,
        Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Miklos Vajna, Nis Martensen,
        Oleksii Shevchuk, Olivier Brunel, Ramkumar Ramachandra, Thomas
        Bächler, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen, Tony
        Camuso, Umut Tezduyar, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 195:

        * journalctl gained new --since= and --until= switches to
          filter by time. It also now supports nice filtering for
          units via --unit=/-u.

        * Type=oneshot services may use ExecReload= and do the
          right thing.

        * The journal daemon now supports time-based rotation and
          vacuuming, in addition to the usual disk-space based
          rotation.

        * The journal will now index the available field values for
          each field name. This enables clients to show pretty drop
          downs of available match values when filtering. The bash
          completion of journalctl has been updated
          accordingly. journalctl gained a new switch -F to list all
          values a certain field takes in the journal database.

        * More service events are now written as structured messages
          to the journal, and made recognizable via message IDs.

        * The timedated, localed and hostnamed mini-services which
          previously only provided support for changing time, locale
          and hostname settings from graphical DEs such as GNOME now
          also have a minimal (but very useful) text-based client
          utility each. This is probably the nicest way to changing
          these settings from the command line now, especially since
          it lists available options and is fully integrated with bash
          completion.

        * There's now a new tool "systemd-coredumpctl" to list and
          extract coredumps from the journal.

        * We now install a README each in /var/log/ and
          /etc/rc.d/init.d explaining where the system logs and init
          scripts went. This hopefully should help folks who go to
          that dirs and look into the otherwise now empty void and
          scratch their heads.

        * When user-services are invoked (by systemd --user) the
          $MANAGERPID env var is set to the PID of systemd.

        * SIGRTMIN+24 when sent to a --user instance will now result
          in immediate termination of systemd.

        * gatewayd received numerous feature additions such as a
          "follow" mode, for live syncing and filtering.

        * browse.html now allows filtering and showing detailed
          information on specific entries. Keyboard navigation and
          mouse screen support has been added.

        * gatewayd/journalctl now supports HTML5/JSON
          Server-Sent-Events as output.

        * The SysV init script compatibility logic will now
          heuristically determine whether a script supports the
          "reload" verb, and only then make this available as
          "systemctl reload".

        * "systemctl status --follow" has been removed, use "journalctl
          -u" instead.

        * journald.conf's RuntimeMinSize=, PersistentMinSize= settings
          have been removed since they are hardly useful to be
          configured.

        * And I'd like to take the opportunity to specifically mention
          Zbigniew for his great contributions. Zbigniew, you rock!

        Contributions from: Andrew Eikum, Christian Hesse, Colin
        Guthrie, Daniel J Walsh, Dave Reisner, Eelco Dolstra, Ferenc
        Wágner, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas
        Mikulėnas, Martin Mikkelsen, Martin Pitt, Michael Olbrich,
        Michael Stapelberg, Michal Schmidt, Sebastian Ott, Thomas
        Bächler, Umut Tezduyar, Will Woods, Wulf C. Krueger, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek, Сковорода Никита Андреевич

CHANGES WITH 194:

        * If /etc/vconsole.conf is non-existent or empty we will no
          longer load any console font or key map at boot by
          default. Instead the kernel defaults will be left
          intact. This is definitely the right thing to do, as no
          configuration should mean no configuration, and hard-coding
          font names that are different on all archs is probably a bad
          idea. Also, the kernel default key map and font should be
          good enough for most cases anyway, and mostly identical to
          the userspace fonts/key maps we previously overloaded them
          with. If distributions want to continue to default to a
          non-kernel font or key map they should ship a default
          /etc/vconsole.conf with the appropriate contents.

        Contributions from: Colin Walters, Daniel J Walsh, Dave
        Reisner, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Tollef
        Fog Heen, Tom Gundersen, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 193:

        * journalctl gained a new --cursor= switch to show entries
          starting from the specified location in the journal.

        * We now enforce a size limit on journal entry fields exported
          with "-o json" in journalctl. Fields larger than 4K will be
          assigned null. This can be turned off with --all.

        * An (optional) journal gateway daemon is now available as
          "systemd-journal-gatewayd.service". This service provides
          access to the journal via HTTP and JSON. This functionality
          will be used to implement live log synchronization in both
          pull and push modes, but has various other users too, such
          as easy log access for debugging of embedded devices. Right
          now it is already useful to retrieve the journal via HTTP:

          # systemctl start systemd-journal-gatewayd.service
          # wget http://localhost:19531/entries

          This will download the journal contents in a
          /var/log/messages compatible format. The same as JSON:

          # curl -H"Accept: application/json" http://localhost:19531/entries

          This service is also accessible via a web browser where a
          single static HTML5 app is served that uses the JSON logic
          to enable the user to do some basic browsing of the
          journal. This will be extended later on. Here's an example
          screenshot of this app in its current state:

          http://0pointer.de/public/journal-gatewayd

        Contributions from: Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Robert
        Milasan, Tom Gundersen

CHANGES WITH 192:

        * The bash completion logic is now available for journalctl
          too.

        * We do not mount the "cpuset" controller anymore together with
          "cpu" and "cpuacct", as "cpuset" groups generally cannot be
          started if no parameters are assigned to it. "cpuset" hence
          broke code that assumed it it could create "cpu" groups and
          just start them.

        * journalctl -f will now subscribe to terminal size changes,
          and line break accordingly.

        Contributions from: Dave Reisner, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykrynm, Mirco Tischler, Václav Pavlín

CHANGES WITH 191:

        * nspawn will now create a symlink /etc/localtime in the
          container environment, copying the host's timezone
          setting. Previously this has been done via a bind mount, but
          since symlinks cannot be bind mounted this has now been
          changed to create/update the appropriate symlink.

        * journalctl -n's line number argument is now optional, and
          will default to 10 if omitted.

        * journald will now log the maximum size the journal files may
          take up on disk. This is particularly useful if the default
          built-in logic of determining this parameter from the file
          system size is used. Use "systemctl status
          systemd-journald.service" to see this information.

        * The multi-seat X wrapper tool has been stripped down. As X
          is now capable of enumerating graphics devices via udev in a
          seat-aware way the wrapper is not strictly necessary
          anymore. A stripped down temporary stop-gap is still shipped
          until the upstream display managers have been updated to
          fully support the new X logic. Expect this wrapper to be
          removed entirely in one of the next releases.

        * HandleSleepKey= in logind.conf has been split up into
          HandleSuspendKey= and HandleHibernateKey=. The old setting
          is not available anymore. X11 and the kernel are
          distinguishing between these keys and we should too. This
          also means the inhibition lock for these keys has been split
          into two.

        Contributions from: Dave Airlie, Eelco Dolstra, Lennart
        Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Václav Pavlín

CHANGES WITH 190:

        * Whenever a unit changes state we will now log this to the
          journal and show along the unit's own log output in
          "systemctl status".

        * ConditionPathIsMountPoint= can now properly detect bind
          mount points too. (Previously, a bind mount of one file
          system to another place in the same file system could not be
          detected as mount, since they shared struct stat's st_dev
          field.)

        * We will now mount the cgroup controllers cpu, cpuacct,
          cpuset and the controllers net_cls, net_prio together by
          default.

        * nspawn containers will now have a virtualized boot
          ID. (i.e. /proc/sys/kernel/random/boot_id is now mounted
          over with a randomized ID at container initialization). This
          has the effect of making "journalctl -b" do the right thing
          in a container.

        * The JSON output journal serialization has been updated not
          to generate "endless" list objects anymore, but rather one
          JSON object per line. This is more in line how most JSON
          parsers expect JSON objects. The new output mode
          "json-pretty" has been added to provide similar output, but
          neatly aligned for readability by humans.

        * We dropped all explicit sync() invocations in the shutdown
          code. The kernel does this implicitly anyway in the kernel
          reboot() syscall. halt(8)'s -n option is now a compatibility
          no-op.

        * We now support virtualized reboot() in containers, as
          supported by newer kernels. We will fall back to exit() if
          CAP_SYS_REBOOT is not available to the container. Also,
          nspawn makes use of this now and will actually reboot the
          container if the containerized OS asks for that.

        * journalctl will only show local log output by default
          now. Use --merge (-m) to show remote log output, too.

        * libsystemd-journal gained the new sd_journal_get_usage()
          call to determine the current disk usage of all journal
          files. This is exposed in the new "journalctl --disk-usage"
          command.

        * journald gained a new configuration setting SplitMode= in
          journald.conf which may be used to control how user journals
          are split off. See journald.conf(5) for details.

        * A new condition type ConditionFileNotEmpty= has been added.

        * tmpfiles' "w" lines now support file globbing, to write
          multiple files at once.

        * We added Python bindings for the journal submission
          APIs. More Python APIs for a number of selected APIs will
          likely follow. Note that we intend to add native bindings
          only for the Python language, as we consider it common
          enough to deserve bindings shipped within systemd. There are
          various projects outside of systemd that provide bindings
          for languages such as PHP or Lua.

        * Many conditions will now resolve specifiers such as %i. In
          addition, PathChanged= and related directives of .path units
          now support specifiers as well.

        * There's now a new RPM macro definition for the system preset
          dir: %_presetdir.

        * journald will now warn if it ca not forward a message to the
          syslog daemon because its socket is full.

        * timedated will no longer write or process /etc/timezone,
          except on Debian. As we do not support late mounted /usr
          anymore /etc/localtime always being a symlink is now safe,
          and hence the information in /etc/timezone is not necessary
          anymore.

        * logind will now always reserve one VT for a text getty (VT6
          by default). Previously if more than 6 X sessions where
          started they took up all the VTs with auto-spawned gettys,
          so that no text gettys were available anymore.

        * udev will now automatically inform the btrfs kernel logic
          about btrfs RAID components showing up. This should make
          simple hotplug based btrfs RAID assembly work.

        * PID 1 will now increase its RLIMIT_NOFILE to 64K by default
          (but not for its children which will stay at the kernel
          default). This should allow setups with a lot more listening
          sockets.

        * systemd will now always pass the configured timezone to the
          kernel at boot. timedated will do the same when the timezone
          is changed.

        * logind's inhibition logic has been updated. By default,
          logind will now handle the lid switch, the power and sleep
          keys all the time, even in graphical sessions. If DEs want
          to handle these events on their own they should take the new
          handle-power-key, handle-sleep-key and handle-lid-switch
          inhibitors during their runtime. A simple way to achieve
          that is to invoke the DE wrapped in an invocation of:

          systemd-inhibit --what=handle-power-key:handle-sleep-key:handle-lid-switch ...

        * Access to unit operations is now checked via SELinux taking
          the unit file label and client process label into account.

        * systemd will now notify the administrator in the journal
          when he over-mounts a non-empty directory.

        * There are new specifiers that are resolved in unit files,
          for the host name (%H), the machine ID (%m) and the boot ID
          (%b).

        Contributions from: Allin Cottrell, Auke Kok, Brandon Philips,
        Colin Guthrie, Colin Walters, Daniel J Walsh, Dave Reisner,
        Eelco Dolstra, Jan Engelhardt, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Lucas De Marchi, Lukas Nykryn, Mantas Mikulėnas,
        Martin Pitt, Matthias Clasen, Michael Olbrich, Pierre Schmitz,
        Shawn Landden, Thomas Hindoe Paaboel Andersen, Tom Gundersen,
        Václav Pavlín, Yin Kangkai, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 189:

        * Support for reading structured kernel messages from
          /dev/kmsg has now been added and is enabled by default.

        * Support for reading kernel messages from /proc/kmsg has now
          been removed. If you want kernel messages in the journal
          make sure to run a recent kernel (>= 3.5) that supports
          reading structured messages from /dev/kmsg (see
          above). /proc/kmsg is now exclusive property of classic
          syslog daemons again.

        * The libudev API gained the new
          udev_device_new_from_device_id() call.

        * The logic for file system namespace (ReadOnlyDirectory=,
          ReadWriteDirectoy=, PrivateTmp=) has been reworked not to
          require pivot_root() anymore. This means fewer temporary
          directories are created below /tmp for this feature.

        * nspawn containers will now see and receive all submounts
          made on the host OS below the root file system of the
          container.

        * Forward Secure Sealing is now supported for Journal files,
          which provide cryptographical sealing of journal files so
          that attackers cannot alter log history anymore without this
          being detectable. Lennart will soon post a blog story about
          this explaining it in more detail.

        * There are two new service settings RestartPreventExitStatus=
          and SuccessExitStatus= which allow configuration of exit
          status (exit code or signal) which will be excepted from the
          restart logic, resp. consider successful.

        * journalctl gained the new --verify switch that can be used
          to check the integrity of the structure of journal files and
          (if Forward Secure Sealing is enabled) the contents of
          journal files.

        * nspawn containers will now be run with /dev/stdin, /dev/fd/
          and similar symlinks pre-created. This makes running shells
          as container init process a lot more fun.

        * The fstab support can now handle PARTUUID= and PARTLABEL=
          entries.

        * A new ConditionHost= condition has been added to match
          against the hostname (with globs) and machine ID. This is
          useful for clusters where a single OS image is used to
          provision a large number of hosts which shall run slightly
          different sets of services.

        * Services which hit the restart limit will now be placed in a
          failure state.

        Contributions from: Bertram Poettering, Dave Reisner, Huang
        Hang, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Lukas Nykryn, Martin
        Pitt, Simon Peeters, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 188:

        * When running in --user mode systemd will now become a
          subreaper (PR_SET_CHILD_SUBREAPER). This should make the ps
          tree a lot more organized.

        * A new PartOf= unit dependency type has been introduced that
          may be used to group services in a natural way.

        * "systemctl enable" may now be used to enable instances of
          services.

        * journalctl now prints error log levels in red, and
          warning/notice log levels in bright white. It also supports
          filtering by log level now.

        * cgtop gained a new -n switch (similar to top), to configure
          the maximum number of iterations to run for. It also gained
          -b, to run in batch mode (accepting no input).

        * The suffix ".service" may now be omitted on most systemctl
          command lines involving service unit names.

        * There's a new bus call in logind to lock all sessions, as
          well as a loginctl verb for it "lock-sessions".

        * libsystemd-logind.so gained a new call sd_journal_perror()
          that works similar to libc perror() but logs to the journal
          and encodes structured information about the error number.

        * /etc/crypttab entries now understand the new keyfile-size=
          option.

        * shutdown(8) now can send a (configurable) wall message when
          a shutdown is cancelled.

        * The mount propagation mode for the root file system will now
          default to "shared", which is useful to make containers work
          nicely out-of-the-box so that they receive new mounts from
          the host. This can be undone locally by running "mount
          --make-rprivate /" if needed.

        * The prefdm.service file has been removed. Distributions
          should maintain this unit downstream if they intend to keep
          it around. However, we recommend writing normal unit files
          for display managers instead.

        * Since systemd is a crucial part of the OS we will now
          default to a number of compiler switches that improve
          security (hardening) such as read-only relocations, stack
          protection, and suchlike.

        * The TimeoutSec= setting for services is now split into
          TimeoutStartSec= and TimeoutStopSec= to allow configuration
          of individual time outs for the start and the stop phase of
          the service.

        Contributions from: Artur Zaprzala, Arvydas Sidorenko, Auke
        Kok, Bryan Kadzban, Dave Reisner, David Strauss, Harald Hoyer,
        Jim Meyering, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Mantas
        Mikulėnas, Martin Pitt, Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Peter
        Alfredsen, Shawn Landden, Simon Peeters, Terence Honles, Tom
        Gundersen, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 187:

        * The journal and id128 C APIs are now fully documented as man
          pages.

        * Extra safety checks have been added when transitioning from
          the initial RAM disk to the main system to avoid accidental
          data loss.

        * /etc/crypttab entries now understand the new keyfile-offset=
          option.

        * systemctl -t can now be used to filter by unit load state.

        * The journal C API gained the new sd_journal_wait() call to
          make writing synchronous journal clients easier.

        * journalctl gained the new -D switch to show journals from a
          specific directory.

        * journalctl now displays a special marker between log
          messages of two different boots.

        * The journal is now explicitly flushed to /var via a service
          systemd-journal-flush.service, rather than implicitly simply
          by seeing /var/log/journal to be writable.

        * journalctl (and the journal C APIs) can now match for much
          more complex expressions, with alternatives and
          disjunctions.

        * When transitioning from the initial RAM disk to the main
          system we will now kill all processes in a killing spree to
          ensure no processes stay around by accident.

        * Three new specifiers may be used in unit files: %u, %h, %s
          resolve to the user name, user home directory resp. user
          shell. This is useful for running systemd user instances.

        * We now automatically rotate journal files if their data
          object hash table gets a fill level > 75%. We also size the
          hash table based on the configured maximum file size. This
          together should lower hash collisions drastically and thus
          speed things up a bit.

        * journalctl gained the new "--header" switch to introspect
          header data of journal files.

        * A new setting SystemCallFilters= has been added to services
          which may be used to apply blacklists or whitelists to
          system calls. This is based on SECCOMP Mode 2 of Linux 3.5.

        * nspawn gained a new --link-journal= switch (and quicker: -j)
          to link the container journal with the host. This makes it
          very easy to centralize log viewing on the host for all
          guests while still keeping the journal files separated.

        * Many bugfixes and optimizations

        Contributions from: Auke Kok, Eelco Dolstra, Harald Hoyer, Kay
        Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Malte Starostik, Paul Menzel, Rex
        Tsai, Shawn Landden, Tom Gundersen, Ville Skyttä, Zbigniew
        Jędrzejewski-Szmek

CHANGES WITH 186:

        * Several tools now understand kernel command line arguments,
          which are only read when run in an initial RAM disk. They
          usually follow closely their normal counterparts, but are
          prefixed with rd.

        * There's a new tool to analyze the readahead files that are
          automatically generated at boot. Use:

          /usr/lib/systemd/systemd-readahead analyze /.readahead

        * We now provide an early debug shell on tty9 if this enabled. Use:

          systemctl enable debug-shell.service

        * All plymouth related units have been moved into the Plymouth
          package. Please make sure to upgrade your Plymouth version
          as well.

        * systemd-tmpfiles now supports getting passed the basename of
          a configuration file only, in which case it will look for it
          in all appropriate directories automatically.

        * udevadm info now takes a /dev or /sys path as argument, and
          does the right thing. Example:

          udevadm info /dev/sda
          udevadm info /sys/class/block/sda

        * systemctl now prints a warning if a unit is stopped but a
          unit that might trigger it continues to run. Example: a
          service is stopped but the socket that activates it is left
          running.

        * "systemctl status" will now mention if the log output was
          shortened due to rotation since a service has been started.

        * The journal API now exposes functions to determine the
          "cutoff" times due to rotation.

        * journald now understands SIGUSR1 and SIGUSR2 for triggering
          immediately flushing of runtime logs to /var if possible,
          resp. for triggering immediate rotation of the journal
          files.

        * It is now considered an error if a service is attempted to
          be stopped that is not loaded.

        * XDG_RUNTIME_DIR now uses numeric UIDs instead of usernames.

        * systemd-analyze now supports Python 3

        * tmpfiles now supports cleaning up directories via aging
          where the first level dirs are always kept around but
          directories beneath it automatically aged. This is enabled
          by prefixing the age field with '~'.

        * Seat objects now expose CanGraphical, CanTTY properties
          which is required to deal with very fast bootups where the
          display manager might be running before the graphics drivers
          completed initialization.

        * Seat objects now expose a State property.

        * We now include RPM macros for service enabling/disabling
          based on the preset logic. We recommend RPM based
          distributions to make use of these macros if possible. This
          makes it simpler to reuse RPM spec files across
          distributions.

        * We now make sure that the collected systemd unit name is
          always valid when services log to the journal via
          STDOUT/STDERR.

        * There's a new man page kernel-command-line(7) detailing all
          command line options we understand.

        * The fstab generator may now be disabled at boot by passing
          fstab=0 on the kernel command line.

        * A new kernel command line option modules-load= is now understood
          to load a specific kernel module statically, early at boot.

        * Unit names specified on the systemctl command line are now
          automatically escaped as needed. Also, if file system or
          device paths are specified they are automatically turned
          into the appropriate mount or device unit names. Example:

          systemctl status /home
          systemctl status /dev/sda

        * The SysVConsole= configuration option has been removed from
          system.conf parsing.

        * The SysV search path is no longer exported on the D-Bus
          Manager object.

        * The Names= option is been removed from unit file parsing.

        * There's a new man page bootup(7) detailing the boot process.

        * Every unit and every generator we ship with systemd now
          comes with full documentation. The self-explanatory boot is
          complete.

        * A couple of services gained "systemd-" prefixes in their
          name if they wrap systemd code, rather than only external
          code. Among them fsck@.service which is now
          systemd-fsck@.service.

        * The HaveWatchdog property has been removed from the D-Bus
          Manager object.

        * systemd.confirm_spawn= on the kernel command line should now
          work sensibly.

        * There's a new man page crypttab(5) which details all options
          we actually understand.

        * systemd-nspawn gained a new --capability= switch to pass
          additional capabilities to the container.

        * timedated will now read known NTP implementation unit names
          from /usr/lib/systemd/ntp-units.d/*.list,
          systemd-timedated-ntp.target has been removed.

        * journalctl gained a new switch "-b" that lists log data of
          the current boot only.

        * The notify socket is in the abstract namespace again, in
          order to support daemons which chroot() at start-up.

        * There is a new Storage= configuration option for journald
          which allows configuration of where log data should go. This
          also provides a way to disable journal logging entirely, so
          that data collected is only forwarded to the console, the
          kernel log buffer or another syslog implementation.

        * Many bugfixes and optimizations

        Contributions from: Auke Kok, Colin Guthrie, Dave Reisner,
        David Strauss, Eelco Dolstra, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering,
        Lukas Nykryn, Michal Schmidt, Michal Sekletar, Paul Menzel,
        Shawn Landden, Tom Gundersen

CHANGES WITH 185:

        * "systemctl help <unit>" now shows the man page if one is
          available.

        * Several new man pages have been added.

        * MaxLevelStore=, MaxLevelSyslog=, MaxLevelKMsg=,
          MaxLevelConsole= can now be specified in
          journald.conf. These options allow reducing the amount of
          data stored on disk or forwarded by the log level.

        * TimerSlackNSec= can now be specified in system.conf for
          PID1. This allows system-wide power savings.

        Contributions from: Dave Reisner, Kay Sievers, Lauri Kasanen,
        Lennart Poettering, Malte Starostik, Marc-Antoine Perennou,
        Matthias Clasen

CHANGES WITH 184:

        * logind is now capable of (optionally) handling power and
          sleep keys as well as the lid switch.

        * journalctl now understands the syntax "journalctl
          /usr/bin/avahi-daemon" to get all log output of a specific
          daemon.

        * CapabilityBoundingSet= in system.conf now also influences
          the capability bound set of usermode helpers of the kernel.

        Contributions from: Daniel Drake, Daniel J. Walsh, Gert
        Michael Kulyk, Harald Hoyer, Jean Delvare, Kay Sievers,
        Lennart Poettering, Matthew Garrett, Matthias Clasen, Paul
        Menzel, Shawn Landden, Tero Roponen, Tom Gundersen

CHANGES WITH 183:

        * Note that we skipped 139 releases here in order to set the
          new version to something that is greater than both udev's
          and systemd's most recent version number.

        * udev: all udev sources are merged into the systemd source tree now.
          All future udev development will happen in the systemd tree. It
          is still fully supported to use the udev daemon and tools without
          systemd running, like in initramfs or other init systems. Building
          udev though, will require the *build* of the systemd tree, but
          udev can be properly *run* without systemd.

        * udev: /lib/udev/devices/ are not read anymore; systemd-tmpfiles
          should be used to create dead device nodes as workarounds for broken
          subsystems.

        * udev: RUN+="socket:..."  and udev_monitor_new_from_socket() is
          no longer supported. udev_monitor_new_from_netlink() needs to be
          used to subscribe to events.

        * udev: when udevd is started by systemd, processes which are left
          behind by forking them off of udev rules, are unconditionally cleaned
          up and killed now after the event handling has finished. Services or
          daemons must be started as systemd services. Services can be
          pulled-in by udev to get started, but they can no longer be directly
          forked by udev rules.

        * udev: the daemon binary is called systemd-udevd now and installed
          in /usr/lib/systemd/. Standalone builds or non-systemd systems need
          to adapt to that, create symlink, or rename the binary after building
          it.

        * libudev no longer provides these symbols:
            udev_monitor_from_socket()
            udev_queue_get_failed_list_entry()
            udev_get_{dev,sys,run}_path()
          The versions number was bumped and symbol versioning introduced.

        * systemd-loginctl and systemd-journalctl have been renamed
          to loginctl and journalctl to match systemctl.

        * The config files: /etc/systemd/systemd-logind.conf and
          /etc/systemd/systemd-journald.conf have been renamed to
          logind.conf and journald.conf. Package updates should rename
          the files to the new names on upgrade.

        * For almost all files the license is now LGPL2.1+, changed
          from the previous GPL2.0+. Exceptions are some minor stuff
          of udev (which will be changed to LGPL2.1 eventually, too),
          and the MIT licensed sd-daemon.[ch] library that is suitable
          to be used as drop-in files.

        * systemd and logind now handle system sleep states, in
          particular suspending and hibernating.

        * logind now implements a sleep/shutdown/idle inhibiting logic
          suitable for a variety of uses. Soonishly Lennart will blog
          about this in more detail.

        * var-run.mount and var-lock.mount are no longer provided
          (which prevously bind mounted these directories to their new
          places). Distributions which have not converted these
          directories to symlinks should consider stealing these files
          from git history and add them downstream.

        * We introduced the Documentation= field for units and added
          this to all our shipped units. This is useful to make it
          easier to explore the boot and the purpose of the various
          units.

        * All smaller setup units (such as
          systemd-vconsole-setup.service) now detect properly if they
          are run in a container and are skipped when
          appropriate. This guarantees an entirely noise-free boot in
          Linux container environments such as systemd-nspawn.

        * A framework for implementing offline system updates is now
          integrated, for details see:
          http://freedesktop.org/wiki/Software/systemd/SystemUpdates

        * A new service type Type=idle is available now which helps us
          avoiding ugly interleaving of getty output and boot status
          messages.

        * There's now a system-wide CapabilityBoundingSet= option to
          globally reduce the set of capabilities for the
          system. This is useful to drop CAP_SYS_MKNOD, CAP_SYS_RAWIO,
          CAP_NET_RAW, CAP_SYS_MODULE, CAP_SYS_TIME, CAP_SYS_PTRACE or
          even CAP_NET_ADMIN system-wide for secure systems.

        * There are now system-wide DefaultLimitXXX= options to
          globally change the defaults of the various resource limits
          for all units started by PID 1.

        * Harald Hoyer's systemd test suite has been integrated into
          systemd which allows easy testing of systemd builds in qemu
          and nspawn. (This is really awesome! Ask us for details!)

        * The fstab parser is now implemented as generator, not inside
          of PID 1 anymore.

        * systemctl will now warn you if .mount units generated from
          /etc/fstab are out of date due to changes in fstab that
          have not been read by systemd yet.

        * systemd is now suitable for usage in initrds. Dracut has
          already been updated to make use of this. With this in place
          initrds get a slight bit faster but primarily are much
          easier to introspect and debug since "systemctl status" in
          the host system can be used to introspect initrd services,
          and the journal from the initrd is kept around too.

        * systemd-delta has been added, a tool to explore differences
          between user/admin configuration and vendor defaults.

        * PrivateTmp= now affects both /tmp and /var/tmp.

        * Boot time status messages are now much prettier and feature
          proper english language. Booting up systemd has never been
          so sexy.

        * Read-ahead pack files now include the inode number of all
          files to pre-cache. When the inode changes the pre-caching
          is not attempted. This should be nicer to deal with updated
          packages which might result in changes of read-ahead
          patterns.

        * We now temporaritly lower the kernel's read_ahead_kb variable
          when collecting read-ahead data to ensure the kernel's
          built-in read-ahead does not add noise to our measurements
          of necessary blocks to pre-cache.

        * There's now RequiresMountsFor= to add automatic dependencies
          for all mounts necessary for a specific file system path.

        * MountAuto= and SwapAuto= have been removed from
          system.conf. Mounting file systems at boot has to take place
          in systemd now.

        * nspawn now learned a new switch --uuid= to set the machine
          ID on the command line.

        * nspawn now learned the -b switch to automatically search
          for an init system.

        * vt102 is now the default TERM for serial TTYs, upgraded from
          vt100.

        * systemd-logind now works on VT-less systems.

        * The build tree has been reorganized. The individual
          components now have directories of their own.

        * A new condition type ConditionPathIsReadWrite= is now available.

        * nspawn learned the new -C switch to create cgroups for the
          container in other hierarchies.

        * We now have support for hardware watchdogs, configurable in
          system.conf.

        * The scheduled shutdown logic now has a public API.

        * We now mount /tmp as tmpfs by default, but this can be
          masked and /etc/fstab can override it.

        * Since udisks does not make use of /media anymore we are not
          mounting a tmpfs on it anymore.

        * journalctl gained a new --local switch to only interleave
          locally generated journal files.

        * We can now load the IMA policy at boot automatically.

        * The GTK tools have been split off into a systemd-ui.

        Contributions from: Andreas Schwab, Auke Kok, Ayan George,
        Colin Guthrie, Daniel Mack, Dave Reisner, David Ward, Elan
        Ruusamäe, Frederic Crozat, Gergely Nagy, Guillermo Vidal,
        Hannes Reinecke, Harald Hoyer, Javier Jardón, Kay Sievers,
        Lennart Poettering, Lucas De Marchi, Léo Gillot-Lamure,
        Marc-Antoine Perennou, Martin Pitt, Matthew Monaco, Maxim
        A. Mikityanskiy, Michael Biebl, Michael Olbrich, Michal
        Schmidt, Nis Martensen, Patrick McCarty, Roberto Sassu, Shawn
        Landden, Sjoerd Simons, Sven Anders, Tollef Fog Heen, Tom
        Gundersen

CHANGES WITH 44:

        * This is mostly a bugfix release

        * Support optional initialization of the machine ID from the
          KVM or container configured UUID.

        * Support immediate reboots with "systemctl reboot -ff"

        * Show /etc/os-release data in systemd-analyze output

        * Many bugfixes for the journal, including endianness fixes and
          ensuring that disk space enforcement works

        * sd-login.h is C++ comptaible again

        * Extend the /etc/os-release format on request of the Debian
          folks

        * We now refuse non-UTF8 strings used in various configuration
          and unit files. This is done to ensure we do not pass invalid
          data over D-Bus or expose it elsewhere.

        * Register Mimo USB Screens as suitable for automatic seat
          configuration

        * Read SELinux client context from journal clients in a race
          free fashion

        * Reorder configuration file lookup order. /etc now always
          overrides /run in order to allow the administrator to always
          and unconditionally override vendor-supplied or
          automatically generated data.

        * The various user visible bits of the journal now have man
          pages. We still lack man pages for the journal API calls
          however.

        * We now ship all man pages in HTML format again in the
          tarball.

        Contributions from: Dave Reisner, Dirk Eibach, Frederic
        Crozat, Harald Hoyer, Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Marti
        Raudsepp, Michal Schmidt, Shawn Landden, Tero Roponen, Thierry
        Reding

CHANGES WITH 43:

        * This is mostly a bugfix release

        * systems lacking /etc/os-release  are no longer supported.

        * Various functionality updates to libsystemd-login.so

        * Track class of PAM logins to distinguish greeters from
          normal user logins.

        Contributions from: Kay Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Michael
        Biebl

CHANGES WITH 42:

        * This is an important bugfix release for v41.

        * Building man pages is now optional which should be useful
          for those building systemd from git but unwilling to install
          xsltproc.

        * Watchdog support for supervising services is now usable. In
          a future release support for hardware watchdogs
          (i.e. /dev/watchdog) will be added building on this.

        * Service start rate limiting is now configurable and can be
          turned off per service. When a start rate limit is hit a
          reboot can automatically be triggered.

        * New CanReboot(), CanPowerOff() bus calls in systemd-logind.

        Contributions from: Benjamin Franzke, Bill Nottingham,
        Frederic Crozat, Lennart Poettering, Michael Olbrich, Michal
        Schmidt, Michał Górny, Piotr Drąg

CHANGES WITH 41:

        * The systemd binary is installed /usr/lib/systemd/systemd now;
          An existing /sbin/init symlink needs to be adapted with the
          package update.

        * The code that loads kernel modules has been ported to invoke
          libkmod directly, instead of modprobe. This means we do not
          support systems with module-init-tools anymore.

        * Watchdog support is now already useful, but still not
          complete.

        * A new kernel command line option systemd.setenv= is
          understood to set system wide environment variables
          dynamically at boot.

        * We now limit the set of capabilities of systemd-journald.

        * We now set SIGPIPE to ignore by default, since it only is
          useful in shell pipelines, and has little use in general
          code. This can be disabled with IgnoreSIPIPE=no in unit
          files.

        Contributions from: Benjamin Franzke, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Michael Olbrich, Michal Schmidt, Tom Gundersen,
        William Douglas

CHANGES WITH 40:

        * This is mostly a bugfix release

        * We now expose the reason why a service failed in the
          "Result" D-Bus property.

        * Rudimentary service watchdog support (will be completed over
          the next few releases.)

        * When systemd forks off in order execute some service we will
          now immediately changes its argv[0] to reflect which process
          it will execute. This is useful to minimize the time window
          with a generic argv[0], which makes bootcharts more useful

        Contributions from: Alvaro Soliverez, Chris Paulson-Ellis, Kay
        Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Michael Olbrich, Michal Schmidt,
        Mike Kazantsev, Ray Strode

CHANGES WITH 39:

        * This is mostly a test release, but incorporates many
          bugfixes.

        * New systemd-cgtop tool to show control groups by their
          resource usage.

        * Linking against libacl for ACLs is optional again. If
          disabled, support tracking device access for active logins
          goes becomes unavailable, and so does access to the user
          journals by the respective users.

        * If a group "adm" exists, journal files are automatically
          owned by them, thus allow members of this group full access
          to the system journal as well as all user journals.

        * The journal now stores the SELinux context of the logging
          client for all entries.

        * Add C++ inclusion guards to all public headers

        * New output mode "cat" in the journal to print only text
          messages, without any meta data like date or time.

        * Include tiny X server wrapper as a temporary stop-gap to
          teach XOrg udev display enumeration. This is used by display
          managers such as gdm, and will go away as soon as XOrg
          learned native udev hotplugging for display devices.

        * Add new systemd-cat tool for executing arbitrary programs
          with STDERR/STDOUT connected to the journal. Can also act as
          BSD logger replacement, and does so by default.

        * Optionally store all locally generated coredumps in the
          journal along with meta data.

        * systemd-tmpfiles learnt four new commands: n, L, c, b, for
          writing short strings to files (for usage for /sys), and for
          creating symlinks, character and block device nodes.

        * New unit file option ControlGroupPersistent= to make cgroups
          persistent, following the mechanisms outlined in
          http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Software/systemd/PaxControlGroups

        * Support multiple local RTCs in a sane way

        * No longer monopolize IO when replaying readahead data on
          rotating disks, since we might starve non-file-system IO to
          death, since fanotify() will not see accesses done by blkid,
          or fsck.

        * Do not show kernel threads in systemd-cgls anymore, unless
          requested with new -k switch.

        Contributions from: Dan Horák, Kay Sievers, Lennart
        Poettering, Michal Schmidt

CHANGES WITH 38:

        * This is mostly a test release, but incorporates many
          bugfixes.

        * The git repository moved to:
          git://anongit.freedesktop.org/systemd/systemd
          ssh://git.freedesktop.org/git/systemd/systemd

        * First release with the journal
          http://0pointer.de/blog/projects/the-journal.html

        * The journal replaces both systemd-kmsg-syslogd and
          systemd-stdout-bridge.

        * New sd_pid_get_unit() API call in libsystemd-logind

        * Many systemadm clean-ups

        * Introduce remote-fs-pre.target which is ordered before all
          remote mounts and may be used to start services before all
          remote mounts.

        * Added Mageia support

        * Add bash completion for systemd-loginctl

        * Actively monitor PID file creation for daemons which exit in
          the parent process before having finished writing the PID
          file in the daemon process. Daemons which do this need to be
          fixed (i.e. PID file creation must have finished before the
          parent exits), but we now react a bit more gracefully to them.

        * Add colourful boot output, mimicking the well-known output
          of existing distributions.

        * New option PassCredentials= for socket units, for
          compatibility with a recent kernel ABI breakage.

        * /etc/rc.local is now hooked in via a generator binary, and
          thus will no longer act as synchronization point during
          boot.

        * systemctl list-unit-files now supports --root=.

        * systemd-tmpfiles now understands two new commands: z, Z for
          relabelling files according to the SELinux database. This is
          useful to apply SELinux labels to specific files in /sys,
          among other things.

        * Output of SysV services is now forwarded to both the console
          and the journal by default, not only just the console.

        * New man pages for all APIs from libsystemd-login.

        * The build tree got reorganized and a the build system is a
          lot more modular allowing embedded setups to specifically
          select the components of systemd they are interested in.

        * Support for Linux systems lacking the kernel VT subsystem is
          restored.

        * configure's --with-rootdir= got renamed to
          --with-rootprefix= to follow the naming used by udev and
          kmod

        * Unless specified otherwise we will now install to /usr instead
          of /usr/local by default.

        * Processes with '@' in argv[0][0] are now excluded from the
          final shut-down killing spree, following the logic explained
          in:
          http://www.freedesktop.org/wiki/Software/systemd/RootStorageDaemons

        * All processes remaining in a service cgroup when we enter
          the START or START_PRE states are now killed with
          SIGKILL. That means it is no longer possible to spawn
          background processes from ExecStart= lines (which was never
          supported anyway, and bad style).

        * New PropagateReloadTo=/PropagateReloadFrom= options to bind
          reloading of units together.

        Contributions from: Bill Nottingham, Daniel J. Walsh, Dave
        Reisner, Dexter Morgan, Gregs Gregs, Jonathan Nieder, Kay
        Sievers, Lennart Poettering, Michael Biebl, Michal Schmidt,
        Michał Górny, Ran Benita, Thomas Jarosch, Tim Waugh, Tollef
        Fog Heen, Tom Gundersen, Zbigniew Jędrzejewski-Szmek
